
 Material quality is better and look is awesome. Its corner are too much hurting on hand. 
Cons :
1) Display quality is too poor as aspect to Micromax.
2) Touch is not sensitive as in all modern phone under this budget. You feel liitle hard touch while typing.
3) Third class accessories provided by Micromax expect its charger. The earphone and charger cable are worst quality. 
4) Camera quality is bad. No such resolution describe by micromax.
5) Micromax needs to much improvement in its mobile UI. The quality of UI is also not good and hard to access and find app. 
Pros :
1) Fast accessible any app. No face any legging issue between app.
2) Good looking feel like rich phone. 
If you feel like you want good looking phone than must by it otherwise Redmi2 prime is better options for this price range. 
 First BIG thank to Flipkart for your fast delivery service,after i booked i got it on next day only i think i am the first person to booked and received this mobile.and late to post my review comments..I had gone thru the mobile verification and validation, I found some defects and I spoke to Flipkart customer care regarding this defect and finally returned the product.Budget wise OK with 2GB RAM.  
These are my honest reviews
Pro's:
-2GB RAM
-16GB memory
-4G support
-Carning Gorilla Glass 3 
Cons:
-Found sensor light NOT working
-Charger port is NOT supporting for other BRAND is the BIGGEST DEFECT i found because the port has very depth and other universal chargers are short length compare to micromax
-Poor camera Quality
-Poor Battery backup
-Poor Speaker & Voice call
-Heating problem while using internet
-Reduced processor features as compared to M Canvas Express 2 
-Bit heavy weight  
Compare to Express 2 this mobile has reduced features.Overall review if you don't look into features then go for it. 
I'm regular customer of Flipkart!!!!! 
 I brought this from flipkart. they delivered within 48 hours..i was amazed with the speedy delivery..overall the phone is very good in this budget.
processor, ram, and the sensor are quite decent. camera quality is average and im not happy about that... 
unable to hear the person who is using this phone..
cheap call quality... 
operating system is Android v5.1 (Lollipop)
its has very big screen and hd video players.with gorilla 3 glass.  
overall its a pretty good phone for normal user and it comes with tempered glass in the box... 
 it is a good device for me. very nice mobile in this budget...!
that's why iam choosing this mobile. iam suggest to all mobile lovers please select this mobile in low budget...! 
 very very cheap Quality mobile i ever seen. Please don't buy this phone. 
Cheap Quality 'Display'
Cheap Quality 'Sound'
Cheap Battery 
Phone is Lagging
strucks while watching Video 
strucks while playing Games
Worst Camera 
Please don't go for this Mobile. 
 First BIG thank to Flipkart for your fast delivery service,
I think this is the only phone currently available at low price with higher specifications.   
 many people said about it's camera..its a very good phone..also in gaming..i give it 5 star............................................ 
 pros-good speed,good rear camera,2 gb ram
cons-front camera,battary back up
 over all i give 4 star................................. 
 I ordered this phone from flipkart and it was delivered before the delivery date. Happy for that. Most of the features are good in this phone but the main feature of camera is lacking somehow. And my main purpose was good camera. Not happy for that. It has big screen and looks stylish. 
 pros: 1. good display quality
 2. good internet connectivity
 3. good clearity
 4. rear camera is good
 5. 2GB RAM makes easy multi tasking
 6. smooth handaling
 7. value for money
inspite of this, there are some cons 
cons: 1. front camera is poor
 2. heating problem
 3. poor battery backup 
i suggest you, if you are rough user, dont buy this phone
but this is very affordable phone
if you have 6599.....please go and buy it 
(chinmay) 
 I have ordered this phone 3 days back and today I've received it.
Flipkart delivered it on the date before expected delivery.
Impressed with look and it's features.
I think this is the only phone currently available at low price with higher specifications. 
 please do not buy any product i bought this product and when ask one of customer care executive to replace my phone customer care executive even didn't listen to me. Problem with the handset when i watching movies online and surfing and put my phone on charge battery still draining again i recommend guys do not buy any product from this site for worse customer care .....rest of the things up to you.....thanks for poor service flipkart ...0star 
 Its a very bad mobile.. I will suggest never try to purchase this companies handset. its a wastage of money. 
 Apps are working smoothly but touch is kinda slow but its acceptable given the price range of this phone. Battery is also fine. Camera quality is also fine. After using it for a month I can say that its a good product at this price range. Working fine!  
Some problems that I faced: Glass cover that come with box had a crack but credit was added to my account to purchase the same so its fine. Also the silver strip that's on the side of phone had a cut in mine set and some portion of it was it cracked and come out after rubbing against my pocket. Thanks to flipkart for replacing it. So if you are purchasing this product, do check the side strip. Everything else is just fine. I will give it a 4 star (1 star less since touch is kinda slow). So if you are thinking whether to buy this product or not well I will say go for it! Its a good deal. 
 Good 4g phone in 6k.
Rear Camera is good.
Front camera is fine u can do Skype call if you have good light also u can take good picture if u are in good light.
good memory of 2gb ram, as it comes with preloaded apps also after that u will have 1.2 gb of ram free. so no hanging problem.
ear phone not good quality... will be damaged soon ,no long life for ear phones,
device gets heated up when its getting charged, also when you are making calls.
in standby time its ok . apart from this no heating problem.
can be xpandable upto 32 gb and internal memory is 16gb . so no space issue .
It may have an issue with earphone jack. because this is my replaced device. my previous device was having mic problem. 
So if buy it you will be having an issue with mic or earphone jack.
Battery backup is not good drain very fast. It drops down to 50 percent in 4 hours, it has only have 2000 mah, so your phone will only give backup of 1 day if u are not using for gaming and music. so u have to charge it every day. 
Over all good phone but very poor battery backup. 
 This is Good phone under this budget..
I think this is the only phone currently available at low price with higher specifications. i buy this phone only 5399 . Really big thanks FLIPKART .................. 
 Excellent product in this price. Call quality and net speed is good, you can utilize your 4g data properly. 
 In one word its awsme ..... Ekdm fatafati . Khub valo product . Khub joldi service . Joldi kine fela valo . 
 This is the best of the class mobile and it has good display. many people say that camera is bad it is due to the settings just adjust it and u will get good pictures. The battery is not the best but decent for normal usage without internet it stands for more than 24 hrs. If u have 6599 just buy it 
 nice product in such a cheap rate............. camera, processor and every thing is fine............good work Micromax.... 
 Excellent product. good response to touch. easy flipping from one app to another.good buy for the price offered. 
 Very nice. . Gud looking. ... gud feature.... only battery backbackup is less. 
 It is a very good phone at least for this price instead of going for the Samsung and phicomm phones.. Except the battery the phone is very good.. 
 Happy with product(Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G) and service...kept it up flipkart.... even i suggest to others 
 very very cheap Quality mobile i ever seen. Please don't buy this phone. 
Cheap Quality 'Display'
Cheap Quality 'Sound'
Cheap Battery 
Phone is Lagging
strucks while watching Video 
strucks while playing Games
Worst Camera  
 Good 1, worthy, but my tampered glass was broken and flipkart filled my wallet with 200 bucks but still unable to get its screen guard or tampered glass. 
 Good mbile.. Bt selfie camera is not good..................... 
 Returned after 1 day use. Bad built quality, bad camera, no picture clarity. A bad product built by China 
 Please my mobile micromax canvas xpress 4g mobile phones delivery is good bt heating battery level low % 
 I am not happy with this phone, Display not good, Poor Sound Quality, not a good phone, 
Don't be fooled by the Micromax low price phone 
 The product is not up to the mark with the specification,  
Camera is so poor and sound quality is also not upto the mark.  
Please go for MI or Lenevo rather wasting money on this product.  
 Not a good phone.... camera quality is worst.. as if it is a VGA Camera... the Touch doesnt respond properly.... the only thing i like is the look of the phone... rest everything is not up to the mark.... Don't buy..... 
 Very poor quality of camera, if u want a good camera then dont go for it. Its look like VGA camera, delay in video recording, flash is very bad, one can use it for only flash light not for taking pics in low light. 
 I brought this from flipkart. timely delivery..overall the phone are very poor .phone can not perform well in one month ie. bettery problem, hearing problem , calling problem etc 
 i purchase micro-max canvas express 4g m not happy with this product camera quality is so bad its looks like 2 mp or VGA camera..I am not satisfy with this phone...hate this phone 
 the battery of this phone is not not good. not giving the backups any move. i need to charge phone twice a day....  
the front camera which is 2 mp. the quality is not good. bt over all the phone is awesome. great ram. and the processor.   
 Overall its a good mobile but i experience the same problem as mentioned by the previous users of battery exhaust very soon and set gets overheated rest all is good easy to operate with all applications etc. I recommend no loss buying this mobile. 
 The mobile has 2 gb ram and a good after all it is very low but it heats up other than all features are good   
 NYC phone I liked it.I purchased this phone for my friend he liked lot. 
 Nice phone. Battery dries soon. But can be controlled using clean master app. 
 Good product, extra-ordinary specifications, nice features, low priced from Micromax and quick service from Flipkart... 
 Good ram , 16 GB internal ,best features , camera quality is also best 
 Awesome phone but battery back up is low & its look is average 
 Awesome device name,happy to use it. thank you Flipkart.i get this in same day 
 Sometime hang sndinternet speed is better than other hand set  
 Best mobile in low budget., 
I like it ..................... 
 Micromax canvas xpress is nice phone this phone is very use full for internet 
 Very poor display is not working after 4 months mic is not working 
 Nice prdct...but has some lag................................ 
 Good mobile in a cheap price . camera is good look is beautiful 
 Best mobile, very smooth, designing is good and happy to use 
 Good mobile for low budget.
Battery is not good.
Camera clarity is not good.  
 great budget feature phone after get on expected date it's meet my requirement 
 Awesome experience phone is working fine no problem at all and also delivered at promised date and time 
 Good product high speed mobile. Very fast. In buget price. Camera quality is also good. 
 Good mobile for that price
Everything is fine 
All tge best to micromax 
 Superb I like it nice mobile with nice features but the drawback is battery 
 Super mobile with super specifications more functions with redmi2 prime 
 I am using since Feb-2016. sound and quality of voice calls is not that good. micormax spark that I had earlier was far better. Touch screen is in repair now. I have asked for replacement . they are still investigating and will can do it if company decides so or will keep trying it for repair. this may extend for 30days too. thumbs down. models lesser that this price range work better. 
 Good phone at this price..
Only problem with charging port it is not standardized so we have to use specific charger. 
 1. Heats a lot.
2. Battery is terribly bad. If connected through laptop for charging then charge actually decreases if you are using 3G hot spot for browsing simultaneously. I have never heard/experienced this ever.
3. Always need to carry a battery bank even if travelling for 4 hours. Very fast decrease in charge when 3G used.
4. Calling sound quality is average. Not comparable to any low or high quality mobile.
5. Only good thing - Design is cool. Handy and looks like a costlier mobile.
6. I got my money returned by flipkart for this.
7. You should never think of buying this phone. 
 Have been using this product for 04 months. No problem at all sleek, stylish and well finished product from Micro max & of course well packed and in time delivery from Flipkart. Though front camera not very good for selfie but in the price range its more than you can ask for. 
 its good no issues but camera is pathetic screen quality is ok ok processing is impressive do not play true hd 720p videos 
 This is a Value for Money Phone.... Great Specs in Such a low Price...... Also Khudos to Flipkart got it for 3000/- only with exchange offer.......  
please do not buy any product i bought this product. From 1st day i found below problems in phone. 
-Charger port is NOT supporting with Power Bank and Car Mobile Charger Port.
-Poor camera Quality
-Poor Battery backup
-Poor Speaker & Voice call
-Heating problem while using internet 
Battery is draining while charging also. Again i recommend guys do not buy any product from this product. Giving 1 Star for flipkart fast delivery not for product.  
 Good product in this price........Unbelievable Price with more configuration like 4g enabled...2 gb RAM & 16 GB internal... 
 phone is good in look but there is heating proble while i talking, battery backup is not good, 
but in this price phone is good.. 
 The looks of the phone is very good. It is slim. Touch is also good. Camera also good. but some heating problem on handset. otherwise it is a very good phone on this price. 
 Good phone with very good display thanks for micromax making very good phone and trying upgrade their quality also this is good thing 
 micromax canvas xpress 4G is looking good.but picture quality is not too good.and rear camera quality is too poor.tuch of down button so heard,and not seen in night.other features in this price good.battery backup not long time. everyday charging battery.audio quality is good for listen music.video quality is poor,not hd. i hope my truly reviews help other people purchase this item.
i am not happy this time of flipkart delivery. 3 days late delivery my products as per given delivery date at the booking time. 
 phone is jst amage wid its features and design is also sleeky nd slim.only drawback with dis device is that poor bttry back up.thinks up dis will fixed at marshmallow update 
 It's a good phone at budget point of view but little bit both camera is poor......... 
Except camera this phone is too good in looking, handling, processing. 
 Not worth, battery backup will be 2-3 hrs only. Poor battery back-up, camera quality is also not up to dmark. I m not happy with this Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G 
 The phone itself isnt that bad, but with other competitors in the market you will get a much better phone in same range. The phone is extremely slow, hard touchscreen (to the point you have to actually hit it), fairly cheap exterior and rough edges. Wont recommend this to potential buyers 
 worst battery....i've ever had....in a phone. you have to charge it twice a day for.....regular use and...if you use it continuously for half an hour......it gets hot....and its impossible for one to hold it.... the corners are also very sharp......pricks when kept in the jeans pocket. 
 I am also facing Heating problem while using internet.....its good to buy and use 
anyway set is good 
 Phone is excellent. 
I purchased from flipcart. 
Headphone is not working. 
 Very Good Phone by Micromax. and its a very cheap and best 4G phone at this price Range.
camera is ok ok
2 GB Ram is enough 
bt the isuue is with Battery 
its not suitble for that feature phone 
 Hi... 
 Friends this product is very useful but this process was very late & use 4g system was hanging so please select right item to use 4g . 
 Thanking you 
 Since i opened the box...and used camera for first tym, camera issues started, screen started showing different coloured lines...but i must say that flipkart's work is amazing....easy return policy works really good..and return pickup was so quick...best customer satisfaction i experinced till day...! Thank you flipkart. 
 This phone is just perfect wow, Nic pakage i really love this phone plus the warenty card is perfect thanks to flipkart 
 I purchase 3 sets for my 3 different friend. Receive feedback from them as set is overall performance is good in this price range. touch is little bit slow. All others normally ok. 
 Material quality is better and look is awesome. Its corner are too much hurting on hand. 
Cons :
1) Display quality is too poor as aspect to Micromax.
2) Touch is not sensitive as in all modern phone under this budget. You feel liitle hard touch while typing.
3) Third class accessories provided by Micromax expect its charger. The earphone and charger cable are worst quality. 
4) Camera quality is bad. No such resolution describe by micromax.
5) Micromax needs to much improvement in its mobile UI. The quality of UI is also not good and hard to access and find app. 
Pros :
1) Fast accessible any app. No face any legging issue between app.
2) Good looking feel like rich phone. 
If you feel like you want good looking phone than must by it otherwise Redmi2 prime is better options for this price range. 
 Material quality is better and look is good. 
Cons :
1) Display quality is too poor as aspect to Micromax.
2) Accessories provided are of too low quality. The earphone doesn't work properly. 
3) Camera quality is bad. 
4) Music player doesn't even work at all.
5) Phone book and contacts doesn't get loaded properly once you unlock the phone. So can't make calls or messages either. 
Pros :
1) Good looking feel like rich phone. 
If you feel like you want good looking phone then Redmi2 prime and Coolpad Note Lite are better options for this price range. 
Please don't go for this Mobile. 
 VERY VERY BAD BATTERY... AND MOTHER BOARD. 
BATTERY WAS DRY AND PROBLEM WITH IN ONE WEEK. 
SERVICE CENTER VERY BAD EXPERIENCE 
 both the camara not good battery is also not good 
egdes are also not good so that not easy to handle it 
heating problem when use thats also problem yet  
Charger port is NOT supporting for other BRAND 
Poor Battery backup A BIG PROBLEM
Poor Speaker & INCOMING CLEAR VOICE CALL
VERY Poor camera Quality  
 Dear All, 
The handset packs quite a few features in the box but still needs to improve the consumer experience and value of money. the battery is on the inferior side.  
Regards, 
Manas Saha 
 The Product is Good in the price. Can't expect more. Feel Good to see Made In India. 
Feedback - Phone heats up little bit. 
 build quality is not as good as expected. Camera is good. charging takes too much time.earphone and data cables are below average. 
 This Phone is good..... Good phone under this budget I brought this from flipkart. they delivered within 38 hours. 
 MOBILE PHONE IS 4G LIKE THIS PRICE IS OK. BUT THE MOBILE IS OVER HEAT USING OVER CALL TO ANYONE. USING LIKE 4G AND OTHER FEATURE IS GOOD. 
 worst part of this mobile is battery.very inconsistent battery performance.other things was good.timely delivered by the seller.other things was good............................. 
 touch gone in 2 months. after complaining, they charged me with 2000 rs for new touch screen. please note phone was still under warranty 
 best phone in this price range, stock android and internal 16GB Ram, will never let you down with installation of apps
go for it 
cons: battery life
bottom line: best in this price range, if battery is your concern then buy a power bank,you will never complain again 
 Good looking...... Better price for 4g set ..
Camera quality; I think not so good.
Good ram....sim card offer is great (Airtel) 
 operating is easy camera resolution is good.weight less heat also very low.operating is easy camera resolution is good.weight less heat also very low  
 Dull camera experience both front and back....and also wasn't able to detect my sim cards... 
 this phone is totaly loss of money.
More heating after 10-20 mins uses internet, games etc.
very bad charger and earphone.
And important thing is that its battery backup very low.
If you want to only call then buy this phone. 
 Features at this price range is very good. Working very well after 2 months. Though its not for higher end gaming. 
 mobile is getting heated very often!!!!!!!! 
Touch was not good at all . 
price is very attractive to buy however i suggest to go for any other brand which is in same price 
 i am using the phone more than 6 months.it is very bad qulity especally when you are calling..donot buy this phone 
 1.mobile is good but it is not supporting otg . 
2.the battery backup is very poor.
3.in sunlight the te display is not seen clearly 
 Great Mobile in this price though photo quality is not so good, but for this range seems to be ok. battery back is up to the mark. i ca recommend is this phone for the basic users. 
 5 star because value for money. Network can be selected specific only 3g only 4g only 2g and highest connection 4g, which is helpful in Indian conditions 
 This is good phone in optimum budget. one should purchase this phone. very good application and storage capacity. 
 there is several problems in  
(Basically i am a big fan of micro max but i am struggling with following problems) set was new purchased on 18.01.16 
1) No battery backup (Max 2 Hr when switch on net) 
 2) Speaker not good 
3) huge heat when switch on net within in 10 min 
 Looking good but the receiver microphone is not working well. Audio quality is low... Otherwise rest of all functionality are working well.. Not good as expectation. 
 Is a super super super phone.. its give 3g speed in 2g mode...wow what a phone...thanku flipkart 
 smart looking... bur sensor is not working... earphone stupid quality.. besides these every thing is good...... 
 Camera qulity is pathatic dear micromax 
please improve, in same rate segment others are getting better, as you are an indian brand of mobiles, please loook in to quality 
 Micromax phones are just a shit. poor quality product in terms of performance and battery backup.only plus is its appearance. of course it looks slim. for that reason alone i bought this phone. the phone was defective. it has some software problem till now. i am not able to read my contacts. it automatically deletes the contact list and clears the call log. you cant even take the missed calls list. i tried downloading call log and contacts app from google store. still, the problem persists. it heats up while using internet. battery backup is very poor. it drains from 100 - 0 % within two hours if you use internet or watch videos. i requested for replacement as soon as i received my product. they cancelled the return request. they called me told me to do some bull shit that didnt work out. i requested again. they cancelled again. i still face the problem. it is one of the worst phones i ve ever used. my personal advise to you is dont buy micromax products. its just waste of money. micromax is the poorest phone brand on earth. f em. 
 Nice Phone but slowly charged and betery heat early while internet On 
 Best mobile for its price. 2GB RAM, 16GB Internal memory & 4G is advantageous i guess. Appears like mobile gets heated up soon may be because of 1GHz CPU. Touch screen wont work some times have to wait for 2 to 5 seconds and then tap. Appears like battery drains fast & charging takes little longer time. Compared to my previous mobile (2G, 2GB internal memory, 512 MB RAM), really enjoyed using Micromax Q413 and continue to enjoy another 1 and half year. Flipkart's Fast delivery is good. 
 don't buy
surprising it have 4 mp back and 1 mp front cam
at add and on product specification it show 8 mp but in setting it have option only 4 mp 
 i give u 1star because not avilable in 0star not batary bacup camera is 5 pixel but working same like 2 pixel 
 1.ABS plastic use very rough.
2.Phone corner are damages automatically.
3.Hang problem also.
4. looking good but material is very bad.
5. Battery is not good also 
 please don't buy this worst phone ever from micromax phone heats up and battery drains quickly and camera looks like a VGA worst front and rear camera plz don't waste your money 
 The mobile looks good in terms of features offered. The screen guard which came in the package was already broken 
 *very worst phone all micromax phones.
*phone is very heat at the time of charging and calling(above 100 degrees).
*very slow charging(100% full charging time taking upto 6 hours).
*camera clarity very worst(morning time photos are very worst night time some better).
*screen clarity is very worst. 
 All specifications are good but it's not supported otg cable 
 Speed not good, comparing with other 1 ghz +2GB RAM devise 
Touch sensitivity very poor
Battery very very Poor
NOT UP TO MARK, according to price   
 Sound quality very poor, touch not working proper, sound to other receivers not receiving good quality, 
Please don't purchase this phone 
 everything is good,except battery backup,
and touch does'nt work proper,when connected to charging,
and very slow charger.
rest everything is good performance wise. 
 Hi, I have bought this mobile through flipcart. My observation is as follows: 
1. Speaker quality is very Bad. Voice is not audible.
2. Battery performance is very poor. Draining very fast and taking very long time for recharge.
3. There is also heating issue with this phone.
4. Display and speed is average.
5.Ranking Average, 3.5/10. 
Regards, 
S. K. Sahoo 
 bahot hi accha phone hai camera to aur bhi accha hai i think itna low budget me isse accha phone nai ho sakta hai 
order ke 4 din baad hi product mere ko mil gaya tha so behichak order karo
2gb ram 16 gb internal kaha milta hai itna range me 
 This phone is not good at all. Dont buy it due to budget. The phone has
1. Very poor speaker quality
2. Poor camera
3. Heating Problem
4. Low battery backup
5. And it does not support VoLTE 
 Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G-- Excellent Product , lolipop too good to use and as usual fast delivery service from flipkart.  
 very good screen
sound good
performance good
touch good responsibility
and model deigned like a costly handset  
only battery is bed 
 Fourth day from the delivery and usage, inserted the sd memory card and thereafter KAPUT, the phone never came alive. The phone power did not come at all despite having removed the SD memory card, had put the phone on charge for 10hrs and tried again, but everything went in vain. Bitter experience with Micromax and was compelled to return the product. Its better Micromax should look after QA issues of their products. I wanted to buy an 'Indian Smart phone' but failed in the first attempt itself. 
 Sound Quality very bad, noise, cant hear other person speaking, battery is very very poor, takes too long to get charged and gets instantly discharged, horrible mobile phone.
Features provided seems ok, speed is good, not very user friendly. 
 Touch is fine..screen size is gud..speaker volume is fine & the phones looks good but it has the worst camera both rear n front..flash isn't at all good..i preferred it ovr redmi prime 2 but now i regret and m facing a lot of probs during calls as the voic is not at all pleasant to ears nd it has becom impossible to talk on phon calls..
#do_not_buy!!
Micromax will always be micromax.. yuckk!!? 
 Be yourself. Be informative.
Let your personality shine through. But its equally important to provide facts to backup your opin 
 Very poor battery back-up, after charging mic doesn't responds I have to re-boot phone.
over all without battery back-up phone is usless. 
 It will have 2gb ram but when u go to play adio using Google play or other audio player it will start hanging. Once it will hang then u have switch off &on phone or give it to reboot . 
 I like This phone very much .It is A good phone with good camera and budget phone. It has good performance for gaming multi tasking.  
 Very nice slim products new 4G mobile price low good better the mobile ðÂ?Â?± 
 It is Amazing. Versatile features, latest Android operating system, stylish and attractive look & very cheap price makes it Ultimate. Handset containing 2GB RAM and 16GB internal memory made faster performance. 
 THIS PRODUCT IS AWESOME.....SET MAI KOI BHI PRBLM NHI HAI.....ITNE MAI SAB KUCH DE RHA HAI LE LO YR..........SAMSUNG IS NOTHING AS COMPARE TO THIS 
 I had purchased the product for my friend. He seems to be happy, but the battery does not stand more than 4-5 hours. Why do we call it as smart phones when these phones does not have capacity to work for an hour also. 
From Ram Bahadur, CMR IT. 
 Nice/ good/ light/ slim/ coluer full/I like this android lollipop 5.1 v nice all of this mobile specifications and not comper this product any other company price of Rs.6599.. Is so low price and sach osam 
Hand set guys book this product and enjoy thanks flipkart and thanks microwmax launch this mobile   
 i just trailed and buyed then after it came to my home i used it
is best smart phone which is available at this price better to buy this neither to buy a phone which costs 15000 or 20000 or upto 50000 so in my way its a bestphone available at this price 
 4g lte & lolly 5.1 good phone from flipkart. good delivery time.good speed,good rear camera,2 gb ram
cons-front camera,battary back up
over all i give 4 star 
 Very very good phone....all coming feature in this phone i very happy 
 nice performance.sexy look in economic price camera resolution is also good.enough internal storage. 
but battery backup is not good. nice performance.sexy look in economic price camera resolution is also good.enough internal storage. 
but battery backup is not good. 
 I like very much this product.
In this Product already include lollipop OS, that is why easy handling.
RAM is 2 GB. and ROM 16 GB. 
Overall features are very good. 
 I purchase micromax canvas xpress 4g is awesome hand set and looking fantastic camera is good and high speed performance Android 5.1 is very good 
 Its good and fantastic i like feTure and the best mobile i like micromax canvas express 4g because it has 2 gb ram and 16 gb internal. Memory so it's has good processor. It is best mobile in micromax. 
 I just buy it...technically it is looking fine but micromax need to use good plastic in phone body. 
 shape of the phone is good
but camera not good
low sound
touch is good
charger not simple type
front facing camera is good 
 I brought this from flipkart. they delivered within 48 hours..i was amazed with the speedy delivery..overall the phone is very good in this budget.
processor, ram, and the sensor are quite decent. camera quality is average 
 Impressed with look and it's features. 
Excellent product. good response to touch. easy flipping from one app to another.good buy for the price offered. 
 Impressed with look and it's features.
I think this is the only phone currently available at low price with higher specifications. 
Excellent product. good response to touch. easy flipping from one app to another.good buy for the price offered. 
 I am happy to purchase from flipcar.but I think that I purchase from flipcart some expectation. specially from you that some gift or discount from you.I don't aspect in cash.but some memories from you that fill that I purchase some thing than I got this memories thing.for all my life I memories. And give you promised that I never forgets. That memories and I never throne or sell it.thank you to give me a chance to give review to you.thank you very much& happy new year to you and all staff of flipcart. 
 i will not say it's very good Phone, even it's good in this budget i got 4G,5inchHD Screen,
2GB RAM/16GB ROM,8MP Primary, 2 MP Front, its a very good phone you can go for it.... 
 It was a perfect selection of smartphone. Good quality product at most reasonable price. Keep it Micromax. 
 UNDER THIS RANGE VERY GOOD PHONE I M USING THIS LAST WEEK EVERTHING IS PERFECT PROB. ONLY THIS IS NOT SUPPORT OTG 
 For this price configuration is good
Battery backup is poor and it takes long time for charging.
Ear phone and charger are third class and gives a feel of pure Chinese mobile. 
 Very Good Performance with this Budget.Looking at the specs, makes me want to buy this phone, but i am pretty sure i will need to hook it up to the charger after 1-3 hours of usage, the most common issue I have had with all smartphones. Still, the everything else is POSITIVELY 4 star for the Rs7000 price tag, > processor + ram should ideally be ok to play almost all the games with a fair amount of occasional lag. > dual sim, not a huge fan, still in todays world we want more so will do > 16gb , again very good storage, you would eventually have 11 gb to of actual usage i bet, just guessing > selfy freaky? not me but the specs look ok for a an average selfy freak, just dont zoom and reveal your pimples :P > excellent display overall, if you arent gonna play games for 1-2 hours straight, i think you might want to buy this bugger. 
 I bought this phone for my brother. He is keep on complaining about this mobile for over heating with less usage. 
 Low budget , value for money Mobile. Display is good but is camera average. Hands-free received with the mobile is not good.Nice for light users only. 
Delivery was under 4 days , nice surprise for first time from Flipkart !!!! 
 size, screen, touch, ... all are OK, but battery backup was very very bad..... 
i recharged twice the day.... without power bank could not use this phone....... 
 quality too much bandal and system processor pure battery uses very low, camera quality front and back side both poor very poor.
i am suggested frnds not purchase this mobile,...... am frusted..... 
 I was impressed by appearance and specification's of the phone
But when I started using it I found it was not up to mark
First problem was phone is getting over heating while charging
Secondly while using it was hanging up 
 ITS GOOD 
NICE PRODUCT IN THIS PRICE 
NOT HANGING
BATTERY LIFE IS AVERAGE
ANDROID LATEST VERSION
GAMING PERFORMANCES IS GOOD
3 STAR MOBILE  
 too much trobleshooting in phone during traveling or playing games too slow procesor and touch.front camera big zero megapixle primary also like vga.at the end wastage of money. 
 camera picture quality, battery backup is not much as expected, local 3rd class headphone, programs are auto running in background. 5/10, compass hardware not available, memory card not supporting. 
 I m not satisfy with Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G looking .ear phone are simple and old luking s comparing to the phone and technology
edges of phone are outside just like that phone is broken.speed nd clarity is good size is good.  
 The phone is very good looking, sleek and elegant. Much better than Redmi 2, lenovo or Yuphoria as far a looks are concerned. handling is also good.  
The item get delivered quickly by flipkart. I received the item in less then three days, though I reside far from the any of the big cities. 
 Value for money 
Camera not good in low light
Bettry not enough for whole day 
 I brought this for my wife, I was looking for some modern phone @ low cost, and its up to the mark to meet my expectation. 
Lookwise its good,ladies will like it :)
Smooth handling & good touch sensitivity
Comes with in box tempered glass
Camera is Okey.. Images taken @ night are not so clear feels like low camera quality. but if you takes photos in day light its Good quality,
Display is great & has modern looks, very sleek & stylish.   
 All specification vise good product
Camera good ,music average ,but most of the that this mobile support 4g with a low range mobile. And it have good looking and flat piece 
 Product better but camera is poor sound also and back cover is not sold this model I search every shop I need back cover 
Ringing volume is decrease  
 the phone is overal good .. every thing is ok in this price but the battery performace is very poor ......so think before u buy it 
 It is not a good phone. has wi-fi issue . I will not recommend this phone to anyone. Display quality not so good 
 In less than 2 months, battery gets discharged very fast. I haven't even used this phone very much !
Other things are OK with this phone. But the battery .......!!! 
I can't even find where to buy a replacement battery........ Not happy with Micromax at all. 
 Mobile is good but not fullfiled expectations battery power is very low , I've to recharge my mobile 20 times a day. Need to work on battery & quality of the mobile to fullfill customer expectations. 
 I have order micromax canvas xpress 4G from flipkart but they have delivery me himalaya baby shampo bottle ðð 
 Back panel is very low quality and battery backup is very poor 
 Not Good at all.. I was thinking to return the mobile but changed my mind. Battery backup is very low, it used to stay only 3-4 hour when i use net and take more than 2 hour to charge. Touch is very slow if you play game and mobile is getting hang if you don't remove background pages. Request you not to purchase this phone other wise you have to change your phone within 1 month. 
 Purchased this mobile through Ws Retail . Gifted it to my mother in law. Mobil gets terribly overheated. Despite the 30day flipkart policy which is there in this case, they are not ready to accept. On top they want customers to do trials as they say. Very bad.  
Never ever believe in Ws Retail. Cheats, bloody hell. Poor show from flipkart. 
 Currently my wallet has no bal so its not showing the wallet payment options when it will show me? 
 mb are gud but software problem n heating problem camera is bad 
 VERY GOOD PRODUCT
IMMEDIATE DELIVERY
PROMPT ACTION
EXCELLENT SELLER
VERY GOOD PRODUCT
IMMEDIATE DELIVERY
PROMPT ACTION
EXCELLENT SELLER 
 I have ordered a Micromax phone and its charging point was not good. It is very disappointing that Flipkart has delivered me used product and didn't exchange it. 
 I don't like this product because its camera result is so cheap & bad. Never buy this mobile product. 
 Dear Sir,
 As i had purchased this mobile Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G, it gets full heat if i use 10-15minutes, battery package is very bad, even charger of this is get full heat.
 I had fear when it gets blast .. i would like to return or exchange this mobile  
 NOT EVEN USED IT FOR ONE MONTH IT STOPPED WORKING. VERY BAD QUALITY PHONE. NOT EVEN ONE MONTH IT WITHSTOOD. I DONT RECOMMEND THIS TO ANYONE 
 Used this product for 5 mnts.... still working well ..... doesn't lag.....decent camera.... nice phn at this price... nice selfies....... jst a prob with da battery..... 2500mAh would hav been better... lollipop consumes much more charge than kitkat... so battery life should hav been better..... overall nice with 2gb ram nd 16 gb HDD...... thnx to flipkart, .... nice phn.... Go for it... for me 8.2/10..... 
 Hi I bought this mobile in offer. Its display is not good .
Camera is taking time to capture the picture you have to hold your hand up to long time.
No proper Service by Service center. 
 Yes flipkart matlab bilkul pakka.. Fully original and geniun product milta hai flipkart me.. 
 Amazing.....................................................  
 Works good, the best part was the one day delivery and the offer price 
 Good one but improve the micro max .introduce bit more mobiles 
 This phone is laggy,camera s very slow and average. This is simply used for calling,gaming s not effective 
 Electronic thing are good to shop from here easy returning of products 
 Bad battery backup
Its battery backup is only 2 hr while using net 
 battery was no stand for appreciable period of time i went for return request but not yet get any response 
 bad call communication system, lower battery...low sound system....good looking but performing of this mobile not satisfactory 
 Duplicate product...After 2 day mobile is dead...when i request for return it takes too much time... 
 Amazing Phone. This is good phone and i love it ..................................................................................................... 
 this phone getting hanged when we use WiFi or data but flipkart is giving good delivery and i won't say that the sealer gave an wrong item this phone is very bad because of the config 
 It had become bad experience with this model piece. while receive/ dial call the sensor dosn't work as expected. 
 Touch is not working properly... guys dont prefer this phone.... 
Among all the other micromax phone it is the dumbest phone... touch sensor is not working properly.... rly upset after getting this product... Battery capacity is also not that much good. 
 Battery back up is less than worst. Device gets heated on 5 mins usage.If you are looking to waste your money please go for this product 
 there are some problems in this phone as 
1. heating problem
2. sensor problem
3. battery problem
4. network problem..... 
so please check other phone in this range before purchasing this product. 
 Its not to good it hangs alot n da camera alxo its not gud the feature aee all fake and the price with the product dosent suit alot 
 the product was good but the screen guard i recieved was broken .........
a bit disappointed.......... 
 The phone is over heating n thr is a problem in d display.. Very bad product.. Waste of money... 
 I bought this phone, due to my friend brother was used this phone but that is good .
I bought this her suggestion, I used for 20 days, before i don't know ring tones were different for different SIM. One day I got phone for SIM 2 and I have selected 2 different ring tones for 2 sims. Surprise I got same ringtone for SIM 1 and Sim 2. after resetting I got SIM 2 ringtone for both sim 1 and 2. Such a worst phone.
don't choose this phone. I lost my hope on online. I never purchase anything in online:-((((( 
 i bought this mobile on 9th march but battery is heats too much and yesterday mobile was switched of automatically and battery also dead. now i am checking for return but return period is expired like that i getting answer. My 6000 rs only used for these 43 days. 
i am not satisfied with this. very very worst service. 
actually for this i dont want to give even single star. 
 i have replacement done for the new phone, since it came with defective battery and unable to fit the battery and hence i returned the phone. 
The phone replacement was done, but after inserting the battery the phone turned ON but unable to proceed with initial setup of the phone,touch features not responding.The phone back side was getting heated /warmer .The battery was getting heated up the moment i turned ON the phone. 
Very much disappointed.  
Very bad quality.the features are good,unable to use and check ,since phone was getting heated/warmer.   
 Dear All  
please don't take this phone, within a week my phone speaker is not working i complete 2 times still no one response. its coming under We're sorry. We are unable to process your refund request. Reason : We were unable to contact you for clarification.Please visit contact us to reopen the request like this they treat the customer after the purchase the items. 
 Basavaraj 
 Phone gets heated only in few mins. I gifted this to my sister and when I raised a request to return it only in 2 days, flipkart started sending e-mails related to debug. When I said that I don't want to debug the problem, I just want to return the product, flipkart rejected my request. Looks like they sold it to get rid of it and now they are not ready to take it back. 
"Flipkart Advantage" logo does not have any meaning. They are cheaters and their return process is full of hassles and moreover this they do not want to take returns. 
I HATE FLIPKART!! I can't even give rating 1 for this product, putting 1 just because it is mandatory. 
 Seriously not worth for voice calls. 
I got faulty accessories too. 
 very bad phone, bad camera, very very bad battery, if u trust me pls dnt buy, in this range there are many good phone are available .. again dont buy...thnxx 
 Mobile speaker is a very bad quality.It is replaced me but again the same proble with handset. and Flipkart team is also not good. 
 In the use of just 3 months, the phone has stopped working. Its speaker are not working. 2 times went to the Micromax repair center. But not given a permanent solution.
Very bad on part of Micromax. 
Please do not buy this model. Not worth the amount spent.
Strong NO to Micromax.   
 Nice phone in low budget
good hardware specifications
impressed with Flipkart delivery system 
nice great Phone 
 Performance is very poor. Data connectivity, voice call sound quality and battery backup is worst even bad than 1000 Rs mobile. 
 Good phone in range of 6000 .....i got it only in 6000.. Best fot rhis range 
 VERY BADDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD 
 product and flipkart is best but... ekart logistic is extremely very very very bad irritating courier 
 Performance and display is good but sound quality is very poor. 
 Poor battery backup. 4g not supporting in airtel network. Takes very longtime to power charge disappointed. 
 COSTLY & LIGHT WEIGTH IRON BOX.. RETAILER WONT TAKE BACK.. CUSSTOMER CARE WILL NOT RESPOND CORRECTLY.. 
 camera is at all good. battery life is not good most probablya bad product to buy.the phone is getting hang.camera quality is worst than ever. 
 Very disappointed from this set. Just buy some pain killer and medicines for Blood Pressure control first and only after that You will purchase this one. Its a complete example for waste of money and peace of mind to purchase a micromax mobiles. My rating is anything between -5. 
 both of my moible's sim slots are not working whereas,my sim is working properly with other mobiles...I get the this mobile on 14th January 2016,please help me out 
 Do not buy this phone. Worst battery back up and worst touch... 
 worst phone don't buy this type of phones.camera clarity very poor, everything okay,but this price compare other company phones is too best 
 As per requirement of 4g phone, this is budget phone and excellent working. I have no complain for this phone. Thanks to flipkart team.    
This phone is not a satisfied phone this for a average use using after one month this phone is hang up to several time and heating issue is another problem camera is not good 
 This is good phone but in this phone network connectivity issue. It is not connecting with network without reboot. 
 Been using the handset for the last 4 days. Not satisfied with the product performance. Even with a 2GB RAM, the response is very slow. Abnormal heating. Videos especially whattsapp files are not compatible that gets stuck up every second. Asked Flipkart to refund the money to which they gave some troubleshooting tips. The problems is still there even after following all the troubleshooting steps. Now I have asked for the handset replacement. Yet to receive any response from Flipkart team. Its just a waste of money and time. Pretty disgusting product and user interface. Camera quality very poor. 
Not worth spending on this brand. 
If anybody facing the same issue please respond!!! 
 The phone is battery backup is very bad 2hours . heavy heating mobile data mode . some time mic not working 
 Cheap Quality Product . Mobile Dead in 30 days ........... Poor service by Micromax............................................................................................................  
 this product has manufacturing defect and not recommended to other this mobile has many issue. but other micro max mobile is very good. 
 Please not purchase this device, touch not working properly . Most of time hang while no data in device . 
 Please dont buy this phone.. 
This phone has very poor sound quality , Camera quality is very very very poor.
Other party voice is not clear and speaker phone voice is also not clear.  
Battery is not even comes for 4 hrs .. Its a waste phone...Please dont waste your money !! You can get very good phone with other brands.. 
 Don't Ever Try To Buy, Waste Of Money, Shit Is Better. Micromax Sucks To The Core. Flipkart Sucks Too 
 4g mobile at such an small price........... i think this mobile is value for all.....................................................................................................................................................................................  
FIRST THANK YOU TO FLIPKART FOR PROVIDING THIS MOBILE IN THEIR KART 
NICE DISPLAY
NICE CAMERA QUALITY
CHEAP AND BEST MOBILE
CAN BUY IT CONFIDENCLY 
 Very dirty and so bad mobile hang and very slow process i have this mobile only 1month destroy 
 Browser,speed, display everything is dull in this phone. Not worth buying.
There are several options out there. But no this one!! 
 This mobile looks value for money but it is not durable. After two weeks it switched off abruptly and is dead. I thought it might be a one off and got a replacement from Flipkart. To my surprise the new piece is dead on the second day. I have now asked for refund. Better don't go for this mobile. 
 CONFIGURATION NOT GOOD, CAMERA IS NOT PROPERLY VISIBLE. ZOOM NOT WORKING. IF YOU BUY YOU WILL SURE LOSS. 
 Mobile main things are speaker and Camera.camera its not an big issue but the speaker irritating us,,someone kindly advise me can i change into good speaker @micro max service center and how long it takes time to replace.plzzz 
 I received Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G from Flipkart on 17 Feb 2016. The mobile has problem with the Phone speakers. Flipkart has rejected my request to replace. The problem is not yet solved as I have received a defective piece. 
My request to Flipkart is get the problem resolved and don't be so irresponsible. 
 This mobile was very bad battery and no notification light on and so very very bad camera quality please refund my money or change mobile please.... 
 i had purchased this phone. phone specialization is good but i found duplicate accessories and some defect phone. so i think vendor is not sell good product. 
 Phone is good but it had a vry bad heating and backup problem 
I have purchsed this phone twice but I faced same problem both the time 
1st tym i purchased it nd after charging it full battery becomes low vry fast without use so I returned it
After sometime I purchased same phone it started hanging within 4-5 hrs of use and backup problem was same after charge fully it gets low very fast so i again returned it 
But the phone is good   
 Micromax mobile phones are the worst phone and has the worst servicing I have ever seen in my life. I have purchased recently a Micromax express 4G.Used for just one month...I had very bad experience with phone and its service centre. Could you believe...I have paid 1300rs for repairing my new cell phone just 2 days ago(18/2/2016)..bt still my cell phone was not repaired…Since the service was third class, I found some body parts were missing…. they are not giving money back for missing parts or not checking camera for verification purpose…I have mailed ,called customer care and went service centre many times bt they were not listening to my queries… its just like.. they don’t care about customers… they are making customers fool and doing cheap activity just sack of 500rs… 
i request u all those who are planning to buy a mobile phone or a smart phone..Please please please please…don’t buy micromax otherwise u will regret just like me  
 camera quality is poor. both front and back
normal charger cannot be used for this mobile as the width of its charging point is more.
signal getting disconnected. i am using idea 4g sim. tried both sim slots but still the signal of mobile is being disconnected after switching on the phone after 5 mins.
not recommended 
 taking long time to charge, but flipkart's service is good, they gave me a new phone when i returned. even the new phone has some problem, its heating automatically, when we use one or two apps for more thatn 5 to 7 minutes.
i bought three phones on the same day, there are many problem in teh other two also, only one out of 3 is goot in battery backup, the other two are discharging quickly. 
 mobile condition is very bad. Andriod correpted with 21 virus. It respond vrey slow .............................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................. 
 Many times sound from this side does not go during call to other side. Battery discharge fastly it's backup is not good like 2000mAH....................................................... 
 Worst product i had ever buyed, the build quality is very poor. so dont buy this product.
And there is no service center in kochi. when i called the flipcart CC they give the micro max service center detail in kochi, and i went to check the phone at the service center they told me that they cant repair the phone because they are not aware of this product. 
 I purchased this phone last month. 
Till 35 days no issues. But after that in a day touch screen and battery problem  
Lot of issue in phone so... Please don't purchase 
 Last week, I bought Micromax canvas Xpress 4g from flipkart.com
This phone contains too much problems with respect to selling price. 
Camera- On the box, 8MP camera is mention. But, it's picture clarity is less than my old Nokia C2 having 3.2MP camera. If you are selling phone at ?7k then you should work on at least rear camera section. The front selfie camera provide with phone is useless. No one like to use such quality of pictures. Both camera provide with this phone are worst. Seriously i am very disappoint due to such quality of hardware provide by you at cost of ?7k. 
USB cord- The USB cord provide with charger is also very cheep quality. Plastic material use for that cord is low grade. It's micro port is also fits very loose with given mobile. 
Speakers- The loudness of speakers is very shameful. The phones selling at ?2-3k are more loud and clear sound than this phone. 
Please give me replacement with better quality of phone. 
 battery backup is not good ..too much heating from 1st day. 100% showing after 5min 80% ...poor quality. 
 i browt micromax mobile that mobile will not swich on pls i want to exchange of my mobile to samsung mobile pls reply me to my request 
 is there notification LED lights are in this phone???is it work proper???
i bought from flipkart 2 week ago i tried many apps to test LED(notification not flahs light)
but its not blinking for a while.
so i want to know that this feature is in this phone or not???? 
why there is too much heating of screen!!!charging after hibernating also gives hot screen!!!!!during normal use no games no video than also heating!!!!!!very cheap hardware used in this phone worst phone writing after 4 month of user experience !!!!this is why brand india(made in india) has no value in international market.other brands are too good at this price with same features!!!!!!my advice is don't buy this product nothing is satisfactory except look,which is not primary objective of any user. 
 NOT USEFULY,DEAR ALL GUYS PLEASE DON't BUY IT,MANY PROBLEMS IN HERE,MOST- SPEAK & HEAR SOUND PROBLEMATICs, MY EXPE WISE- THIS MOBILE HANDSET IS TOTALY WEAK & ROUGH.................. 
 Wast product I have taken mobile on Jan 14 and after that I return the product because of battery issue and I ordered again same product and the issue was same with new product flipkart is selling duplicate product don't order in flipkart 
 The mobile gets discharge early. Heating problem is regular. Dont buy these mobile atall. They r not giving replacement or Refund. This time i failed from u flipcart. 2 times they called but the mobile problem is little bit 20% less. But i dont want replacement for these. I want my Refund. 
 The mobile was good, but inside the box tempered screen guard was cracked on delivery. i report the damage issue to flipkart. i asked to flipkart for replace the damaged screen guard. but they are rejected my replacement request. i can't accept this. very very disappointment on flipkart poor delivery and customer care service. please don't buy anything throught flipkart. 
 good phn,tanks flipkart for fas deli.... gud phn gud cam all gud.... charger is not tat gud..nice... camera gud, all gud.. i love tat phone...................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................... 
 very bad Phone
very very cheap Quality mobile i ever seen. Please don't buy this phone. 
Cheap Quality 'Display'
Cheap Quality 'Sound'
Cheap Battery 
Phone is Lagging
strucks while watching Video 
strucks while playing Games
Worst Camera 
 This is my last purchase for sure from flipkart. This particular product I bought is a crap. Sellers registered with flipkart are frauds. Flip kart just busy in making money and not concern about their clients. CEO is sleeping somewhere . product is crap and customer care service is worse than ever and its getting worse day by day. I placed a order for this crap phone on 18 DEC through credit card .later on after receiving the phone,found its camera is a shit. So gone through a troubleshoot process with customer care technical team. I packed the phone as it is and returned this crap after a couple of days through dtdc courier . I have not mentioned any return or order I'd,as I have not been intimated by customer care executive. He simply asked me to return the product to warehouse at mahipalpur Delhi. I did courier that and since than I have been following through mails and phone calls.shit customer care executive every time ask for 24 hour and than 24 hour. This 24 hour story kept on for a week. Than I have been told your funds are under process and would receive in a week. Than after a week some customer care executive told me that your.product has been returned due to not mentioning return I'd and order I'd. And since than I m waiting for that parcel but have not received yet. I tried to track it and found dispatched from Delhi mahipalpur on 31 December. 
So flipkart has a poor customer care support.
Poor sellers registered .
Poor courier vendors registered. 
CEO and other management enjoying new year at home I guess.  
If any of supervisor or senior authority find this review ,than take action on this as I have already been harassed for my mistake ,that I purchased a phone through flip kart. Ultimately you are the people who are responsible for l this trouble . 
 not able to connect to pc using usb not more then 2 min you should be fast as 4g to operate it as the name suggest.
donot buy it as the service center people will...firki lege tumhari 
 i have raise a compalint in Flipkart in last month still its in process and now they are asking they dont have records abt my complaints  
even i called many times but again and again they are denying my request 
so i m very unsatishfy with Flipkart policies 
Even i wish say they want to sell only & does not matter images in market of Flipkart 
from today onwards i promiss i will not purchase any single item from Flipkart  
 I bought this phone in November end, it worked fine only for 10 days. After that it started giving trouble with the touch. Lower left hand corner is not sensitive at all. No touch sensitivity there. Even though it claimed as gorilla glass, screen cracked after falling from the coffee table. Please dont buy this. 
 I purchase 1st time a product by flipkart. and i am happy with my micromax canvas xpress 4g Q413 handset. 
this mobile is very good working and flipkart packaging is very nice.
flipkart give with this product a screengaurd but i dont get this and i call coustmer care and his solved my problem and give me Rs. 120 refund price screenguard.
the micromax this mobile is very good working and no problem.the phone camera is week but this range this product is nice.
thaks flipkart 
 battery back up very poor
mobile looking good.
battery back up very poor
mobile looking good.
battery back up very poor
mobile looking good. 
 a am old customer of flipkart but thid time i am getting worst service from the company. if possiable pls return my fund so that i am purchase new one becoz on of flipkart executive advice me to recharge a new internet pack but after recharge internet pack whatever step he advice me to follow all are not getting usefull,my phone battery is not stay any more. as per his commentment he told me that if this process is not working the flipkart company will refund my fund there after one of flipkart executive called me and asked me to download the smart check so they can check and try to resolve the issue but after checking through smart check problem is not solve.But the main concern is that till now no phone calls flipkart companyend to refund my amount, i am really very surprise to see that they have dont any responsibility for their customer and their product. 
So this bad and worst experience from FLIPKART company is teach me to keep safe distance from this company bcoz i dont expect this kind of service from FLIPKART like company.    
 Excellent service from flipkart.i got the product within 48 hours of order placement.Amazing product delivery.excellent packing the device reaches you safe in hand....I thnk they are best in delivering the product in short span f time with desired quality....GREAT WORK FLIPKART.WE ARE FAN OF YOU...............................you can buy this device.. a trustworthy product at reasonable price................................................. 
 very cheap quality product.after 2 or 3 days it switch off automatically anytime.....sometime battery down 70% to 15%  
 This phone's features and price looks so perfect but trust me it heats up like anything.. at times while making phone call my cheeks and ears become red, apart from the fact its battery drains very fast.. Its gonna be your wrong choice of buying it... MyD! 
 I ordered the ph.. It is an awesome set.. It was very well packed and very fast delivered to me.. Im loving the phone.. Itz lovely to hang out with.. 
 broken Screen Guard found in the box. Otherwise product was good  
 I have used this mobile from last 4 days so everything is good in less price,I m very thankful of flipkart for good service regarding delivery,quality 
 all features best but bettery life very low.camera sound and touch are very good . so i not recomended for bettery life lovers. 
 Most worst mobile... Battery backup is very poor. And camera is poor quality.... And mobile is heat in Internet 
 Looking its very nice mobile
Camera is not good.
Battery backup is very less.
While talking in phone voice is not clear. 
 Very bad experience had to return the handset bcoz of major problem always go for branded handset 
 Cheap one but is worthy of it. ( Why expect me to spend so much time reviewing it using at least 100 characters ?, OK, xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx ) 
 very very cheap Quality mobile i ever seen. Please don't buy this phone. 
Cheap Quality 'Display'
Cheap Quality 'Sound'
Cheap Battery 
Phone is Lagging
strucks while watching Video 
strucks while playing Games
Worst Camera 
Please don't go for this Mobile 
 it is good product by micromax, nice battery back up ..... so fast in web browsing................................................................................ 
 awesome handset in this price range.....
Light weight 
God speed
Battery backup is average according to 4g and android smart phone....
Overall can be purchase..... 
 Camera Quality & Tough very Slow... 
I suggest Please dont by this mobile through Flip kart.... 
Return request also not accepting ... i try to rerun 3 times rejected..  
2 times they called & but 3 rd time with out cal they rejected rerun... 
 Don't get fooled by specification of this phone.....it doesn't perform the way it should be ..I have returned this phone only after one week of usage 
 Hi All... This phone is good for this price range... But the disappointing thing is tamperred glass which was in the box was broken... Otherwise ok nice one... 
 It was not charging and screen guard was broken got it replaced.. Camera not good.. 
 Guys request you, pls pls dont buy This phone in any condition, i made mistake, most poor quality i have seen ever, very slow phone, poor touch quality, hang too much, very bad quality ever....and this seller doesnt accept return, they just cheat you.they dont take replace Ã©ven i have lot of problems..display vibrates too much...very bad phone..they just wrote 30 days replacement..they dont take phone return.. 
 This is first time experience in buying phone via flipkart, box was fine phone is fine.
With Internet & GPS on after full 100 % charge phone is getting switched off in 2 to 2.5 hrs time. Even the phone is connected in charge trough USB cable the same is not getting charge. 
Where as i am charging Panasonic Eluga S, Motrola E, Samung phone getting charged.
Charging Sign is showing but not getting charged. 
Really sorry, need immediate resolution from your end.  
I want replacement on immediately. 
 Micromax Canvas Xpress 2 price, specs, NDTV's Rating, Micromax mobile phone review at NDTV ... Micromax Canvas Xpress 4G(Blue, 16 GB) 
 Camera Issue
Wifi Issue
Brightnesss Issue
Nothing is good in this mobile not any app works
Games problem
hang problem
disconnecting problem 
Worst Customer Care service. Never Buy hing from flipkart 
 not a good product.  
looks slim and light but the battery takes a battering... horrible.. discharges in just under ten hours with no talking... idlely kept and the battery runs out of juice... takes full marathon 3 hrs to charge.. and drains out faster than that like a sprint... camera quality not gud. 8mp and 2mp is a far cry.. in fact just as the old box phones... display is ok ok.. heats up a lot... the usb port and charger fit badly.. accessories just resemble the road kart throwaways.. but packaging tooo gud and designed to taste.. wish u dedicated more time developing ur phone instead... 
there r better 3g phones @ lesser price than this hyped 4g piece... disappointing micromax.. 
please test ur products before pushing them into market 
 Not such as aspected 
Very bad picture qulity 
Good looking only 
Dubba hi sirf
All the features are successful 
 this is to inform to all viewers of flipkart, that i purchased micromax xpress 4g on 21st november 2015.
 from the first day the mobile phone use to overheat, phone is very slow in processing, takes alot of time to display, touch is lacking doesnot perform function and gets hang immediately, if insert memory card the mobile gets too slow to function, 8 megapixel camera quality is also not appropriate according to mentioned features. the picture quality is very bad, it use to restart and ask for sim pin while waking from stand by mode, overall waste of money, time and customer trust, flipkart must verify the features before adding the product to its list. 
 Very good phone at this price.But bad Camera quality.The screen Guard in the box is also broken.Please REPLACE! it. 
 I got my mobile delivery on 28/11/15 I open box and check all items. I got damaged tuffun glass and usb adapter is also damaged. about mobile its remain to check.
I want to Replace Screen gard and Usb adapter from Flipkart. 
 i am purchased two mobiles, one box inside temper glass damage piece came and one mobile top of speaker some heat for talking call. 
 After checking of 1Hr I Found……
The Mobile is Heating heavily with out using Net and Games.
Mobile Camera quality is very poor like VGA and click the 1 snap automatically snaps are coming.
Touch is not working good its very slow responding.
Ear phone speakers are very poor quality. Only right speaker is working, left speaker is noise sound.
Most of the problem is Heating.  
 Camera is a big disappointment. Overall quality is poor. I was attracted because it was just launched and I expected an outstanding product in its range.,Dear Flipkart, something has gone amiss in our faith on you. Flipkart has refused to exchange this item for another mobile. 
 camera is not so good and also hanging problem occurring during process. touch is cheap and overall its a cheap product.. 
 camera, audio quality is very poor .. in same price YU TUPHORIA is best Mobile ..Dont buy this mobile.
Worst Camera Quality 
 WiFi gets connected but internet does not work. I checked with my other mobile connecting to same WiFi and it works perfect but this phone does not connect to internet even with its mobile data. This is intermittent issue. It will work on its own after few hours or days. 
Device has serious mic problem. The other end caller is complaining the voice is not audible. Not happy with the device as the basic functionality of mobile is not working as it should.  
Battery is draining very fast with very minimal usage itself. 
Highly dissatisfied with flipkart technical team. They suggested default template steps and closed the complained saying they shared troubleshooting steps. But the issue remains same... flipkart, please recruit skilled resources rather than head count. Learn to listen the customer and understand the problem. 
 your handset is not good canvas xpress 4g have 2 default one is camera clearity not good and wifi not supported its big issue in this handset. after replacement that problem again please tell what shoul i do m really very upset. 
why does happen with me?? please do something and give me suppourt 
 Totally waste of money
screen with full brightness also looks dim
camera worst than any cheaper model
heating ... can boil water
speaker ... one one listen to the otherside if we are in traffic
if there is any - 5 star i go for that
Please dont buy 
 Flipkart thanks for delivering product in only 1.5 days, but guys i didn't expect this type of quality from MMX  
Pros - 2gb, 4g, gorilla glass 3 
Cons - bad camera, bad design,bad screen gaurd.  
as of I have not gone through performance 2gb ram means I expect it should be good.. let's hope. I PUT THIS PRODUCT IN MY PHONE AND HAVE NOT SEEN ANY DIFFERENCE IN MY SIGNAL STRENGTH AT ALL. I BOUGHT SOME BEFORE AND THEY ACTUALLY HELPED BUT THESE DID NOT.
Its been 11 months now that I've held on to my Nokia 6600 for. I purchased this phone knowing it was slightly old as compared to the newer models of Nokia phones available. I thought it was kind of steeply priced at that time. I must add to the dismay/delight of readers this phone is simply the most groundbreaking phone mankind has ever held. It has raised the bar owing to number of features it offers and the absolute ease of use delight.Now I'm a techy and like getting technical about things so I'd brief you in on the few features I liked about this phone-1.The Phone has the best keypad any Nokia phone has to offer. My dad has a Nokia 6670 before which he has a Nokia 7210 and before that he had a Nokia 6610. I think the keypad on your cell phone is the most important thing for me as Im constantly sending messages , calling people and fiddling around with my phone. Believe me when I say this I have used and fingered all Nokia phones and the 6600 has the best keypad2. The looks are absolutely no nonsensical. Some complain it being a tad too bulky looking. I must admit its not the best looking phone ever but then it has this look of static and absolute conviction that looks like everything a phone should be3. The Nokia 6600 has a brilliant Java interface. There's a whole lot of things you can do with this phone besides reading a book , playing various Java games , having a variety of software installed. The Phone offers a 32 Mb MMC card and I think that is certainly the most exciting feature. I upgraded mine to a 128 MB MMC Card via which I can store unlimited number of messages, take a thousand pictures and videos. Capacity is not a problem here.4. The Build is just right. The phone is sturdy. I've dropped it atleast a dozen times to my recolletion and it still works as good as ever. Its a tough one this unless you wanna drive your car over it. This isn't the most rugged phone ever but then your not gonna play aeroplane with this,are you.5.The Camera installed on this phone is awesome. I click pictures in JPG format and because the phone has a bluetooth device I find it extremely easy to transfer pics to my pc and forth. The display and brightness on this phone is quite extraordinary. The use of 65536 (16bit) colors ensures you get your share of animations and icons on your phoneBesides the above mentioned Merits , the phone has decent ear volume and loudspeaker functionality. It has great upgradibility. I can play MP3 files on my phone by simply downloading softwares freely available on the net. Now that is neat. The log functions helps you track down the incoming , outgoing calls in the most easy of ways.The handsfree provided by the phone is useful for those who talk on the phone while driving. I wouldn't do that because it's not worth my life.Anyhow some demerits of this phone,The phone has a slow processor and the ear volume is lower than 6610 but then the 6610 has the best ear volume among most Nokia variants.The battery life of this phone is at most 2 days and at least one day at excessive use. Video recording is limited at just 9 seconds. You can upgrade but then there's a certain level of trouble involved.Overall I dont think I will ever upgrade from this phone. When I purchased this phone , I thought to myself that I had purchased the most popular phone around and the thought didn't please me. In any case , putting aside how common it is in my city , I dont think I can be anymore satisfied. This makes for a great phone.Did I mention the note feature and how you can send notes via Bluetooth?gee anyways ENJOY WHAT WORKS!
I bought this on a reccomendation of a friend.  My brother bought a Motorolla earpiece for about $30 more than I paid for mine.  he hates his and I love mine.  Most people never realize I am talking to them through a headset.  You get 3 ear speakers of different sizes so you attach the one that is most comfortable for your ear.Best addition to my cell phone I have ever bought.
couldnt watch movies on the htc without the battery dying. the phone is great for entertainment. but battery could be better. the powerbear cases is a great fit and a good kick stand on teh back for entertainment. im sold
this item came in a timely matter and fit the descrition the only thing that the plastic broke a little to easily but other than that every thing else is good
Probably the biggest compliment you can give this headset is that you'll often forget you're using it.  The Scala 500 is incredibly lightweight and (when adjusted properly to your ear) very comfortable.I'm impressed by the controls.  Both the main button and the volume 'wheel' are very accessible and very responsive.  With the Sony HBH35 headset I was constantly dropping calls due to the unresponsive controls.  This never happens with the Scala 500.  Additionally, volume is easily regulated.Pairing with the Motorola MPX220 phone was quick and easy.  Additionally, reconnect is quick and reliable following a disconnect due to powering off one of the units or going out of range.  (Range, by the way, is good; comparable with the HBH35 headset.)You can hear the other party clearly and crisply.  Transmission of your voice, I would say, is good.  Though there's infrequent interferrence (static) on voice transmission, I've never had anyone complain about difficulty in hearing/understanding me.  There's NO annoying "bluetooth echo."To sum it up:Plusses:  Price, size, weight, comfort, pairing, controls, sound quality, range, responsive customer service.Negatives:  Requires charging cradle (one more thing to haul around if you're traveling), no 'fuel guage' to indicate battery life (red flash comes on, but only when it's close to dying)
I love the case and it came 2 days early but there is some gripes i have. first of all there is a strong chemical smell as if the case was just freshly stained and second I had to remove the back of my galaxy s3 phone in order to get it to fit in the new case. and ive had it and been using it for 3-4 hours now and the smell is all through my house. it makes my throat hurt and im coughing so im going to leave the case outside for a couple of days and see if the smell goes away. I hope it does because i really wanted to use that case.I will update in a few days. if anyone has any suggestions on how to make the smell go away please let me know.update: ok i left the case outside for 24 hours and it seems to be ok now. but i still have to remove the back of my phone for it to fit. my phone is the galaxy s3 SGH-I747
I bought a different BoxWave Patent Leather Clutch with magnetic closure and was so impressed by it's functionality. BoxWave changed the style to a snap closure and I didn't realize it until I received it.I'm not taking stars away because of my mistake, but by the usual problem I have with snap closures. I have to spend extra time trying to snap it together because it doesn't just close on its own like with a magnet.The case also had marks inside under two of the stitches and shows mark on the patent leather as soon as I run anything slightly against it. I used this case once, maybe twice, had to return to the magnetic BoxWave leather clutch instead.
Love that you can use the same cable to charge my phone in the house as in the car! Best little car charger device I have seen and used! It is so small, you can't even tell it's there.
I have owned over a dozen different models of bluetooh headsets.  This is the best sounding and most comfortable of all of them so far. The range is good, battery life is good I only wish they came with more ear inserts as spares.
I've had this beauty for nearly 2 months now and I truely love it.  The only disappointment so far has been battery life.  Mine generally requires a charege every 48 hours or so and I don't really talk on it that much.Why is this phone so great?  Simple.  It has it all.  This is the first phone I know of that has the large bright screen, infrared, bluetooth, USB connector and a speakerphone.If you are looking for an upgrade, this is definitely the phone for you.
I'll start with the bad first, given the amount of interest this phone has generated.1) The Phonebook application is a little...wonky. Some people have said you can't add more than one piece of contact info per contact, which is NOT true. You can, but its nearly hidden underneath the "MORE" function while editing the contact. However, its not convenient and you cannot add additional e-mail addresses or phone numbers to your contacts using the Phone Tools app...which is annoying, since T-Mobile charges $30-40 for the hardware/software bundle.1a) It also takes forever to scroll through your Phonebook contacts. I thought it MIGHT be caused by having some SIM contacts, so I transfered all of them to phone memory. No dice. The scroll speed is untenable. Even my wife's Moto V330 is quicker. What gives? I had to create a voice prompt for almost every contact in my list.2) Even at full blast, the volume just isn't loud enough. Plus, the "audio sweet spot" on the speaker is hard to keep next to your ear. If you are planning to get a Bluetooth headset and use that exclusively, this shouldn't keep you from getting the phone.3) Compared to a Samsung V205, a Sony Ericsson P910i and Motorola's own V330, the RAZR gets poorer reception. The previous phones mentioned all get four bars at my house. The RAZR gets 2. This even after calling T-Mobile tech support for help. Their advice? "Keep turning the phone on and off and it will hopefully find another tower."4) T-Mobile offers NO games for this phone yet. Given how high profile this form factor has become, I find this level of support to be somewhat poor. I know - you don't buy a phone for its games. But just to show how lacking T-Mobile's support is...the RAZR includes a demo for BeJeweled. After the (very) short demo is over, it asks if you want to buy it. Clicking the link brings you to a webpage that says "Sorry, we don't offer games for your phone yet". My wife's V330 has a similar issue. She's had it for over 4 months and services like T-Mobile STILL offer no games for the phone. Again, I know you shouldn't buy a phone based on the number of games offered for it, but its still a feature, something to whittle away the time while waiting at the DMV.5) Camera phone still only 640x480. Decent pics at that resolution, but given that there are cheaper phones on the market (I didn't get this phone for free) with higher pixel values, this is a moderate oversight on Moto's part6) Phone response is fairly poor as well. Example - going through my contacts by pressing keys (going from Q to R to S)...so very slow. You think the phone hasn't responded so you mash the button again, at which point it responds to TWO button presses and you have to start all over again.7) The Phone Tools application is a little user unfriendly and totally geared to people who mess around with Outlook CSVs on a daily basis. I've managed to get it to work, but not without some work.Alright, so now for the good.1) This phone is a veritable conversation piece. Oohs and ahhs all around...if you care about that sort of thing. I usually don't. I just want a functional phone that gets good battery life, gets a decent signal and can withstand a beating (I'm a klutz). But if you do care about the conversation-worthyness of your cell phone, this one has it in spades.2) Great battery power. I've had it on for 5 days at moderate usage and I've still got 2 bars left.3) This is a sturdy phone. My kid has already dropped it on cement twice and I've seen NO scratches at all. Maybe I'm lucky, as another reviewer mentioned that poor build quality on his piece. I've not had any issues. The phone is rock solid.4) The usual amount of ringtones and wallpapers....all of which are amazingly expensive. Why does it cost 2 bucks for a hi-fi ringtone lasting 20 seconds when I can buy the song at iTunes for a dollar?5) The PhoneTools software allows you to create your OWN ringtones. I haven't played around with the software yet, so I'm going to guess that your abilities to import MP3s or CD-audio will be truncated to some degree.6) Excellent Bluetooth performance. Haven't had the opportunity to test file transfers and such, but the RAZR's connection to my Moto BT headset is great. Doesn't matter which side of my body they are situated. Decent sound quality even at 20 feet of unobstructed space.7) Did I mention this phone is attractve?8) Ringtones can get quite loud, even without degrading ringtone sound quality. I wish the speaker was this loud.This phone has some serious shortcomings - most important among them is the poor performance of the Phonebook app, poor signal quality and low speaker volume. Ordinarily, I'd be bringing the phone back, like, tomorrow. But the design of the phone and its excellent BT performance makes me want to hang onto it.Hopefully, Moto learns from their mistakes and releases a RAZR V4 with better earpiece volume and snappier response times.
I took one start off, because I think that these headsets should be ~100 or less for what we are getting, and this one was the best deal that I could find! The plastic housing on the charger unit could be sturdier f they are going to charge consumers these prices for must haves items like this.That being said, this is my first day using it and I have a 12 hour conference call at work, so I may edit my review later. I am impressed so far. The setup was super easy. I plugged it into my VoIP phone and away I went! There was something in the description about &#34;USB,&#34; but this unit is hooks up to the phones headset port via a regular old telephone jacks input. There is not USB on this model. The company does make a USB model, but this is not it. I called Amazon to confirm that before I ordered it and the rep looked it up for me, he was very helpful.I am using the mute feature now, and I like how it beeps every so often to remind me that I am muted. I can go about my business here without the person on the other end hearing everything that I do, but I can still hear what is being said on the other end.Overall I would say if you are on the phone all day, or work from home like I do, get one!
I purchased this item a while back, but I remember that it was great item.  I would definitely recommend it. After 10 years, I still have ATT.
I have purchased 4 different Jabra headsets, because they are the most comfortable and easy to hear with, but they have poor microphone quality. I thought I would try this model, the MX150 Flexible Boom. Again, sound quality was crap. I make a living on the phone, so others being able to hear me is very important.I have ended up getting a Ge Tl26593 Earset Microphone by Jasco which has worked the best so far.
This is, by far, the BEST bluetooth headset I have ever owned. I've tried all the Motorola ones, and they pale in comparison to the Plantronics. You can see by all the positive reviews that this thing is amazing.  I can walk all over my house while my phone is in one spot, and talk without any interference.  The only problem is that I always forget where I put my phone!  The range on this headset is truly amazing.The sound quality is amazing as well.  No one can ever tell I'm on a headset. And once you start using this, you'll soon wonder how you ever lived without it. I can't tolerate holding a phone to my ear anymore because this headset makes life SO much easier.And I've had mine for over two years without any problems. I accidentally forgot I left it in my sweatshirt pocket and WASHED IT, and it still works!  I couldn't believe it.  Sure, the battery life suffers after years of use, but they're so cheap that it's no problem at all to get a new one.My only complaint is that the blue light on it is extraordinarily BRIGHT. I can't charge this thing at night without covering it up because it's like a blue lighthouse in my room.  And when it's on, the flashing blue light is VERY annoying in dark rooms (e.g. watching a movie).  That's really my only complaint.You really cannot go wrong on a bluetooth headset for such little money.  Don't even think twice! I've recommended this heaset to about 10 different people, who all LOVE it.
Works as advertised.  It's a tacky pad that is non-adhesive and keeps stuff from sliding around on the dashboard.  Problem with the iPhone (4S) is that the back is a flat panel of Gorilla Glass and does not lift easily off the Sticky Pad.  Instead, it tends to lift the Sticky Pad off the dashboard by sticking itself to the back of the iPhone.  I'm sure the problem would be solved by using an iPhone cover, but then if I did I wouldn't need the Sticky Pad at all.
This has to be one of the best headsets out there, I have used many and this unit has to be one to beat. No issues whatsoever, great quality and easy to use..
I have had my Motorola HS850 Bluetooth for about a week.  It replaces a Jabra BT250 which died.  While I find the Jabra to be more comfortable the HS850 is far more functional.  The compact folding design, the seamless integration with my Motorola V551 phone all make it superior to the BT250.  The Jabra wins only on comfort and richnes of tone.In the interest of honesty I must add that I worked for Motorola Computers Systems in the mid 80's.
The case is pretty good. It dose have some scratches on one side of the phone but its every little. Other then that i like it. Ive dropped my phone a few times since putting on the case and it didnt break or scratch. Ive gotten many complements on this case and over all it was worth the few bucks I spent.
Hope to use it soon.  My other one worked sometimes.  This one does not have the light on unless you are charging.
Love this type of headset.  I use one at work every day, so I got one for home too.  I hate things &#34;in&#34; my ear, so this quality over-the-head type keeps everything where it belongs and I can wear it for hours with no pain or irritation.  Comfortable and lightweight.  Doesn't even mess up hair.  It includes a leatherette &#34;cup&#34; for the ear speaker, but I usually don't even use it, finding it comfortable even without it.  It converts to an &#34;ear hook&#34; type also, but I don't find that very useful.  The inline volume control and mute is nice, although a bit large and heavy.  Great sound quality
This was my first clamshell phone, and I like that aspect of the phone, but that's about it.  It seems to have worse reception than my previous phones (all Nokia bar type) in the same coverage areas.  The biggest issue is definitely the battery.  I am NOT a heavy cell phone user so I like to just leave the phone in my car or gym bag and not worry about it for a couple days.  This phone will drain in 8 hours to 36 hours - with MINIMAL USAGE.  I don't know why it drains so quickly or with what seems to be random speeds, but it is extremely frustrating.  Also, I am not thrilled with the intuitiveness (or lack thereof) of the menus, but I am sure I would have become familiar with them in time.  I won't have a chance on this phone since I am looking to return mine ASAP.CONS:POOR Battery LifeWorse reception than previously owned phonesNot comfortable to holdPROS:Looks goodCompact
Does not fit the 4s so make sure you are ordering the right one.  You will need tools, so I suggest you get one with tools.
The only thing was that I wish the cable was like 5 ft longer. It doesn't exactly reach where I want it to go with out an extension.
If you don't have your own office and/or you have co-workers who have a tendency of indiscriminately interrupting, pointing to flashing lights will effortlessly embarrass them into not interrupting you when you are on the phone!  In my case I bought the light as a courtesy to my co-workers; I am the first one in the office to wear a headset and they were uncomfortable approaching me whenever I was wearing it.  Now there is no question whether I am on the phone or not.  Easy to install, plug into lifter and place for greatest visibility (cord is about 5 feet long, secure with screw or double stick "squares").
I bought it expecting it to be much better than the one I've had for almost two years now. Big disappointment. The static I used to get from the bt250 has not gone away especially when I have my phone in my left pocket of my pants and the headset on my right ear. Also, people tell me my voice sounds remote like I am in a room.This is not acceptable. I am going back to BestBuy to return it. Why pay $120 if there's no added value?!No doubt, it wraps around your ear very snug unlike the Motorola headsets but there's virtually no improvements compared to BT250.And let me guess - the next Jabra model would be BT500v for vibrate. I can tell you now - I ain't buying that one either.I guess it'll be a while before someone comes up with a headset that's not static-y but I'm willing to wait.Roumen.
i had heard so many good things about this headset and even tried on my co-workers before i bought it, but what i didn't test out was the reception/range. i have been using a logitech mobile freedom headset for almost a year now and love it, EXCEPT for the fit. it fits horribly.this is where the BT205 shines. it fits great. it doesn't hurt. i can wear it for hours. it seems to have a ton of talk time (at least 6 hours, i would say)...but the reception just plain sucks. i don't know if it's all the electrical devices running in my apartment, but damn, i can't get more than about 5 feet away from my phone before this unit starts to get all crackly on me. you almost have to have the phone 1) within about 6 feet of you and 2) have it on the same side of your body as the jabra. basically, count on walking around with your phone in your pocket.do heed jabra's warnings about the wireless home network interfering with this device! and your microwave. and your electric fans...and running water...they all make reception horrible. i think my problem might have been the wireless home network. but c'mon people, us geeks who use bluetooth headsets are the same geeks who have wireless home networks. duh.summary:pros:*lightweight*comfortable*got a good price on ebay ($42 shipped for new)*easy to usecons:*range, range, range! this is a huge one for me. if i have to keep my phone within 6 feet of me all the time, what's the point?*too costly at $80 for what you get*everything interferes with this unit. you might as well go sit in a room with nothing in it for good reception.needless to say, it's for sale on ebay!
It says it's compatible with all Motorola handsets...  It doesn't work at all with Motorola/Giant Talkabout FRS/GMRS/CB 2-way radios having 2.5mm jacks.  Very disappointing.
I tried two of these headsets and it was horrible for the person I was speaking to. Some heard the echo worse than the others, but all heard it. Some heard every word they said repeated back to them nearly as loud as my voice. Annoying to say the least and THANK YOU Amazon for being so amazing and taking both headsets back!
This is a vital accessory for all MP3 Players!  I love that it is retractable, so I don't have a long cable getting tangle with other things!  Great price for this as well!  $5.55 with free shipping!
I regret buying this phone, it's really big, and verizon service isn't that great with this phone.  For some reason other verizon phones have like 3 bars when mine has 1, or will have 1 bar when i'm getting no service.  That said, the phone does have a beautiful inner LCD, the outer LCD is pretty bad.  You can play with the settings. It has loads of features like alarms and calanders and everything else you could think of.  The camera is terrible, which is pretty much true with all cell phones though, so that's a non unique gripe. The phone is also moderately fruity, like when you make or recieve calls, the outer LED will start blinking purple, blue, pink etc and it makes you look like a teenage girl, and the menus are all kind of childish.  That said, when the phone does have some bars, calls never drop and it's pretty easy to set up the phone.  I'm not sure what other options there are out there for verizon cell phones, i recently switched from tmobile, but im sure you can do better than this phone, good luck.
Want to try one? They sell these at the dollar stores. It does nothing to improve your signal.
For the money, this is a great item and a must have for mobile road warriors. I am using the iGo keyboard with a Blackberry Curve (8300).Like others have said, there is a nasty sticker that covers both the outside cover and the keys that may never completely come off. When peeling it off the keys, it feels like the keys will rip off their fragile posts.Also, as is common with Bluetooth, getting the two devices to communicate with one another can be tricky. I haven't used it a lot yet, so maybe I haven't figured out the right combination of button presses. But I hate when things don't simply "work."The keyboard is fairly solid and certainly easy to type on, especially if you're accustomed to typing on a laptop. The keys are marked with several shortcut functions to launch tasks or apps.This is a great item for anyone who wants a lightweight substitute for traveling with a laptop. While sitting in a hotel room checking e-mail, this is all you need.
I started out with the sidekick color switched for a short time to the Blackberry 7100t and then came back to the sidekick II. I So love this phone. There is no other phone on the market that compares in many areas.Pro's -Super easy to use.Best messaging out therebest screen out therecrazy good data servicegood downloads for ringtones, games and appsGreat signal (I was in rural Kentucky and still got a signal)Very reliableBest Data/Voice plan with T-mobile -- I have been with T-mobile for 5 years or so and have tried other services during that time. No other service has provided any better phone, signal, or features for a lower or even a competitive price.Con'sIn order for service to remain good you have to periodically reset the phone. Dont know why, but when I do that it fixes any reception problems. T-Mobile techs said this was a good idea.That's it everything else is normal and great about this phone.Unless you need corporate email dont bother with the blackberry. It was the worst phone I have ever used.
I had to pop open my Samsung Galaxy S3 to fix it up but none of the tools I had worked or fit. These worked perfectly and fit the screws and took it apart with ease. Compact and easy to carry around.It arrived on time and in good shape. Thanks!
Small little charger, works as advertised, I've used it daily for 6 months with no problems.  Just what I've come to expect from Boxwave.  Glad I bought it.
It worked great for the first couple of weeks then it just stopped completely.. so basically a small waste of money.
I have owned four Bluetooth headsets. This is by far the most comfortable and easiest to use. I have no problems with sore ears as with my other models (Motorola, Jabra BT350 and BT800) and sometimes forget that I am wearing it. Good sound quality, fits well, stays on no matter what. The perfect headset!
It worked fine for a few days then I had to change to cord........The charger itself working fine up to this point..........Rather than send it back I bought another cord from sprint for $19.00
Can't go wrong for under $25. I bought this when it was $40 and I've been very happy. I replaced my Jabra headset after I lost it. I think this is actually more comfortable. I've never had any of the issues described here. It's seems to be very clear and nobody on the other end has ever complained about not being able to understand me. Maybe I just talk louder than everyone else. :)
I was very pleased with this item when I got it back so quickly because it was a gift. However, I cannot give a 5 star rating for a product that never worked.
Great for the price.  Sound quality is not what it should be, I think, but my kids love it.  I like the idea and am going to buy one for my car, but a different brand to see if there is a difference in sound.
It is not leather, and its smell is atrocious. However, if you're okay with leatherette, it does have some nice pockets inside and it's relatively thin/lightweight.I'd avoid this seller though (BoxWave Corp). Shipping is $5 and you will pay to return the item to them. For me, it was a total waste of money as the shipping costs alone are likely far more than the product is worth. I paid $30 for the case, $5 for shipping to me. I'll be sending it flat rate back. Bear Mountain cases are better, real leather, and cost less (about $20 for the iPad Mini).
If you have a case that's thick around the ports, this is the solution the nice thin connectors, work with bigger cases. Love that it retracts, people ask all the time where i got it.
Great case fit my samsung galaxy s2 great will order again fast shipping it make my phone look super sexy trust me you need to order 1.
This is the same charger that came with the RAZR V3 phone.  light, compact, charges the phone.
Solid bluetooth headset, particularly considering the price. I like the fact that it rests lightly against your ear, rather than inside. It's extremely lightweightSolid bluetooth headset, particularly considering the price. I like the fact that it rests lightly against your ear, rather than inside. It's extremely lightweight and can be worn for hours on end without discomfort. I've only had this for a few days, but so far the battery life seems great as well.
The S5 is a fantastic phone. However because of its large screen the phone dies quickly. With the extended battery I am able to enjoy all of the phones features without losing power. Great buy.
It worked good for a few months.  Gradually, it began loosing its quality. People have trouble hearing now.  I am also getting "static" and cannot use very much.  Works a little better in my cell phone than Skype.  Overall, I do not reccommend it.
i ordered this to replace my iphone battery, i am a deployed soldier and now i have become the cell phone technition
Watch-out, all these positive reviews are fake. Some have even reviewed it twice using the same name. What a sleazy way to sell an item.
I searched online for a case for my new Samsung Galaxy Note II, and decided on this product with it's cool design. It has provided sufficient protection and I especially like the grip-ability on the sides.
Nice, looks with good & durable quality & price wise as well. Really works as described...for my samsung note 2. I do buy accessories online now...more way cheaper & find it no difference from what's on the store which are very expensive.
Though I`m not a expert in cell phone chargers. This thing works good, but its not all fireworks and hotel parties. Its a charger and it works so I guess buy it.
I bought this phone because of its sleek and stylish design. PROS and CONS:CONS: 1. The phone feels fragile and gets smudged easily. I find myself wiping off oils and finger prints constantly. Due to it's price, I would recommend purchasing the extra warranty on the phone from Cingular due to the risk of damaging the phone. 2. I find that in speakerphone mode, the call is almost inaudible while driving on the highway. I wish it could be louder. 3. The menu is complicated. The contacts must be entered as one entry, which is annoying if you have more than one phone number for a contact. 4. The phone doesn't have a setting to disable the roaming function. 5. The phone makes a buzzing sound near electronic devices (TV, computer, radio, etc.).PROS: 1. I have a bluetooth enabled PDA and I can transfer pictures from the PDA to the phone (and vice versa). Perfect for sharing photos or using graphics for wallpaper or picture caller ID 2. Battery life is long. 3. Video function is not that great, but is nice. 4. Audio is also better than a Sanyo 8200. 5. The phone doesn't feel heavy inside the chest pocket. All in all, not a bad phone. This phone is high maintenance and I don't recommend it to someone who have no patience for it's complex menus or minor shortcomings.
IMHO this is slightly better than the Moto H700.  It's larger, and a bit heavier.  The boom is larger.  But if that's not an issue, then both are equal IMHO.  Both have the cheek problem!Now for the problem where people cannot hear you, or you sound muffled or away from the phone.  Wearing your bluetooth, look in the mirror and see how the boom touches your cheek or if you have a beard it'll touch that.  Note there is a very small hole on the inside of the boom that gets the sound.  Now anything that touches that will impede your voice....it's like putting a towel over a regular phone and talking to someone. Not you do not need puffy cheeks for this problem to happen.  Unless you have a very narrow face, chances are this will happen to you and you'll blame it on the bluetooth!TO fix this, get either Neoprene tubing or that sticky foam on one end (mole skin) and cut a small piece and put on the hinge near the boom then a smaller piece (if needed) on top of the other.  This will make a space between your cheek and the boom so people can hear you! With this fix, you will still be able to close your boom.
They look cheap but work great. I took these on a trip to China and had no problems at all.
Bought this for a trip to Europe (Netherlands) and it worked perfectly without any kinks. I am quite pleased with my purchase.
I've bough a munch of different things like this over the years. Most wouldn't stay in the jack, or would give out after a few days. This one is GREAT!
The people I talk to while using this earpiece can't even tell I am on a Bluetooth. No windnoise or static. A little big, but you have to sacrifice something in order to get good sound.
These have great sound and my voice is clear to other parties. The volume switch and mute slider work well and it has lasted for some time.
It works pretty good and I can walk away from my phone and it is still clear. It does become a bit uncomfortable on the ear with long periods of wear.
I have a Samsung D807.It's a piece of cake to set up.  It's very comfortable.  I think it looks cooler than those other ones that look humongous in your ear.  So far, no one is able to tell when I'm using it or when I'm talking into the phone.My wife and I have the same phone/headsets, and we've used them together without any interference.
Set it up, it worked great for a little over 24 hours and the base unit failed to connect to my laptop. Returned and purchased a different item. Didn't want to take the business risk of replacing with the same thing.  Can't afford to be offline for as long as it will take to get this replaced.To be fair, I have used several Plantronics headsets and they were all great... my all time favorite is now 10+ years old and not compatible with Google Voice (though it does work great with Cisco IP phone). I also have a bluetooth Plantronics Voyager headset for my iPhone and it is also very good.
I origanally purchased this phone thinking it had voice dialing similar to the motorola v710. Unfortunately is uses the old style of voice dial where you have to train your voice for each phonebook entry. The v710 does not require this and utilizes true speech recognition software. Since this was the most important feature to me I am returning the razr and exchanging it for the v710. To bad, the razr is superior in most other categories except the one most importand to me. If it had true nex technology voice recogition I would keep it.
I like how long the cord is with this changer so that I'm able to reach the night stand and table from where I plug it in at.  However, I'm not a fan of how long it seems to take to charge to full charge, nor how it atomically &#34;stops&#34; charging at certain times on it's own.
These tools gets the job done. Had no problem I was able to finish less than a hour going to also buy two more for my friends. great deal and quality product quick and fast Thanks!!
I bought this headset for probably the same reason most people did, the price. For 30 bucks and from a reliable company you can't go wrong. I got what I paid for. The sound quality and the mic quality are both decent, enough at least for someone who isn't obsessive about how crystal clear the reception is. It has a tendency to drop the connection sometimes for no apparent reason, annoying at times, but not very common.About a month after use, it stopped working for no explicit reason. I sent it back and got a replacement from Motorola. However only a month or so after that, I seemed to have misplaced it, and had pretty much thought it was lost.Today, about a month and a half later, I found it, in my dryer. Apparently it had been in the pocket of one of my jeans that I hadn't washed for a while and it went through a whole wash and dry cycle. Happy that I found it, but I all but gave up on it to work again. I gave it a shot anyway, and lo and behold, it did start charging. So after an hour I tried pairing it with my phone, and voila, IT STILL WORKS! I was stunned. Not only that a bluetooth headset could go through that abuse and still function like new, but a headset that seems relatively cheap and outdated!So based on my first experience it was a 2, but any piece of electronic equipment that can survive a wash and dry HAS to get two more stars in my book. Reliable, and saved me from shelling out more money for a more expensive replacement. It gets the job done.
I had Jabra when it first came out, its battery stopped charging after 10 months. So I got this one as a replacement, it too stopped charging after a year. This is the problem with all BT earpieces, its battery is not replaceable which can be done if the industry wants to. They make more money by selling the whole unit vs we pay 5-10 dollars to replace battery. This kind of practice is not sustainable. I'm now back to the wired headset.
Sucks.... I want even keep this one. First it use a non usb charger and its too big and bulk this needs to put in the trashed and buried on another planet.
As someone who used the original Palm Pilot and eventually the Handspring Visor with Visor phone, I thought off and on about buying the Treo 650. The very mixed, sometimes extreme, reviews of the 650 and the relatively high price for an unlocked Treo kept me away. With the release of the next generation of Treos drmatically forcing down the price of the 650 I decided to take a chance. After a week of fairly active use I have to say that I am extremely pleased with my new Treo. I bought my new unlocked (Cingular branded) Treo online. The phone clarity is as good as any mobile phone that I have owned. I have not had any dropped calls. The browswer and e-mail client that came loaded on my Treo work well. I live in a country where the fastest mobile data connection is still GPRS/EDGE, so my Tro 650 is just right. I easily synced my Treo with my MacBook with no problems. Over all for $225 + shipping and handling of $20 I have to say that this was a real bargain.
It does what it needs to do, very pleased. I bought some other cheap lame one and will never go back.
Update 11/11/2008My wife's died about two weeks ago. I emailed the company explaining I bought it from Amazon and mentioned it is within the warranty period. I did not hear anything for about a week, and then, a replacement appeared at my house, sent via express mail. It is a refurb, but that is their condition, and it looks and works perfectly. Awesome customer service. Just one more reason to get this product!I have used this for a month, and I love it. I have been searching for a decent bluetooth headset, and after using it for about a month, I can tell you it is great. The sound is very good and clear. I have no complaints from anyone I speak with, and usually they don't even know I am using a headset. There are only two negatives, and they really are not that bad. First, turning it on and off is not easy. That is not really a bad thing, but it is a little awkward. My second complaint would take off half a star, and that is, my usb car charger cannot work with it, and I had to buy a seperate charger. It is much easier to answer and hang up, when compared to others I have used. It is VERY comfortable, and I sometimes forget that I am wearing it., as witnessed by my wife who often reminds me tha tI am still wearing it. I bought this because my wife's set died and she needed a new one. Ehem, it seems that I somehow ended up with this one and she got my old piece of &$#%(@ (insert your guess of brand here) because she was used to it. Well, she now has her own and loves it as well, though she also complains about the on/off button. I should also note that my Verizon Razor, which often would not recognize the Verizon blue tooth headset I had, has no problem QUICKLY hooking up with this headset. I really love it and would recommend it to anyone. Lastly, the battery life is very good.
The A630 is another ground-breaking handset design from Motorola.  It showcases the ingenuity of American engineering when you see the QWERTY keyboard hidden underneath on this lightweight (4 oz.) cell phone.  It's stylish, too, and has great reception -- that is, where T-Mobile has coverage at all.  Compared to the Sidekick II and many other T-Mobile phones, the A630 has the best signal-keeping capability, but T-Mobile just sucks big time, unless you live right next to one of their sporadic cell towers.  Worse, their GPRS (data) network is slow and congested.  While surfing the web on the A630 is really cool when the network is accessible, for most part of the day the network is slow and often inaccessible.  We really need the govt to step in and mandate that these cell companies upgrade their networks first before charging consumers an arm and a leg for data services.
The newer Voyager Pro is much, much better but this was a good bluetooth device in it's day. Not as tough as I would have liked though.
I wasn't sure if I wanted to purchase another bluetooth headset because the last one I purchased, a Motorola HS815, was terrible.  People were saying that they couldn't hear me or that there was too much static.  I figured it would be the same thing next time.  Boy was I wrong.  This headset is terrific.  I will give you some pros and cons:Pros:ClarityEase of UseBattery LifeVery Comfortable to wearDoes Not Fall OffThe only con is, I sometimes have difficulty intially putting it on becasue I wear glasses.  I occassionally have to use two hands to put it on my ear correctly.I would definitely recommend this item.
I had the Samsung V205 and then I decided to try the E715 out. FYI to people with battery problems, with these kind of batteries, you must let it drain completely and then charge it.. kind of like building up your battery life and doing this a few times, it will improve your battery life immensely. I've been a T-Mobile customer for a while now and I stay with them because: 1) They are now no. 1 in customer service, 2) Great rate plans, 3) It works great where I need it the most!Now the additional features that the V205 didn't have that this little gadget has is:1) Caller ID pics.. although you won't be able to see it on the external display, when you flip it open, you'll see that person's face.2) The camera now has a flash as well as a zoom. And with that, it is able to take pictures in gray (black and white), negative, sepia, and sketch. Also, you can do multi-shot with this as well as put lots of different kind of frames to your pictures.3)You can download games with the E715 whereas you cannot do so with the v205. Furthermore, the games are actually java with E7154) The flash can also serve as a flashlight. Which is quite useful sometimes when you don't know where you're walking and the light is pretty bright.5) Voice memo.. nuf saidOtherwise, it has the usual features. It has an alarm, calculator, calendar, to do list, MMS, SMS, you can download ringtones (which is a big help since some of the ringtones sound pretty crappy), as well as games and pictures. Pretty much all the usual stuff is in this phone.. except you won't find bluetooth on this.Another thing is that the external display is like a blue-green thing against a black background.. which is pretty cool since you won't have to press a button just to see the time... it's always lit up so you can see it well. Also, the pictures that you can take by lookin at the external display will be a bluish-green color but when it's saved, and you look at it, it's in full color so no worries there.Overall, I have enjoyed this phone and no problems with it really. Another great thing is that it doesn't have an annoying external antenna to get in the way so it's a good buy.
I can have this plugged in from Atlanta to Greensboro and the phone isn't much more charged than when I started.  But the phone doesn't die, either.
It is good, and look so cute. I like it. It is cheap than when i saw in a store.
The iGo Stowaway Ultra-Slim Bluetooth Keyboard is truly portable.  Running on two AA batteries, you can easily carry spares around.  Only gripe about this product is that it lacks a dedicated number row (for 1 to 0).  Else, it would be perfect.
It's shiny which is pretty but that makes it a fingerprint magnet. Its just okay. I buy a lot of cases for my phones because I like to switch them out a lot. This one is nice for the times when you want a dressier case. For everyday I think I will stick with real leather cases from Zenus. They cost a lot more but they they wear well too IF you buy their real leather cases. The case cover creases if you accidentally run your fingernail along it. It's permanent crease. Its bulky so it protects but makes the phone too big. I used to love BoxWave, but this one is a little disappointing.  Why buy a cheap case for your $650 phone.
I use this charger with my GS2 from Straight Talk.  This charger is working as expected, charges the phone fine and seems like a quality product, not flimsy and cheap feeling like some chargers I have ordered in the past.
The price was good and the cable works great. It seems to be well made. There isn't much else to say about this product.
The only thing that I can add to the hundreds of reviews already posted here is my own experiences (we ordered 2 of these).Positives:- No earbud going into the ear - this is a BIG positive because I can't stand those and, apparently they are not good for you.- Quick charging.- Easy to pair - in my case with a Razr and a Blackberry.- Easy to turn on/off, by simply folding/unfolding the microphone boom.- Pretty good instructions.Negatives:- My wife complains that the sound quality is not always perfect.- Being as small as it is, perhaps some carrying pouch should have been included.- The charging interface is not a mini-USB but some weird, proprietary plug.- If there is a way to attach this to the left ear, I am not aware of it.At this time, my wife decided to keep hers but she will give the second one to her girlfriend as a birthday present :)
This was the best Bluetooth I have owned because of performance and more importantly the fit. It was very comfortable on my ear and inside the ear, and I could keep it on for hours and not even remember it was there. Sound quality and features are excellent and worked as advertised. I have used with various phones. I used it every day for about 2 years until it started to break at the hinge. I used to just stuff it in my purse without a special case or protection, so I am not surprised it finally gave in. I see this product being sold for a lot of $$$ now, but I don't think I paid more than $40 for it. So it was a great deal and a great value. If I see it on sale again, I would buy it.
Because I spent a lot of time on the phone, I am very particular about BT headsets.  I have tried every brand of BT headset you can imagine, I mean EVERY brand.  I was so frustrated to a point I was ready to go back to wired headset until I ran into this little guy.  This is by far the best one, hands down.  My most miserable experence was with Jabra and Motorola.  I had a lot of connection and audio quality issues with those brands.BT headset designers seem to favor visual appeal rather than performance.  I don't understand by most headsets on the market are short and stubby, in which the microphone is right next to your ear instead of your month.  Having microphone that far away results in having to turn up the microphone sensitivity, which cause the headset to pick up everything including background noise.  Lack of an effective noise-filtering system such as the one in this Logitech headset, you end up with wind noise, car noise, AC noise, every kind of noise but your voice.  In additional, the close promixity between the speak and microphone creates a feedback loop for a nice serving of constant echoing.  I lost count of the occasions when my friends and coworkers on the other end of the phone tell me to "get off your crappy Jabra BT headset" or "take me off your Motorola BT headset".  I am amazed that people on the other end can easily tell it's a Jabra BT headset because the horrid sound quality.Onto this gem, the sound quality is amazing, by far the best of the bunch.  The WindStop system really does work.  Together with the farther extending microphone, this unit produce the best sound both incoming and outgoing.  I know many users complaining about the fit, but it's really a fault of the user.  As one reviewer pointed out, there is a "correct" way to wear this, and I think it provides an excellent fit and comfort.I can't speak for all, but I personally don't wear a BT headset as a fashion statement.  I use it as a mean for convenience and safety, so sound quality and fit are top factors for my consideration.  On that note, this is a clear winner.  I wish product managers and designers at Motorola and particularly Jabra take note of that.  Jabra (250 and 250v models) being the worst with it's behind the ear design and a heavy-trigger button is really a very lousy product in terms of usability and sound quality.  I am sure customers that raved about Jabra would rank this unit out of this world!
i had bought the motorola HS820 before this one for $80. i have a motorola V505 from at&t.; the motorola worked pretty well, but i thought $80 for a bluetooth headset was way too much. i returned the motorola and picked up the logitech instead and for 1/2 the cost, i was just as happy.it fits a little awkwardly on my ear, but so did the motorola, so i am thinking my ears are the problem. call clarity and voice recognition is good. battery life is good. weight on ear is good. overall, i am pretty impressed!i wish there was some way to adjust the tightness of the earpiece as it feels kind of loose on my ear. would also be nice if the "on" button wasn't so small that you covered it up with your finger when you turned it on, making it hard to see the flashing blue light.whenever i use my microwave, it makes the bluetooth connection drop. just warning ya'. ;)
Nice looking case.  Very inexpensive and seems to fit very well.  Excellent value and it feels good in hand.  A little softer than I like and therefore most likely prone to losing it's shape/tightness over time.
It has a lot of what I need to do basic repairs on a phone but it is bare bones.
I received this item in Dec. Been using it since then. Wanted to make sure I liked it and it did its job. It is light weight and does not add any bulk to the phone while protecting it. Well worth the money. I am thinking of ordering a few more of these in different colors. :-)
I bought this to protect from scratches, from accidental dropping and to make my pocket not heavy.. This cover has proved satisfactory in all respects: I dropped the phone a few times already and thing happened. After using the phone for 9 months, it still shines line new - not a single scratch. It is very easy to put on and off. There are 2 minor issues with this:a) You need to take extra care when you plug on the charger, to make sure the phone charges - the leather cover comes in the way of the charger - after a few accidental "battery dying out", I learned to connect it properly to get a full charge.b) The elastic band/top cover comes in the way of the camera - so for taking pictures, I remove the top sleeve.c) Inspite of all the positive feedback, I still feel it makes the phone bulky, but the belt clip is very tough, and I don't mind the extra bulk to act like a cowboy.
I've went through 3 of these bluetooth headsets in 5 years. When I got my first one it was extremely cheaper than offered now. The only reason I had to get my second one was because my dog chewed it up, then I backed over my second one with my car in the driveway, so I bought the third. Thinking I was still getthing the exact same quality as before I wanted to stick with what I knew. I connected it to multiple bt compatible devices with ease... PS3, iPod Touch, iPhone, Blackberry, etc. All three times I purchased this product it ran no more than $30, but since they've redesigned it the quality has gone down & the price has increased to what you see now. I especially liked the fact that it had three different ear buds to accustom its users, but the part that went around the ear became annoying at times. Pending on what you're doing cut I'd be cleanin & sweating & it wouldn't hold firm. Same thing if I walked outside (Note that I'm in Tx,so it's very humid) the ear piece would come out. Btw, my third one is getting trashed because people can no longer hear me clearly and I only had this one for about 4 months. If you know better than this product stick with it because my 3 star rating is for the 4 years I had the previous version & not this new, redesigned, $126 version. You could absolutely do better elsewhere.Oh yea, after a while of frequent use, it began to split. I may try to show you guys a picture because with Platonics this design is known to do that. Lesson learned...
I had it over 3 years and it was working great. Battery lasts very long. Phone is very durable and solid.
I owned one of these for about three months, then it started to fall apart.  It was $30 at Best Buy.  I haven't replaced it, as $30 is a *lot*.$10?  I'm buying two more.  I can be moving 20 mph on my bicycle, talking to someone, with no problems.  It has far better sound quality than my 'backup', which is a Jabra with no boom.  The ear volume is adjustable on my phone, and I'm wondering what phones other reviewers have that won't let them adjust the volume?
I purchased this charger to use with my Motorola Razr.  I already had one that is essentially identical, except my old phone (Motorola V5510 has a different sytle adapter than the Razr, which uses a 'mini-USB'.This product is inexpensive, does exactly what it says, which is charges the phone in a car using the auto's power/cigarette outlet, and it comes with a cute little Motorola 'M' insignia which lights up bloue during use.  At such a low price - I paid less than $9 on AMAZON - there's really no reason to buy a non-OEM charger.
I purchased this battery to replace a water soaked one in an iPhone 4. I don't even know if it is charging or not as the unit won't turn on for me. The shipping is prompt, the packaging great, and the description is accurate.
The Plantronics 510 is comfortable to wear for hours and doesn't feel like it will fall off your ear.  It mates easily to my Treo 650 and also to my Bluetooth-enable laptop, which makes it possible to use the laptop for VoIP calls.  Reception is good, volume is adequate and the people I talk with say that my voice is clear.  The controls are a bit stiff, as others have said.  But that means they have good tactile feedback -- you know when you've pressed a button.One marginal shortcoming: the 510's clarity isn't good enough for it to replace the wired Plantronics USB headset I use for dictating to Dragon Systems "Naturally Speaking" voice recognition software on the laptop.  But that would be a stretch for any wireless headset.Prices vary widely; shop around.
Its a charger and it works as advertised. It also cam in the mail pretty quickly so I am satasfied with that as well.
it's a charger for dirt cheap and the shipping wasn't more than the item. I wish they had the batteries i needed as well for my phone. but great all an all
Ordered from OEM and it arrived quickly, within a couple of days.  I would recommend this company to others and would use it again myself.I have found all ear pieces to be somewhat uncomfortable for prolonged use.  This USB earpiece works better than the blue tooth that I had --- the reception is clear and very loud (much better than the cell phone itself of the previous blue tooth) on the other end, the people that I've called said it was loud and clear.
not sure what issue is here.  but I put one in my wifes BMW 335 Ci convertible and it makes a horrible background noise.  That was not there before.I put in my Buick Enclave and it works flawlessly.Not sure where the interference is coming from.
I picked up this headset the other day and I'm relatively pleased with it. Despite a few bad reviews, the sound quality is acceptable for making telephone calls and dicatation, though the sampling rate is obviously too low to listen to music with it. I easily paired it with a Sony-Ericsson t68i and my 15" Powerbook running Mac OS X 10.3.8.My quick testing with iChat AV was positive and it seems quite usable for use with an iSight for the voice portion of a call. I also was able to set the sound output to the headset and am currently listening to some music with it, but the low sample rate and the fact that it isn't in stereo makes this only a novelty. Nevertheless, it is still useful when a real pair of headphones are not available.The range, as mentioned in other reviews, isn't amazing, but was sufficient to move about an average-sized room and worked intermittently through a cinder block wall.It fit fairly comfortably on my ear and seems to easily hide, though is a bit cumbersome to put on at first. The multiple earpieces are also a plus. The dual charger/belt clip is an interesting idea, but seems to be poorly executed. It seems somewhat unstable, so I'm not sure I'd actually keep it on my belt. However, it might not be bad for riding around clipped to something inside of my backpack.All in all, it's not a bad device, though there is certainly some room for improvement. I'd probably buy it again, having used it for a little while.
Bought as gift for my relative and he loves it.....Great job...Would highly recommend this product to all customers.Thank you
Not pleased with the first cover she ordered for her Samsung Galaxy Note 2, my wife is loving this one by BoxWave.  She loves the compartments for her ID, credit card, and money.  The fit is good, no problems taking pictures or talking.  She likes the carrying strap as well, and the case's flexibility.
Do not remember, probably changed phones and may find it in a draw one day. I am sure it came and everything was o.k.
Searched for "droid 3 chargers" when making my purchase. This was the first product to pop up, had decent reviews, and was cheap. I purchased 3. The product arrived on time. HOWEVER this product does NOT fit our droid 3 phones. I contacted customer service over the course of 9 times. No results in replacement, return or refund. Contactd by phone and w/in the first 2 min of the convo the F-bomb was dropped twice. Very offensive and unprofessional. Needles to say, I have 3 chargers that dont fit any of my phones. Anyone wanna trade?
This is a regular case, fit, I believe it's not pretty at all but neither bulky and the protection it's intermediate .
These were really inexpensive and they work just like I wanted them to.There have been no problems so far
These did not work since the day I got them.The right earbud never had sound.I got a replacement, and it's the same situation.I am not sure if it's because I'm using a Nokia E71x, but they both don't work properly.
it works great i like i can charge two thing at the same now i dont have to wait for my to finish charging her phone
I have to say, this was a shockingly good experience. I have had mine almost a year when I lost it. I found it the following afternoon, in the parking lot at work. It spent a day and a night on the ground in the rain and even got either stepped on or driven over, as the earhook was broken off. The unit still worked! It would wedge into my ear and I could still use it very easily-albeit uncomfortably. Why not 5 stars? Because the ear hook pivot/swivel loosened with use to point where it would fall out of my ear. I replaced with a 350 due to budget, I wanted to get a 655 but we'll see how this does.
I don't know if it's just me, but every time I buy a blue-tooth it's only great for a couple of months. Read the reviews and was excited but slowly performance diminished.
I got two of these, one for the car and one for home use.  There both work just fine, could be a little longer but works for must of my needs
The Voyager 510 is my first experience with a Bluetooth headset. Been using it the last couple of months; ever since California instituted its "Hands-Free" law on July 1, 2008.Has been working pretty well overall. Fits reasonably well to my ears. Can be fitted on either ear with the swivel action.A minor complaint would be that the sound quality could be a little better. But not bad though.Hard to go wrong with this choice.
The Treo 650 is a great device.  It combines cellular phone, PDA, and wireless functionality, allowing you to check e-mail, surf the web, make phone calls, and keep your contacts and calendar.Be sure to buy an aftermarket USB cable, which will allow you to charge and sync your treo 650 at the same time and a headset adaptor.By downloading a few aftermarket applications (do a search on google), you can make it play internet radio, play MP3's from a 1GB SD card, play some great games, and even use it to access the internet from your laptop while on the road.  Here's what I use:1.  Directory Assistant (by Rick Whitt)-  This program allows you to easily look up and dial busines and residential telephone numbers and get driving directions and maps, without waiting as various web pages load.  I know it sounds like a silly app, and I thought so too, but I now use it all the time to avoid dialing 411 and paying $1.25 per call.  Best of all, its free (but you can and should make a donation).2.  Atom Smash by Red Mercury Software- a great arkanoid style game.3.  BackupBuddy VFS by Blue Nomad - back up the apps on your Treo.4.  Blocks by Electron Hut  - free Tetris Clone5.  ChitChat Lite - a free MSN Messenger client6.  Froggy by Tim Smith - Frogger clone.7.  Galax by Tim Smith - Galaxian clone.8,  PacMan by Horaco Ho - Duh.9.  Pocket Tunes by NormSoft - great MP3 and internet radio player.  Much better control over the audio than the included real player (which only plays MP3s, not internet radio).10.  PDANet by June Fabrics - Allows you to connect your laptop to your Treo and use the internet.  Works great.11.  FileZ by Nosleep software - your basic file manager for the Palm OS.12.  Voice Dial - download - dial calls using the sound of your voice.  Free to say numbers, but must buy to dial by name.13.  Pocket DVD Studio - allows you to compress DVD movies so that they can fit on a SD Card, making your Treo a movie player.
I've previously owned a multitude of headsets, but let me tell you I was missing out until I bought a Jabra.I always thought the "in the ear" bud and bulky-looking design would be uncomfortable, but it was not.  Frankly it is the the most comfortable headset I have ever worn, and I've worn dozens.  I truly forget it is on my head.As for sound quality, everything I hear is clear, with ample volume available.  People I speak to report equally clear sound without much, if any background noise.Battery life is great and range is sufficient for me to put my smartphone on the cradle and walk around the house or the office without any signal loss or crackling.Something else I liked was the belt clip.  So many headsets overlook the fact that you have nowhere to put your earpiece when you're not using it.  The belt clip is small, just big enough to actually hold the headset, and tucks in right behind the clip for my phone.If you're not a clip-loving person, the whole headset has an almost flat profile so it fits nicely in a pocket.  Other headsets, especially those with flip-out mics feel awfully bulbous in a pocket.One last little "Gee Whiz" feature- the vibro-alert.  Since I want my phone on the charge/sync cradle whenever possible, this feature really excites me.  Instead of being required to actually wear the headset at all times to avoid missing a call when the phone is in the other room, this headset has a vibrate feature to notify me of an incoming call.  I call this a "gee whiz" feature because I never knew I needed it until I had it!In summary, there are an awful lot of headsets out there.  All of the designs and features can be confusing, but you can rest assured knowing that this headset has everything you need (and some things you may not!) and does so at a very reasonable price.
I bought these to replace my LG headset which kept dropping audio during phone calls.  The sound quality is very good.  It has a longer range than the LG. Overall very pleased.  The software that runs the headset is not as advanced as the LG, it doesn't announce the battery level and it can only be connected to one device at a time.  When it announces it is connected, if two of your devices have bluetooth on at the same time, you don't know which one it is connected to because it does not identify the unit it is connected to.Overall, though, I like them a lot.  The sound quality is very important to me and I wear them a lot when I am listening to programs on netflix and for my day-to-day phone use.
i feel like i can never have enough of these especially since i lose this cord easily and a lot of people have the same charger so it's good for visitors and whole family.
This is a great case for the Note 2.  I had been undecided about whether to use a cover such as this or a belt holster as I've always used.  I wound up ordering both, this and a REIKO case.  They both work good separately, but not together.  If you try to use both, it is almost impossible to remove the Note 2 from the REIKO as it becomes stuck due to the tight fit.  I decided to use the BoxWave exclusively and have not been dissatisified with my decision.  I simply slide the Note 2 into my front pocket.  And no, the phone isn't too big for my pants pocket.The pros for this case is that it makes the Note 2 look stylish, and due to the rubbery feel, it makes the phone feel quite stable in my hand; however, the rubbery feel doesn't interfere with it going in and out of my pocket.  If I had to come up with a con for the BoxWave Tuxedo Suitup case, it would be that due to its glossiness, it shows fingerprints,  However, they wipe off easily.In summary, I would definitely order one of these cases again.
well, its a easy product, but it is just I hope buy, it arrive on time and the way I waiting but it hurt my ear
much slimmer than I thought and it ads 125% battery. I am charged for the full day with this case.
It's a nice-looking product. It seems like I would have liked it. But...My unit had an electrical problem. I connected two portable external hard drives, one powered external hard drive, a printer, an external DVD+-RW drive, a mouse and a keyboard. Then I plugged it in.First I noticed my mouse didn't work. So I unplugged it and plugged in another one. "That's strange, that one doesn't work either," I thought. "Hmmm, and what's that smell?"  Turns out, that smell was a hard drive frying.  Once I figured that out I unplugged everything and waited.After a few hours, when I figured everything would have cooled down, I started testing my devices.  One portable external drive still "sort of" works. I can see most of the file structure but copying attempts fail. The powered external hard drive mostly worked for a couple days and then quit. One portable hard drive never worked again. The optical drive still works, occasionally, but typically won't boot. Occasionally the printer works. The mice never worked again. And the keyboard was fine.  Everything's been tested on 3 different PC systems and 1 Linux system.The worst part? Those were my redundant data storage. I lost everything.
I get significant transmission static with this headset with my I-mate Sp3i unless I point the phone directly at the headset from a few feed away. It has static if I put the phone in my shirt pocket! Since I haven't done a baseline test of the phone with other bluetooth headsets, I can't say if it is the headset or the phone, but either way, if you buy one of these and have the same problem, make sure and return it within the return period.Another problem is the plastic ear holder (the part that holds the headset to your ear). This is a bad design and honestly, there is no way to get this thing to properly and confortably fit my ear. The only way to wear it is to have half your ear lobe hanging out, which result in a lot of pain within 10min or so. Avoid this headset if you want wear a headset for extended periods of time.A final note: The wind blocking technology works well, but at the expense of a high quality sound transmission to your recipent. I've asked a few of my techno-geek-friends when I'm talking to them with the headset, and they all say that the sound quality seems to be missing a full dynamic range.Good luck!
BT250 and this newer BT250v are pure junk.  The sound quality on these two units are horrid, there are no other ways to describe it.  My friends and coworkers can identify these units remotely and asked that I do not speak to them using the BT250 or BT250v.  The microphone is sooooo sensitive and un-tuned, it is particularly unusable in cars or while walking.  The road noise or wind noise will over saturate your voice.  Even under ideal quiet surrounding, normal speech will come out muddy and weak.  The battery life also shortens significantly during the  1 year warranty with moderate use.  The button on this unit doesn't help with usability.  With the earhook design, one would push the button in the direction perpendicular into the ear to activate the button, a task easily done with one finger and no pain.  However, this unit uses the behind the ear design, where you would have to use two fingers with a motion to pinch your earlobe to activate the button, it's truly an unpleasant experience.  In addition, the vibrate alert feature is just stupid and useless.  In most cases, one would be wearing this unit, so the audible ringing can be heard--why would you need it to vibrate???I truly advise against buying this unit.
Want to basically eliminate your issues with holding this device in a secure way while maintaining the total coolness of it?This may be just what you were looking for. Seems to be actual leather unlike many similar cases that claim to be leather and are actually plastic. So if you wear skinny jeans and tend to keep the phone shoved in a pocket, this is not for you. But if you carry it elsewhere and are not concerned with combining your phone with some essential bits of your wallet, this is really really nice. If you tend to travel in a car and wind up carrying both the phone and your wallet into places to eat. This allows you to get three basic things out of the wallet and eliminate the need to carry two into the restaurant.It makes holding onto the phone less complicated by a factor of a googol. Particularly in landscape.The material (seems to be leather) is impregnated with a serious amount of oil so when you close the lid, it leaves a mark on the face of the phone. The simple solution to this is to get a paper index card, fold it at the red line on the top and shove the little folded bit in to the slot behind the cards. Not only do you then have the &#34;old way&#34; to fall back on if you need to actually write anything down )or have someone write something down for you(, but you add a perfect layer of weightless scratch proof protection to your ever so fragile Nexus 4 screen.For less than what you might pay for the 'official' bumper....no brainer.
This product is great. I like the kickstand on the back. The power indicator is very convenient to know charge pack status.
For the price, you cannot beat this little Stanley screwdriver set.  This one features several very tiny standard and Phillips head screwdrivers.  If you have a need for very small head screwdrivers, this one is for you.  These are useful for messing with eyeglasses, certain electronics gadgets, and firearms.  I have several revolvers and pistols which have sight adjustments that have outrageously small adjustment screws.  For these sights this little kit is a must -- none of my other tools could manage to fit these screws but this one did.  That alone made it worth the Amazon price and this little kit has a permanent place in my range shooting bag.  RJB.
I use this in my car to charge my phone and my iPod as needed. It works well, but the bright blue light can be annoying when driving at night. Overall, a very good deal.
This is an excellent replacement battery, it fit just fine and the price was amazing. Anyone needing to replace that old battery that won't hold a charge should totally look into getting one of these!
very durable, water tight, use this in my backpack to keep medical supplies dry, the clamps hold tight with a solid click when shut
This keyboard fills my left pocket and my "Ultra mobile PC phone" fills my right pocket.  This keyboard allows me to type at normal speed on a device I can keep in my pocket, and I was astonished to see that it would have even worked for text messaging on my older phone, the Nokia N-Gage.  If you have any HTC phone or any phone that supports bluetooth or this keyboard, or even a PDA, I highly recommend this product, although it is costly.  Pair it with anything that can run TextMaker Office for WindowsMobile and you have a meeting powerhouse in your pocket that can tackle the best college note taking in a much more mobile manner than a laptop, since you don't need to take it out of a bag, plug it in, and otherwise waste time.  I also suggest pairing it with the mouse by the same company for the same purpose.
get it. pay a little more and get this. dont buy those cheap stuff with low voltage. it will take forever to charge your phones and other..
Sprint wanted $30 fro the same item.  This is OEM and not third party after market. Bought two.  Work great
I just purchased the Treo 650 with AllTel (not specified here on Amazon) and have loved it.  It took me a couple days to get used to the feel of the bulkier PDA phone compared to my smaller LG, but once I got into it, I love it.  The only complaints I would have are that it does not come with a docking station (must be purchased separately) and the only way to make it a "great" phone from a "good" phone is to add close to $100 worth of various 3rd party software.  While it's a lot of money to bring it up to speed, the flexibility and having options are nice.  Nothing's perfect, but so far, so good (and AllTel has a 30day money back guarantee or exchange deal, so nothing's lost here).
I think just about every pat of this phone has already been written about. This is a great phone with a pretty intuitive interface (though, that doesn't go for the Verizon version from what I've seen). The one downside is that call volume could stand to be louder, especially if one is in a crowded area. A bluetooth headset effectively eliminates this problem.Speaking of bluetooth, I was supremely impressed by how open Cingular left the bluetooth options (again, the Verizon interface differs in this respect). You're able to transfer any wallpaper, ringtones, and videos on and off with ease.The only hurdle is pairing the phone for the first time. The trick is to initiate pairing on the PC while the bluetooth connection is active. For example, send a file from the phone to your PC (using the "copy" function while a file is selected) and quickly initiate pairing from your PC. You only have to go through this once, after that everything is a breeze. Hope that helps anyone who was as stuck as I was. EDIT: I just realized that this works best with the Broadcom/HP Bluetooth stacks I use on my laptop, if I figure it out for the MS default stacks, I'll post on it.
I have been a Nextel user for years and their Motorola products including i90, i95, i730 and i830.  The v3 is the best Motorola product ever!!! Blows the i830 out the water and makes it look like yesterdays news. Superior and striking good looks and is solidly built - no, it does not look cheap as some previous reviewer stated. I live in GA and Cingular reception is very good. Paired my v3 with Bluetrek G2 bluetooth headset(received rave reviews and is cheap - pick one up on ebay) and I wonder what took me so long to get on board. I did fear Cingular's merger with AT&T; since I had AT&T; years ago and their reception was terrible.I'll never go back to Nextel as they do not appreciate their customers and their Motorola products do not have Bluetooth except Blackberry. Plus who wants to carry around a brick in their pocket? I'm a woman and typically carry v3 in my purse but sometimes for convenience I just want to put it in my jean pocket. And I forget it's there...This v3 has superior browser technology, email and text messaging, good camera and great voice record. Yes, the address book is different but you get used to it. Anyways, I only put important people that I call frequently in address book so it's not a problem for me. I primarily make lots of calls and like to check news and send a few text messages. A+++++++
This headset would not stay in my ear no matter how hard I tried.  I like the fact that it is small, that it sounds OK, and that the person on the line could hear me OK (not great) But I could not figure out how to keep it in my ear without holding it, which defeats the purpose of having a headset!! I ordered 4 of them, they were about $3 apiece with shipping, and the first two are buzzy and could not be used.  I would not recommend this product. I went to an over the head headset by Jensen, and am VERY pleased!
They r a good price and it works a win win situation.  People have no problem hearing me or I them .
I have the version designed and manufactured for Dell by Think Outside, Inc.  It is the same as this product but the keys are black.  The keyboard works great.  The keyboard folds up flat and is about 4"x6" and it is thin.  It folds out to a full size keyboard, when opened the keyboard latches so it won't fold up when you are typing and the keys have a great feel.  Loading the software to my Axim x30 and configuring the keyboard went smoothly and although I am somewhat comfortable with technology  I am not a "techie" by any measure.  The bluetooth is great and there is no need to carry cables and wires and this option has worked well for me for the past two years.The only problem I have is with the stand.  The stand is made with very flimsy plastic; although the manual says that it is detachable I would recommend extreme caution. After two years of extremely careful treatment my stand broke.I don't know if Think Outside, Inc. will sell me this plastic part (I plan to contact them) but Dell does not stock or sell this part even though it is detachable; it does not take a genius to see that this part will not wear well.  After being transferred to four departments and then told to call their parts store the fifth Dell customer service representative told me to either purchase a new keyboard for $99.00 or carry my cradle around.  This seems silly and wasteful.If you work from one location and can use your cradle to hold your Pocket PC this is not an issue.  But if like me you purchased this for travel and portability and do not take your cradle with you this is a problem.So this is a great product with the above exception.  As a consumer I hope that manufacturers begin to learn that when you purchase something like this you expect quality.  It should not only work well but hold up under normal use and parts should be made available and easy to find.-Feb. 21, 2006Update:  I contacted Think Outside Inc. through their website.  They sent me two replacement stands free of charge.  The customer service department was nice and I got the stands within three business days.  Great customer service!-Feb. 24, 2006Another Update:  I am still using the keyboard and it still works great and my replacement stand is holding up and I still have the extra they sent me.  I would purchase this again and I wish sellers like Dell knew to direct customers who experienced the problem I did to Think Outside for replacement parts.  They had excellent customer service unlike Dell (they wanted me to purchase another keyboard).-Sept. 15, 2006
Bought one then a second one, I'm impressed, my phone is by the same vendor and I think it is... the worst phone I've ever had, but  this headset is comfortable and works with my phone and my wife's LG faultlessly.Be aware that there is no mute button, you'll have to use the phone for that.Lasted 1/2 of a year now junk, will no longer hold a charge
Another pretty phone case that I really love. I have many as I love t o change them around .thanks
This didn't do much for me. Unfortunately, it may not be the blame. Ironically, I have a home repeater system after trying a couple of quick fixes (I thought). This was an upgrade to a combination home and mobile solution I tried first before realizing the specific product to get the results I needed for my whole house solution. So in the mobile world, I'm sure this would be helpful. It is the system as a whole that needs to be configured to a need which includes area of coverage, location, type of usage, cell frequency and more. So in putting a system together, for a whole home solution, you'd be wise to call on the manufacturer rather than putting pieces together which may not 'fit' the performance or compatibility of the other components in the system.
After 2 weeks my charger just fell apart while i was taking it from the plug , not a strong charger at all i would have asked for my money but it wasn't even worth it .
I did my research years ago when I purchased this off Amazon. It's been the best headset for all these years. It followed me through 2.5mm cell phones to 3.5mm cell phones with an adapter. Sadly, the other parties can no longer hear me with it. I even tried a new 2.5 to 3.5mm adapter with no luck. I'm looking for a new headset and there's NOTHING like this one. Shure had it right and I wish they still made it. Not everyone likes bluetooth where it's hard to hear and be heard. I can't believe there's nothing like this on the market anymore. Jabra all has bad reviews and I tried a Plantronics one and returned it. I'm mourning the loss of this headset and wish it'd magically work again.
This is a decent Bluetooth headset.static, in general,is tolerable, unlike many of Motorola's other (and pricier) headsets.However, the volume level is far too low.  One has to literally press the headset against one's ear when driving on the freeway.On the bright side, the open/fold of the boom to turn the headset on/off is and innovative feature unique to Motorola headsets (and not all of them, at that).
I use this in my car, and I must say, it's amazing to have a retractable wire like this to dock my iPhone when listneing to music.Other wires are either too small, too short, in the way, etc. etc.This makes it any size you or the person sitting beside you may like.Great product, cheap too!&#9734; &#9734; &#9734; &#9734; &#9734; &#9734;
I have tried a few different bluetooth headsets, always looking for the Perfect Trifecta of (in order of importance): 1) great audio transmission quality in loud environments, 2) great audio reception (i.e. loud enough, no clicks or pops), and 3) comfort. The Plantronics 510 scores 5 stars for comfort, 5 stars for audio reception, but only 4 stars for audio transmission.To be fair, today's bluetooth headsets will never be as clear as the handset itself, or a wired headset, because bluetooth headsets sample at 8 KHz (i.e. 8,000 audio samples per second), while wired headsets and phones sample at 16 KHz (16,000 audio samples per second). That is why today's bluetooth headsets will always sound just a bit muffled.That said, as far as bluetooth goes, the Plantronics 510 does quite well -- but it has problems. I use it with my BlackBerry 8700. In a quiet environment, such as indoors or in a car with the windows up, audio transmission will be very clear. The boom mic brings the microphone closer to your mouth than do those tiny in-ear headsets, where the microphone is all the way up at your ear. (The microphone is about 3 inches from my mouth, compared to in-ear microphones, which are about 6 inches away.) The closer distance leads to a better, louder sound. However, in a noisy environment, everyone I've talked to finds it somewhat difficult to hear me because the sensitive microphone will pick up a lot of background noise. People have complained that they can hear the beeping of the checkout counter, or all the people chatting at Starbucks, or all the traffic noise, and it's hard to focus on what I'm saying. When I then disconnect the headset and talk directly into the phone, they all say, "That's much better!" That said, at least people can make out what I'm saying in a loud environment with this headset; with other bluetooth headsets I've used (e.g. the Motorola HS-820), loud environments render my relatively soft voice completely unintelligible.Audio reception is great when you're close to the phone; after about 5-10 feet away, you start to get clicks and pops. (Also, there are a fair number of clicks if I use the headset in my right ear while keeping the BlackBerry in my left pocket; my phone and headset need to be on the same side of my body, it seems, for the clearest sound.) The headset is very loud, and I usually listen to callers at about half-volume.In terms of comfort, Plantronics provides three styles of earbuds: small, medium, and a triangle-shaped larger one. After trying them all, I prefer the medium-sized bud -- I can keep the headset in my ear for over an hour without any discomfort, and sometimes I forget i am wearing it. Admittedly, it took me a while to figure out how to put in on with one hand, but I soon got the hang of it. It now takes me no more than 2 seconds to put it on. (Hint: Hold the earbud/boom-mic section with your thumb and middle finger, and lift the bulky back section up with your forefinger. Place the earbud in your ear, and then remove your forefinger and let the back section naturally fall back behind your ear. It sounds more complicated than it is, but it takes some getting used to.)I used to complain about the small power button, but then I realized that it's extremely easy to press down once the headset is on your ear. Contrary to popular belief, it is NOT a rocker switch; it presses down, but if you try to power on or off while not wearing the headset, it is tricky to find the right angle at which it needs to be pressed.So, bottom line: This is the best bluetooth headset I have ever used. When I am taking business calls at home and I want to sound as clear as possible, I either talk directly into the headset or use a wired headset with a boom microphone located 1-2 inches from my mouth -- but as far as bluetooth headsets go, the Plantronics 510 is extremely convenient for use when walking about town, or driving. I am giving it four stars because it isn't PERFECT (and I only give five-star ratings for perfection). That said, I will continue to use it as my daily headset until the coming of the Perfect Trifecta of audio transmission, audio reception, and comfort -- which almost certainly will be achieved by Plantronics.
This was a great deal.  Easy to install and a direct fit replacement for the iPhone 4s.  Does what it should and hopefully it will last.
I could only give this USB car charger 2 stars because although it worked fine for about 3 months, it subsequently died on me.Pros:-Has 2 USB ports for charging, one (the top) is 2.1 amps.  The bottom slot is lower, presumably 1 or 1.5 amps.-Fits well in my charging socket - holds tight.  I've had some that were loose in my charging socket.-Works well to charge my iPhone in the top slot and the bottom slot works with most Android phones, except the very high end ones.-Has a blue LED light to tell you it is on and ready to charge.-The USB sockets seem to be well made and tightly fit all my cables.-Pretty solid construction.-It cost less than $2.Cons:-It died on me after 3 months.I had really enjoyed using this USB charger.  It rapidly charged my iPhone and worked well with charging the phones of my family and friends.  The two slot design makes this design very handy; with a 1 slot design, no one else can charge their device unless I remove my cord.  Of course, after this charger died, I had to go back to the 1 slot design I was using before.After 3 months, I began to notice the LED light flickering.  It was less than a week later that is quit working permanently.  I'm not sure what the problem was - faulty wiring, bad design, I guess I'll never know.  I thought about getting another since they are so cheap, but then I thought better of it.  Maybe they are so cheap because they are simply disposable after a short period of time.For whatever reason, it died and I was forced to look for another 2 slot design - I haven't found one in my price range yet.
This is the only bluetooth headset I've tried. Using with a motorola e815 with verizon.Calling is good with the voice-dialing with the e815. Good range for the signal. Some areas you have an increased static interference, but it's pretty minimal. Occational pop-sounds, not crackling or static for the most part. I guess you could say not a lot of bass and volume can't be made "loud" but is certainly loud enough for regular calls. Traffic/other loud background noise will wash out calls...but that's no different than wired headsets (or natice cell useage either).I have about 50-50 usage of the headset wearing it and leaving it closed in the pocket. I charge it every night, never had a low-battery problem in a day. Talk 2-4hrs a day on average. If in the pocket I can get it out, unflipped and talking on the phone before the call cancels (it's close though). Thought the flip close was wierd at first, but probably the best interface, wouldn't want to have to mess with a button to wakeup/connect. Connect time to cell is about 1-2 seconds after opening.Comfort is the worst thing about this headset. Leaving it on for 1-2hrs your ear will be SORE. Half of the headset is very stiff plastic with heavy wire inside, other half is flimsy plastic (looks like it would be soft on the ear but doesn't seem that way). Doesn't seem to sit nicely in the ear and you can't adjust  up/down/back/forward. I can see why that is, because the ear part is spring-loaded to keep headset tight against the ear but it's not good.Worth the money, hope a newer version improves the comfort level.
I was having trouble with wind noise in my convertible causing too much noise to hear phone conversations with normal over-the-ear headsets.  This headset has a soft rubber grommet which seals to the inside of the ear.  There are several grommet sizes to fit most ears.The seal prevents most wind noise and dramatically improves the perceived volume.The rubber piece is good for about 6 months before becoming hard.  2 of each size are provided.
I have bought many cases for many different cellphones and this is the first case that compelled me to write a review.  This is by far, THE best case I have ever had.  It fits so perfectly, you'd think that it was meant to be a second skin for the phone.  and the fact that it doesn't add a lot of bulk, but feels like it will protect very well makes it that much better.  This case is worth more than double or triple the price.  I wish they made this exact case for every phone.  It would be my go-to case.  Please make one for the HTC ONE!
so far no problems, it charges fast that is what i need it. it doesn' have an USB as it specified, jus a direct wall charger.
I bought this keyboard when it was first released back in 2005 took it out today to test it with the idea of selling it. But after installing it on my current device (Verizon XV6800 running Windows Mobile 6.1), I decided I liked it too much to sell. I forgot how much I liked this keyboard. I'm giving it 4 stars instead of 5 because of two annoyances:1. The numbers are accessible only through function keys - a bit of a pain. I would have preferred another row of keys. It wouldn't have added that much size or weight.2. When the keyboard is open, it's supported in the middle by what becomes the case and the ends extend on either side like wings. If you are a slow typist, this is fine. But I'm a fast typist and I tend to hit the the keys pretty hard so the keyboard tips from side to side when I type. Really irritating. I fixed this by making two little supports from stacked cardboard glued together. I stick these under the "wings" and that solves the problem.Here's where I got the latest driver released for the device (it's no longer supported by iGO):[...]This driver is for Windows Mobile 5, but it works on my Mobile 6.1 device. :)You MUST install the driver in MAIN MEMORY - not a storage card. If you install it on a storage card, it won't work.After I installed the driver, the configuration utility suggested that I upgrade the keyboard's firmware. I thought this wouldn't work since the keyboard is no longer supported by iGO, but to my surprise, it did - my firmware was updated from 1.1 to 1.2.The previous reviewer said he had to use the pointing stick to send email. That's because he didn't know the keyboard shortcut for Send: Alt-S.The keyboard folds up very small and compact and it's very light-weight - not a big deal to carry it around along with my SmartPhone. No more picking at the tiny on-screen keyboard when I want to send email from my phone!
Out of all the chargers I have bought, this one has been the best! It charges my wife & I phones simulataneously without a hitch! It manages to keep charging both while doing GPS draining apps in and the screens on! Which others can't seem to do.
The reviews available on this product from the amazon website really helped me make a great decision.This model may not be the "latest" technology but it's enough for me. I only use it in the car because of all the issues that have been raised about driving safety. I feel better with both hands on the wheel, both eyes on the road.I'm not a device geek but this really works for me and the few requirements i have.Simple to use, I set it up in 10 min max.Fits fine, but I do activate the connection before i go down the road because the buttons are small and can be difficult to activate if you already have it behind your ear.
very cheap excellent value. the problem with most is their uselessness when confronted by windy conditions- this does a much better job than most. v simple instructinos, though it lacks the ability to switch easily between headset & phone & back.nevertheless at $35 or under, brilliant value.
5 stars... Excellent device. It does the job and it is well built.
The Voyager 510 is very comfortable to wear and was easy to setup. The speaker volume is good with little or no static. Plus the it doesn't look like a block of plastic hanging off your ear. I highly recommend this headset.
I like this headset. Fits well if you adjust it according to instructions. Clear sound. Slightly on the quiet side, not bad. The best point is it takes AAA batteries so they are easy to replace. I had mine for 2 years before I lost it. Good price. Synchs well with my razor.
This skin fits perfect in my SGSII and the phone looks great inside of it.It is a high quality skin and gives a very good feeling in your hands.I recommend this product for your SGSII.
Very fast delivery.  product is as described and useful tool.  If  you need a set of these this is a good one
I would like to start off by saying that this product is what I ordered and I have no complaints about shipping or the condition of the product when it came to my house, the problem I do have is the micro usb cable that comes with the charger. Why is it that all of the different companies that sell chargers on Amazon can get the plug part of the charger right but not the micro usb cord? The cord is cheap and not the original cord that comes with the other part of the charger. I am having the same issue with the charger that I ordered for my galaxy note 2. It's a very thin cord, and also very short. Maybe, a 2 21/2 foot cord? And its of a cheaper quality than the part of the charger that the micro usb plugs into...
Could have been better for the price and wait time. 2 of the drivers are labeled as a 1.5 but are clearly different sizes. Also the wear kinda fast if working with tight screws
I was one of the lucky few to get one of these free for registering my Motorola MPX-220.  I was skeptical to the whole bluetooth scene, but this headset quickly changed my mind.The device will easily last 3-4 days in standby mode with average usage.  The sound is excellent, and people who listen think I'm talking on a normal phone.  The range is great.  I can be about 50 feet away without a problem.The best part about the phone is the intuitive on/off.  When the microphone boom is "folded" out, it turns on.  Fold it back in, and it turns off.  Simple, yes.  But many other headsets require you to push buttons (or hold them down).  This makes using it a snap!I actually have one for my home office and another that I leave in my car.
damaged charger. when i recieved it the charger had a short in it. i had to wiggle the cord for my phone to charge.
This thing is sweet. I have to say that so far this is the best case that I have tried out from Box Wave. It slipped on very snug and was even harder to get off. Although it is not impossible to get off it is difficult which is a good thing in my book. This case is very comfortable in the hand and just feels right. All controls were easily accessed and everything on my Galaxy Note 2 worked fine with the case on it. The only thing I didn't like was that this does not come with a holster. I like to use holsters and carry my phone on my belt. Well I did manage to find a holster from one of my earlier purchases for my phone and it fit the Box Wave like a glove. It was from one of those 2 piece rubber and hard plastic cases that Amazon sells for about $7.00. I can't remember the name but as soon as I do I will update this review so you can order this case and holster combo just for the holster. I have had the chance to locate the name of the case and holster and it is from "Rhino" brand. The ones I have were "Black Rhino". I hated the cases but the holster is a perfect fit for this Box Wave case.
Product is as good as it was advertised. It works very well and I would very much recommend this product because it would give you more usb access to your laptop or desk top.
No complaints from this headset.  It's comfortable in the ear, has a mute function and works flawlessly with my PS3 and KRAZR!
I was incredibly frustrated to have purchased this product to find out that it does not work to charge up a phone that I specifically bought it for. It was a Christmas present for someone that had relied on a car charger for years. She'd plug it into her car outlet and let it sit in her car until it was charged. I assumed I just solved her problem. Unfortunately, her Motorola Razr is such a dinosaur, I'd have to special order it from the actual manufacturer.Here's the surprise part......I just moved and finally found my Kindle. It's the Kindle touch, nothing special (not the fire or paperwhite). It's simply a black and white touch screen. Unfortunately, I couldn't find the charger, no matter where I looked! Even so, the charger that came with the Kindle would take about 2-3 hours to fully charge, when it's nearly dead. So,I decided to try this on my Kindle to see if it would fit. To my surprise, it fits just like a glove! Not only that, but it also charged my Kindle in under an hour. It was so dead, it refused to turn on until I plugged it in to a charger. Still, it was fully charged within an hour. Go figure!
Good Item, BUT.....The sound could be better...U get what u Pay For!!$8.00 for this as opposed to minimum $130 for a CHEAP CD installed in the dash.Well worth the couple of $$$
Originally created for use with Palm devices, the iGo Stowaway Ultra-Slim Bluetooth Keyboard for PDAs and Handhelds is still among the best folding, nearly full-sized Bluetooth keyboards available. Its metal case and relatively simple folding mechanism result in a durable product that has given me years of reliable service. The keyboard feels great; the throw of the keys is nice and tactile feedback is on a par with many laptop keyboards. My fingers are none too slim and they easily fit on to this keyboard. Like many of us, these days, I'm a touch typist and I find using this keyboard as comfortable as any I might find, particularly on most laptop computers. I've owned a couple of these - not because they wear out (I still own and use the first one I purchased, nearly a decade ago) - but because I find it's useful to have one at my bedside and another in my gear bag.Powered by AAA batteries makes it easy to operate. There's no proprietary power source or charging system required. It sips power, too; I find it lasts and lasts on a pair of NiMH rechargeable batteries.Pairing with a phone or other device is very simple. However, my Symbian phones do not handle this as they should any authorized peripheral. I have to manually connect; I cannot just turn the keyboard on and start to type, in order to get the keyboard and phone to connect. I suspect this a deficiency with the Symbian OS and not with the keyboard.The folding stand is very useful and fits a variety of devices of roughly phone-size, in either a portrait or landscape configuration.Even without its zippered case, this keyboard travels very nicely and has a durable aluminum shell.Why didn't I give this a perfect 5-star rating? The keypad is available, I think, only with the functions of the old Palm OS mapped on to the keys. It doesn't undermine the use of the keyboard with other operating systems, but can sometimes be distracting that the keys are printed with functions either not available on your phone's operating system or the keys cannot actually perform that function.I find it very unfortunate that most so-called "smart phones" do not support mapping special functions on to Bluetooth keyboards. Admittedly, this is not a shortcoming of the keyboard itself. Phone manufacturers are simply more interested in equipping their systems with eye-candy and games, rather than the kinds of productivity enhancements which might make their devices more useful to those of us who try to rely upon them to aid is in our work and home lives.It is astonishing to me that this keyboard isn't more popular and being emulated by other manufacturers. It would be terrific if it were to ship with software that could enable iOS, Android, and Symbian devices to map functions to its keys.I highly recommend this keyboard, if you are looking for a durable, reliable, and comfortable folding Bluetooth keyboard for your handheld device.
ok good product you get what you pay for works and is good for the pricee you cant go wrong
This fit my Verizon V3M Razr, fit on my person comfortably while driving and would be a great gadget if it were not for the HUGE ear bud.  I have large earcanals and this earbud does not even come close to fitting in it.  Rediculous!Most reputable earbud companies (V-Moda, Bose and Shure) have different size earbuds for each individual.  I am disappointed in this product...
i returned it because it came dented.  I like it , wish i could have used it.  They said i got the last one.
Amazon continues to ship this antenna with the Wilson Electronics Sleek Booster, and it is not the right antenna. Wilson has told them many times they are shipping the wrong antenna but they continue to do it. This was very frustrating and caused me a lot of grief as I was not able to get on the Internet for a week due to Amazon's problem. I am returning the whole package to Amazon even though Wilson Electronics was able to send me an adapter in the next week or so, but the primary reason I purchased this product was to use over the Holidays where the place we were staying had little reception.  Not being able to use my smartphone hot spot really made me angry.  There is not excuse for this as Amazon has been told many times by Wilson Electronics that they are sending customers the wrong product.
I bought this product after reading several reviews on several chargers. It works great on my Razr V3 and also works on a friends Motorola W315...I like the fact that the coiled cord is not as long as on some of the other chargers, and that the M lights up so I can tell when its working. I find it easier to use for these reasons. This idem was cheaper than the aftermarket model offered at Wal- Mart even after paying shipping and the quality is far better.
First, I'm a huge fan of TPU cases; and hate silicone ones.  There's a huge difference, in case you, the reader, doesn't know.  TPU is better... LIGHT YEARS better!But there are a lot of not-so-good TPU cases out there; and not because there's anything wrong with the TPU. Rather, it's because they're cheaply made, or not cut precisely accurately... that sort of thing.This particular case is the very epitome of precision cut.  It's perfect.  Every hole is centered on whatever it reveals beneath... the camera lens, the flash, the speaker, the mic holes, the earphone jack, and, of course, the stylus.  Note that there's no holes for the power button or volume rocker......and that, TRUST ME, is the way it SHOULD be!  So many of these TPU cases make cutouts for the power button and volume rockers, and that's a huge mistake.  If you've ever cleaned an old-style computer mouse -- you know, the ones with the hard rubber ball partially hanging down out of the centerhold on the bottom -- if you've ever open one of those up and cleaned one, then you've seen the dark kinda' fuzzy weird stuff that you must scratch off all the rollers and whatnot.  That stuff is body oil, mixed with skin cells, mixed with dust and hair, mixed with lint from the mouse pad, mixed with godknows what else.  It gets into and under and around virtually anything which humans touch......including down inside and around the hardware buttons on a smartphone!  And when that stuff gets in there, buttons stick, and phones either won't turn on or off, or can't have their screens awakened properly... or, one of the common ones which people often don't realize is caused by a sticking power button:  boot loops!Having a TPU cover which covers the power button and volume rocker helps eliminate that problem.  Of course, there's still the electromechanical HOME key that's uncovered; and if you look on YouTube you can find examples of phones which their owners mistakenly believe are broken, because their HOME keys cause weird behavior; but, in fact, all that's wrong is that over time the HOME key has gotten all gunked-up with the aforementioned body oil, mixed with dust and hair, mixed with... well... you get the picture.There's not a lot we can do about the HOME key problem (if it's a hardware electromechanical one, as opposed to a simple capacitive on on the glass), but we sure can keep the crap out of our power buttons and volume rockers with TPU cases that cover them......and this one does... and magnificently.  It even has nicely-molded buttons (as opposed to cheap TPU cases which just have a sort of bulge with a little bit of texture added to it.  This case is simply molded beautifully!This case is special for another reason, too, which many people, I'll bet, don't know about, and that's precisely how its sides wrap up and onto the front face of the phone: the bezel around the glass screen.  It's really nice, and very different from how other TPU cases do it.Remember that the Note II is kinda' unique in that the very, very edges of its glass screen  aren't like almost any other phone.  Most phones have a perfectly flat piece of glass as their screens; and then there's the metal bezel of the case which almost comes into contact with the glass's edge all-'round; and the top of the bezel is ever-so-slightly elevated above the flat plane of the glass screen, so that if you place the phone on its glass screen on a table, the glass, itself, it not actually touching the table because that bezel edge is holding it a millimeter or so up off the table's surface.Well, the Note II's glass is actually higher up (when it's lying on its back) than the bezel edge of the case; and, in fact, the very, very edge of the Note II's glass seesm to roll over and down toward the case's bezel. As such, if you lay the Note II on its face (on its glass, it's the glass that actually touches the table.  This makes for a bit of nightmarishness with regard to screen protectors; and one maker of them (REALOOK) manufactures two dry-apply versions for the Note II: one that sits on just the flat part of the Note II's screen, and so leaves a wider-than-normal amount of uncovered glass between the edge of the screen protector and the actual glass edge; and then they make another (the REALOOK "3D" screen protector for the Note II) that's molded to actually wrap over the rounded edge of the Note II's glass, and "hang" down over it, so to speak, to make the protector's edge come closer to the case's bezel, and causing it to COMPLETELY cover the glass and its rounded edge.With most TPU cases, the TPU sides wrap up and over onto the face of the glass; and with totally flat screen protectors which leave a half millimeter or so between the screen protector edge and the bezel, that's fine.  The TPU case actually ends-up covering that edge and make it look like the screen protector is covering the entire glass.  But with the  REALOOK "3D" style screen protector that wraps over the edge, that other kind -- the most common kind -- of TPU case can cause the edges and corners of the 3D screen protector to curl or pull up.This BoxWave Tuxedo SuitUp case is magnificently shaped so that its edge around the glass protrudes up higher than the plane of the glass, so that if the phone is laid on its face (on its glass sreen), the glass doesn't touch because it's being held a millimeter or so up off the table or desk.  But it gets better:  That edge "respects" the rounded edge of the Note II's glass, and doesn't try to wrap up over onto and cover it.  Therefore, the REALOOK 3D screen protector's edges and corners remain intact and look beautiful.This is a very special TPU case... different from most others... and the only kind you can have, actually, if you use either a wet- or dry-apply screen protector whose edges go either all the way to, or over the edge of, the Note II's glass.Seriously, this thing is PRECISION... someone REALLY took a moment to figure out how best to cover the unusual Note II... and got it PERFECT!The only thing I wish it had was a matte finish back so that it wouldn't show such fingerprints.  The TPU cases out there that are called "s-style" or "s-series" TPU cases have matte finish on one side of the "s" shape on the case's back, and a shiny finish (like this case has everywhere) on the other side of the "s" shape on the case's back.  The entire back of this BoxWave Tuxedo SuitUp should be the kind of matte finish that's on those "s" cases, in my opinion; or there should at least be an option to get it either way.Sadly, those "s" series or style cases are of the type whose side wrap all the way up and over onto and touching the glass, and on the Note II, that doesn't work well with most screen protectors. Plus, many of those "s" style or series cases have uncovered power and volume rocker buttons. Most of them also leave too much phone uncovered around the camera and flash... none of which are problems with this BoxWave Tuxedo SuitUp; and so for me, at least, it's worth it to just endure its shiny, fingerprint-showing surface.Great case!  Best-of-breed, at least among cases that don't cause the edges and corners of screen protectors to curl-up and pull-up.  If one is not using a "3D" type of screen protector from REALOOK, though; if one is using REALOOK's other screen protector that attaches to just the flat part of the Note II's screen, then any of the other TPU cases for the Note II would be fine (as long as they cover the power and volume rocker buttons); but the thing is that few of them are made as nicely as this one. Seriously, this one is made very, very well... very precise. I just love it!Gregg L. DesElmsNapa, California USAgregg at greggdeselms dot com
This thing worked well when it actually functioned, but today it stopped working and I am past the 30 day return window by 10 days give or take.I'm guessing the quality might not be great as that is why it stopped working, who knows.. What a waste of money.
this case is better than i thought i love the feel and design and it is well made and doen not collect dust.
I'm really unimpressed with this headset. Granted, its a pretty old design now (i bought it in 2006) and I imagine there are much better headsets out there.There is way too much static for such a simple, digital device. It is especially bad if I have my phone in the opposite-side pocket as which ear I have the headset in.Certainly you can do better than this by now. Get something with a later bluetooth version.
I was leary about purchasing the battery because it cost so little.  But I called the vendor and asked if it was a new battery and not used or re-conditioned. The vendor assured me it was a new battery.  It has performed well so far.
I just called T-Mobile with complaints about my weak battery and told them talk time on the cell phone is 840min according to Amazon's specs for the T610 phone. T-mobile told me the talk time is 5 hours (300min). Who do you believe? I am tired of liars and money-gobbling b*st*rds!
es un cable para carro de excelente calidad , original de samsung , lo tengo algun tiempo sin ningun problema
Had my doubts about ordering an item like this on the internet but after receipt of the item, I found it works great.
I returned this product because it was clearly a used headset.  There were scratches on the front, and a small dent.  Frankly I do not want to insert a used product into my ear.  I went to Wal-mart and bought the very same product for less money.
this phone cord is so easy to use and easily connected from phone to computer. great value for the price.
The sound of this headset is excellent, as advertised.  The trouble is in getting it to stay in place when I move around.  I'm not talking about playing tennis here, I'm talking about driving the car, and having the boom slowly swing downwards away from my mouth.  The ear plug stays in place, and I can still hear, but the boom swings downward from in front of my mouth (pulled by gravity) and then the person I'm talking with can't hear me so well.  The only thing that works for me in this regard is Plantronics, the one the hooks behind your ear lobe, but that one is not noise-canceling, so I can't hear as well when the wind noise gets high in the car.  The ones that hook over my ear hurt me, and the ones that just plug into my ear usually fall out.  This one is better in that it stays in my ear, but having the boom pivot away from my mouth is a real problem.  I tried bending it so it hangs down from my ear and then swings forward to my mouth, but the center of gravity still tries to swing to the lowest point, so I'd not a boom twice as long as this for that plan to really work.
The case took almost a week to arrive. You buy a cheap case, you're going to get cheap case quality. Stay away. The inside of the case that contacts the phone is not smooth at all. Will scratch your phone. Looks as if someone dropped it in dirt. Could not clean whatever gunk was on the case. Thank God it didn't scratch the aluminium on the case. A credit card didn't even slide all the way down into the case. Good luck trying to fit two in there. Spend your money else where.
I've been using mine for over 4 years and it's finally starting to show some wear with the wraparound earpiece, and having a few issues with it shutting off unexpectedly.  All in all, for having it over four years, it's a great purchase.  Although I'm still using mine daily, I'm ready to purchase a new one, and one with a battery is the best, as I simply carry AAA batteries in my car, so whenever this one dies, I just put a new one in on the go.  No worrying about bringing it into the house to charge, forgetting to take it back out, or losing the charging cord.  I love it because it's so convenient and can leave it in the car 100% of the time, so it's always for sure there.
I was surprised to find this excellent powered USB hub for much less money than I paid for an identicel one over three years ago. Somehow, we misplaced the power adapter so I ordered this one mainly so I could get the power adapter. The older hub still works fine so I just use the adapter so I can run USB 3.0 Hard Drives with a TV Android mini-pc. My grandson wanted the hub for his his Playstation 3 slim, which sees a lot of use. He uses it for video gaming and for a multi-media center. He accidently damaged one of the two USB ports and he was limited by having only one USB port.I gave him this hub. He is so happy with it his friends want one!
This headset is inexpensive, but the sound quality is great.  It paired with my Samsung D807 in a couple of seconds.  The ear piece goes in the ear, so outside noises are less distracting.  With my old Motorola headsets, people complained that they couldn't hear me.  That hasn't been an issue with the 320.
Great design and protected my phone really well from droppings. My one year old dropped it all the time and no problem. But the big problem is that it's stained. I don't know why I only put my phone in my purse, not my jeans pockets but it got all blue-ish note
This is my first bluetooth device. Read reviews and considered other headsets costing $50 and $100. Based on reviews and value, got this one. Have used it three days.It works well and came with a good set of accessories. My only complaint really is that the tone of voices on my end sounds a bit like a tin can phone. Intelligibility is not a problem, but the sound is a bit disconcerting. Most people I talk to say it sounds fine on the other end, but one complained of the "tunnel sound."But it is a good value. It synched with my T-Mobile Wing right away. I think it dropped a couple of calls, but cannot be certain where the blame lies. I just walked away from the phone and when I came back it reconnected immediately.Other comments: The eyeglasses clip is a great idea but I'll have to modify it to work with my thin wire frames. The ear clip is fine. The supplied neck cord is a good idea, but I'm not using it. The belt clip seems a bit vulnerable as it sticks out pretty far.Mine was missing the full manual (a return?), but the online PDF was easy to find.Overall, I did expect slightly better performance, but am satisfied with the value and general function of this headset.
Great features - except for the phone one.  Seriously - Bluetooth, IR, good phone book features, nice color display (though it washes out if you are using polarized glasses).  However, I get much weaker signals (and call quality) on this phone vs. my previous one.  If everywhere you would use the phone has strong signals, you may be just fine - but if you are on the edge, this is not the phone for you, unless you value the non-phone features more than it working as a phone. :)
works great for powering my Plantronics BT. i like the retractable cord so it doesnt have a long cord getting in the way. nice and compact and easy to store when not in use
Received this in about a weeks time. Very nice actually considering how cheap the price was. It's a pink/purple with black leopard spots and has a very nice feel to it. I haven't tried to remove it yet, but hopefully it won't give me any trouble when I do want to change covers.
I don't want to rehash all of the stuff that's already been said about this phone. Here's something that nobody told me before I bought it: You cannot use the Infrared port on this phone to transfer data to and from it using a PC. You can use the infrared on the phone as a wireless modem for Internet connectivity (this works for me) but the EasyGPRS software provided to manage phone entries etc. does not work with Infrared. I've checked out all of the online support forums for this phone and I have not heard from anyone who has actually done this. When I called tech support they suggest that I buy their data cable (read: shell out another $70) for that purpose. It is very misleading to show this phone as being IR equipped while its use is crippled.BTW, I gave this phone 4 stars because it is still a sleek looking great phone.
I struggled with trying to get this thing to work with my Blackberry 8700g for some time.  I even selected and downloaded a driver that was listed for Blackberry devices on the product web site.  After a lot of frustration, I finally got my Blackberry to pair with the keyboard, but it would still not recognize it when I tried to get it to link to it.  I contacted iGo product support and they informed me that: "Unfortunately, we do not have a driver for that device currently."  So, I ended up wasting a lot of time on this keyboard that is supposedly "for Blackberry and other PDA/Handhelds."By the way, the carton itself does not state that it works with Blackberry devices, only with Smartphones.  A fairly obscure barcode sticker on the back does indicate, in small letters, that it also works for Blackberry.  In my case, though, back it goes, which really is a shame because I like the quality of the item otherwise and I am sure I could have made good use of it.  In the mean time, I guess I'll keep looking.Lastly, I also agree with the other reviewer who vented about the stupid sticker they place on the unit.  It is glued to the keyboard and to the front surface and is quite a pain to remove.
I purchased these because the original ear pieces from jabra were OK but left me pushing on my headset constantly trying to get it in my ear more.  Which, unfortunately, resulted in a lot of accidental button pushing and disconnecting calls.I saw these on Amazon and thought they were worth trying.  I loved that you get basically 6 ear gels in 3 sizes for both right and left error.I found a size that fit my ear perfectly and was able to use the headset without the earband which was a surprise.The ear gels are gentle and fit in the ear.  Only reason I am giving them 4 stars instead of 5 is that it takes quite a bit of adjusting and finesse to get the gel on the headset.  Also, while I enjoyed the product I feel it may be slightly over priced for what you get.But overall a great product and the sound is now channelled directly into my ear so I don't have to keep pushing my headset in to hear.  I would recommend this product to others who find the jabra sound decent but also wish it would go in the ear a little more.
This PowerBear case is a lifesaver!! Charges fast, always reliable. I also love the glossy texture of the case. Highly recommend!!
I specifically ordered this headset because of the eye glass clip.  When I received the order, the clip would not fit on my glasses, and appeared to be of extreme poor contstruction (the type you would expect out of a Craker Jack box).The headset would required pressing the button to answer a call several times before it would actually pick up the call.The product is in the process of being returned to Amazon.com.
Bought this phone with Cingular service. I needed the phone in a hurry. I checked my order next day, had this weird message:"Order RevisionOrder placed October 08, 2005 at 10:35 PM PDTOpen order -- your order revision requiredhas not approved you for any phone and service plan packages. Please cancel necessary phone and service plan packages from your order. We cannot proceed with your order without some action on your part. Please be aware that if you do not take action on this item within 5 DAYS, it will be cancelled from your order.Cancel necessary phone and service plan packages"I had no idea what this cryptic message meant, but essentially they were requiring me to cancel the order. I have three cell phones in my family, perfect credit, no earthly reason why I wouldn't be approved for a cell phone account, just the above message with no explanation. Of course, there is no one at Amazon to call for an explanation. I don't know if my form was missing some information, or something was mistyped - no idea at all what happened. I think that if Amazon was going to cancel my order, they need to explain it to me.I have bought from Amazon before, usually good service, but this is just awful.I think that Amazon is in over their heads in the cell phone business.From other comments, it sounds like Amazon is not being fully honest or transparent in their cell phone ads.
Let me say a few things:Buy THIS device.  Here are the reasons:- 7-8 Hours talk time- True 30 feet range- Wind filter for clear talking- Small and comfortable, doesn't intrude your ear- Crazy price, huge quality- Warranty and reliability of Logitech!I've used a Sony Ericsson and Jabra BT200 and I would say the Jabra is much better than Sony Ericsson, but the Logitech blows them both away.  It's faster to put on the Logitech and the range is much better.  The microphone is clear and crisp and the speaker volume is loud and sufficient.For me, I used a Jabra A210 bluetooth adapter for a Sprint Sanyo 8100 phone w/2.5mm headset jack.  It gave me BT on my phone so I could use this headset.  The auto-answer and hang up depends on your phone whether it would normally do so with a headset or not.  Works great for me!If you are considering a headset, get this one.  It's what bluetooth technology should be like.  It's so great that Amazon sold out...  nice.  It was $39.99 (where did they all go???)
I had a plantronics tranditional headphone MX110 before, and I really like the comfort and sound quality of the product.  So, I try this new MX505.Although I am very impress by the sound quality and unique design, it doesn't fit me too well.  Let me summarize the Pros and Cons first:Pro:Sound qualityDesign fit almost every ear type: the grey area on the ear piece is actually, soft plastic.  It makes it very easy to adjust and fairly comfortable to wear.it comes with a spare voice tubesvolumn adjustable controlCon:the cord is a little short for me, and it is around 8 cm shorter than my old MX110.  I prefer to put the phone on a further distance when I use the phone.  So, it won't bother me when I work.  If the cord is at least 30 cm or 50cm longer, it would be great.The  design doesn't fit me well... or it wouldn't wear for long comfortably.  The main reason is that it is "soft" plastic, not cushioned like the MX110.  Yes, it is able to clip onto the ear much better than other design.  I still feel the "clip plain" after wearing it for 10 min.  It is not a very painful feeling, just not very comfortable.The volumn control is good, but the build quality is not.  It uses rather cheap or thin plastic shell.  Additionally, the "Mute" button is not the "soft push" eletonic type.  It is the older switch design type, which you push to the right is "Mute" and push to the left is "Unmute".  It is rather chessy to me.My main suggestion to plantronic is that, please add the cushion on the "ear clip".  Secondly, please either take out the volumn control or improve it or offer longer cord.  I mean, if the cord is not long enough, why do you need a volumn control?
It rolls up nice but has a hissing sound in the background. In the dead spot between two songs you can hear the hissing. It isnt all that loud but its there. Still works well enough that I didnt want to return it.
This Classic Book iPhone case is flimsy and the cover will not remain closed. Not good protection for an iPhone.
[Apart from minor issues like stability of the "weighted" base, this hub has been such a consistent, heavy-duty performer, while holding its price point (just short of 30) for exactly 4 years, that I've had to award it 5 stars (and order the identical model for my wife).  But just in the last 2 months the hub has been behaving completely opposite to expectations.  It goes totally dead with my hard drives, telling me that they're drawing too much power and therefore the hub is shutting them down until I remove them. But even when the hub is naked with the exception of a tiny flash drive, it remains dead, dark and non-communicative.  It comes back to life only when I disconnect the AC power and rely on nothing more than the power supplied by the USB ports.  That's fine, but not what I need with my 1TB (and bigger) hard drives, which until now had been showing on my computer's desktop with each start-up.  I'm about to call a rep in order to get an idea of what's going on and whether there's a fix (could it be Apple's latest update to OSX?  I'll be back pending further info.]I realized I needed a 7-port hub and checked out the D-Link, Kensington, Belkin--the usual suspects.  Then I chanced upon this unlikely contender, looking more like a jukebox in Amazon's picture than a hub.  I was intrigued by the off-beat design and noticed that the price was competitive (though a couple of the others are presently offering rebates, a free flylight, and other sweeteners). Now that I'm looking at the CyberPower USB port "in person," I can provide a few initial impressions:1.  It's a lot smaller than the picture might imply.  Compactness is nice, but you also want a hub that will stay put and that allows sufficient space between adjacent plugs.2.  Although the hub is designed for either vertical or horizontal use, the added and welcome weight of the detachable base makes vertical use the more sensible option.  Otherwise, you've got a lightweight (and fairly generic) loaded-up plug which could easily move around, dislodging the USB mini-plug (a necessary evil except for small cameras) at one end of every USB 2.0 cable.3.  It seems to handle my equipment off of the USB power supplied by the computer, but I still breathe easier using the included AC power adapter. (To the manufacturer's credit, it's one of the slimmer, lighter wall-warts that I've seen.)4.  The flash drive mount is practical (but not unique).  Now I can finally use that old Sandisk thumb drive that formerly was taking up the space of two USB ports.5.  The individual port lights are on all the time and, unlike most hubs, are not indicative of the presence or absence of a USB device.In conclusion, it's a reliable performer and a convenient as well as eye-catching device--providing you go for the vertical look.  If I were to suggest one design improvement, it would be to "fatten up" the tower so that it would be wide enough to permit horizontal insertion of USB devices with the hub in vertical position.  Doing so would assure unforced accommodation of all your USB plugs, even the most space-devouring ones.  Biggest "gripe": the vertical design is not real stable.  The hub is easily dislodged from the base and bounces around quite a bit.  If I had to do it over, I'd look at the heavy, dome-shaped Kensington.[Revaluation after almost 3 years: I tried the Kensington. It was no more stable but less reliable. So I returned to the CyberPower, but without the base or vertical position.  I velcroed its back side to the wooden surface behind my desktop machine, with printer and two 500GB storage drives inputted to the rear, one USB cable from the front side to the USB of my iMac, and a flash drive connected to the top side of the hub.  Absolutely no problems.  This item continues to rise in both popularity and price because it's so good.  Should it ever fail, I doubt there's any other hub available that could surpass it. Forget the "cuteness" factor; this thing is all business.][4 years later: This "off brand" hub continues to be an Amazon best-seller while hubs like the Kensington "round mound" have fallen off the map, so this one is a proven winner.  Only lately I've had some difficulty with getting it to recognize really large (1TB) hard drives. Before condemning the drive, I going to try some different cables and maybe a call to the manufacturer.  Otherwise, the next step up would be either a 3.0 USB hub or a hub with dedicated switches, permitting you to assign just the power-draining devices to the AC-powered inputs while allowing the other devices (iPods, mouse receivers, flash drives, printers, etc.) to run sheerly on USB power.]
BRIEFLY:This inexpensive wire allows for easy transfer of media files - photos, DRM-free music, videos, etc. between a Sony Ericsson phone and any computer that has a USB port.It is very useful for phone users such as myself who are only interested in a 'phone calls only' plan and are not willing to pay the phone company some extra monthly charge for Internet service.It is needed because the Sony Ericsson phones do NOT support a standard USB interface so a 'normal' USB cable will not work._______________________________________EXTENDED DISCUSSION:I'm not surprised my wife's Sony Ericsson's TM506 came without a USB interface wire. It was a 'free' phone and the phone company wished they could nickel and dime us forever through their 'plans' and and make us pay various monthly service fees for the privilege of downloading a couple of songs or uploading photos or videos we made using the phone's camera. The Sony Ericsson's phones lacking a standard USB interface is probably intimidating enough to persuade most users to succumb to the phone company's demand of an extra $10 or more per month for 'web' access. But it does not need to be this way.Since we only wanted a phone that made phone calls this inexpensive wire allows us to squeeze some extra functionality off our free phone by allowing us to transfer media files in and out of the phone by connecting it to a computer. It's easy, it requires no software installation and we don't need to pay one extra dime to the phone company for the privilege.Positives:- eliminates the need to pay the phone company for an Internet connection- no software installation required- file transfer is actually faster- allows for easy media files transfer to and from OUR computer - all DRM-free files can be easily send to the phone- even users who have an Internet plan may appreciate the ability to connect their phone directly to their computerConcerns:- some minimal computer skills are expected - such as the ability to recognize specific file types and copy or move them to/from specific foldersConclusion: recommended to any Sony Ericsson phone user, with or without a media or Internet plan.
This is the first headset that I ever bought that did not come with any instructions I can not load it on my phone
Not Many HTC one battery cases for sale and this one is pretty good for the price. I would give it 4.5 stars and 5 if the price was $5 cheaper.
I have had this headset for several months now, and not liking much about this headset other than its long battery life. This headset works OK, but the sound quality is poor and it does not function well in conditions other than perfect, ie. no background or wind noise, and very close to handset. I do like the feature of the headset turning off, when boom mike closed because thats where the battery savings comes from. Other than that I find nothing redeeming about this headset, I believe Motorola will discontinue this model because of its severe flaws.
Reader,I've had Sony Ericsson, Logitech Mobile Freedom, Cario Scala 500, Plantronics Discovery 640, and finally this Voyager 510.  Let me just say that my prior favorite was the Logitech but it was a little bulky and it disconnected from my phone after most calls (annoying).Having said that I now enjoy Plantronics Voyager 510.  The higher model, Discovery 640 doesn't stand a chance.  Yes the 640 is smaller, cooler-looking, but the features are not good.  The 640 has no windguard, no noice-cancelling tech, and the talk time is short.  The extra battery charger they give you and try to say that it boosts talk time does not.  You can't talk and charge at the same time.  Sheesh.OKay, so now with the Voyager 510, I love it.  Great fit.  It seems Plantronics has come out with a new version of the 510.  The foam mic boom is not removeable but is built in much like the logitech is.  The voice and sound quality are top notch.  I've recorded myself and it sounds clear.  I can even notice a difference with the noise-cancelling technology as the tv was on in the background, but my voice was still clear.  Noice-cancelling is important.Pros:Clear, audible soundMic is sensitive and my voice for callers are clearWind-GuardNoise-Cancelling technology (must have!)Fit - stays on confortably and they give 3 earphone-like inserts (perfect)Cons:the only thing is that the mic boom seems to rub up on my cheek or is very close so sometimes it will make a scratching sound for the caller (since it's rubbing against my cheek).  I haven't heard that complaint from other reviewers here so maybe it's unique to me.  I don't have big cheeks so I don't get it.
I love this headset.  It's light, has good voice quality, louder earpiece volume than the phone itself (Mot V710) and the battery outlasts the phone.  A previous reviewer mentioned having to carry 2 chargers.  Motorola makes a Y adapter so you can charge both your phone and headset from 1 charger.  I think I paid under $10 for it but don't quote me.  I love the headset but when I'm in an airport, it picks up the background noise as loudly as my voice.  If it was noise canceling it would have gotten 5 stars.  One last note: My phone doesn't ring when connected to the headset so you must have the headset on to know you have an incoming call.  This is a complaint about the phone though not the headset.Update 03-05-2005I just bought an HS-810 because I keep getting complaints of background noise being louder than my voice.  I like it better but the 820 does have better incoming sound quality.  But all in all, I like the 810 much better.  The flip open design is especially nice.  Search for the HS810 to see my complete review.Update 07-21-2005My Motorola V710 went in the dunk a few months ago so I had to buy a new one.  The new software allows the phone to ring even when the headset is connected.  Much better.
This unit replaced a Motorola HS850 conscripted by my wife :-)It's better than the HS850 in the following ways:1) People hear me better.  Mic is really good.2) When the unit fits properly, audio amplification is betterIt's worse than the HS850 in that:1) it doesn't fit as well.  I find myself readjusting it throughout the day2) It doesn't synchronize instantaneously with my MPX220 like the HS850 did.  It always syncs eventually (15-60 seconds).Battery life is a tie.  Both are OK, but not as long as I would like (I've had to recharge mid-day a few times.  1-1.5 hours of talk appears to be the limit).
Does what it is supposed to and comfortable to wear.  The only downside is there is a slight whooshing sound in the ear piece, may or may not be caused by the phone.
Sound quality is pretty good.  The wind "technology" is not bad.  Stong winds, blowing sand etc,  is going to get heard with this.  But for the price it is comfortable.  For someone who has to buy special adapters to get Blue tooth devices to stay in my ear I am impressed with this.  I wish it had a call end button on the thing.  But the mute button is great.  I would buy this again.  And i like it almost as much as my jawbone.  Paring is not an issue with wired devices.....  ;)
Its rubberized doesn't look like it in the picture but it is It's really cute I love this case used it for awhile but I switch out cases like I do my shoes.
A few months ago, Sabrent sent me several samples of car inverters to try out, and I have been pleased with all of them so far. This review is my honest opinion.As I have mentioned in a previous review, these power inverters are not new and have been around for many years. Still, with mobile devices spreading like chicken-pox at a kindergarten, I have seen an upsurge in the amount of USB-charging inverters on the market. This particular charger offers dual USB charging (1A and 2.1A ports) as well as a standard power socket. Let's cut to the chase: this inverter functions excellently.Form is the only area I have to take issue, and it's not Sabrent's fault. My 2003 Subaru Outback has the AUX power (cigarette lighter) low down on the console, right behind the shifter, and with this inverter plugged in it's actually quite dangerous for me to have USB cables sticking out. If you're in the same boat as me, I highly suggest another inverter from Sabrent, also 150W:Half a star was taken off for the bulkiness of this product, another half star was taken off because I find the LED to be too bright and rather distracting during night-time driving.If you have the space, this is an excellent converter and a solid price. Recommended for most, reservations for some.
I only trust HTC accessories for HTC phones having bad luck with aftermarket products that are cheaper, but cheap is expensive.
we've had it a month and it's working great. wish the cord was a little longer but it's much longer than the one you get with the phone.
Honestly I have always loved this specific model, since you can just take it with you on the road not worrying if you end up losing it or leaving it where ever you go. Though it doesn't exactly meet the fast charging needs of high end phones, it works pretty well on all of them, you just need to be patient.
Have been using this unit for over a year and for the most part, I like it.Pros: Easy BT connection to my LG VX8300.  Easy to carry in your pocket.  Simple to use. Light. Great range. very good battery life. Like the 'flip open the mike to turn it on' feature.Cons: I have trouble hearing people when there's a lot of ambient noise due to the lack of an earbud that goes in the ear.  For this reason, my next BT headset will definitely be of the 'earbud' design.  Always feels like it's about to fall off, but generally doesn't - still distracting.  A little trouble maintaining a good connection with the phone when my phone is close to my body in my belt holster or pocket (though this could actually be a problem with the phone's BT antenna being in close proximity to my body).  It never has a problem if my phone is sitting on a table even when I'm 20-30 feet away.Overall, a good headset.  But after only a year, I am having trouble getting the charger to connect and the shroud around the ear speaker has come off.
I had a RAZR V2 and it was the best cell phone I ever had so I up graded to the RAZR V3 late last year (2007).  The RAZR V3 is by far the worst cell phone that I've owned.  It is beautiful and has great features but it keeps failing I have had 5 of these phones so far (the original purchased one plus 4 refurbished replacements) 1st phone: after a couple of months the screen would not light up / 2nd phone would not charge from the get go / 3rd phone after about a month the screen would no longer light up / 4th phone after a couple of months the screen would not light up / 5th phone has been working for about a month now.  I really like the RAZR phones, WHEN THEY WORK but this V3 model has been terrible and I would rate it lower than 1 star if possible.
They look good and stick good! I just don't like the rounded shape because I was always bumping it and Siri kept popping up and it was irritating. I just won't buy a product like this again
This phone was purchased with the T-Mobile plan to replace a Nokia phone with AT&amp;T.  I changed phones and service because my old phone could not get reception inside of buildings.  I chose the V300 due to the external antennae.  I have had the phone for two weeks now and I have been very pleased.  The reception is a bit tinny sometimes, but overall I have not had any problems with dropped calls.I text message quite frequently and the phone offers you two choices for writing your text.  The first is an intuitive text entry method where the phone guesses the words that you are trying to type and displays them on the screen for you to choose.  This method is supposed to save time, but I have not yet gotten the hang of it.  The second method is the tried and true press each button for each letter method.  My only problem with the phone is that the buttons are not the same shape and are spaced apart which makes text messaging a bit trickier at first.  Plus the numbers and letters which are written on the buttons are very light and I often have to shift the angle of the phone in order just to read the buttons.  The light text might also be an issue for someone with vision problems.Overall, I would recommend this phone.  The only reason why I gave it four stars instead of five is because I think that Motorola needs to darken the text on the buttons for those users who like to text message or who have vision problems.
This phone is ugly and heavy and has a terrible user interface even for techies like myself.  It also drops calls like crazy here in Manhattan.  The Moto V600 is a much better phone, takes better pictures, gives you better clarity and reception, is smaller, and is much, much cheaper.  Get the Moto V600 if you want T-Mobile.  Stay away from this ugly monster.
I tried this out because my old Bluetrek that I loved died.  Actually, I killed it when I forgot where it was and sat on it.  I was impressed with the advertised battery life, and took the plunge.  Shouldn't have.  While it is SUPPOSED to work in a range of 33 feet, I found that if I merely put the phone on the opposite side of my body, the connection gets fickle.  You get lots of staticy noise if the phone is more than 2 feet from the earpiece and in a direct line of sight.  Sort of defeats the purpose of the bluetooth technology, doesn't it?  And the static is NOT just in your end; my girlfriend complained about it more than I really even heard it.  So if yo get this, be prepared to anger your party on the other line.  On the plus side, the sound is nice and loud in th speaker.  That's about it.  Try something else, like a bluetrek or motorola or something.  I am trying the Motorola next.  This thing is trash.
I've tried and returned at least 5 headsets ranging from $15 to $150. This one was typical of the others that I returned, low volume on the earpiece and low quality microphone. I finally ended up with a Panasonic TCA60 for about $19 which is very loud and sounds great on both ends. It's nothing fancy, no volume control and no mute, but who needs that when you can accomplish the same thing with your phone. Price does not determine sound quality. I recommend this product.
I gave it 3 stars because I was generously sent a bunch of these on only one order.  Otherwise I am not so sure that these work very well.  I have tried on 2 phones and the results have been inconclusive.
I got this for around $30, and it works really nice. My only complaint would be my ear starts feeling sore after wearing it for awhile, and like another reviewer said, it is light enough that it feels like it might fall off sometimes. My husband who is a truck driver said he couldn't hear through it over the noise of the truck, but I can use it and hear through it in my car just fine. It would have been good if it came with a car charger too, but thats just wishful thinkin :)
Since BB battery does not last too long, I plug in my BB car charger into my BB every time I'm in my car. This keeps my BB charged all day long. A must for every BB owner out there.
Bought this to use on a 12 hour car trip and it worked perfectly. The cord is about 5 feet long which is a good length. Had no trouble with it falling out of the psp like some others have commented on. Overall, you cant go wrong buying this product.
This is a good, inexpensive case. I use a case to make the phone less slippery so I won't drop it, and this one does a decent job.
This was definitely easy to install. It can be removed and transferred from one vehicle to another. Adds just enough gain to work great.
Come on Amazon, I can't really believe you are selling this under your own name!
Exactly as described, works perfect using it on my pc or my charger. Couldn't have been any better for my motorola.
This is the original Motorola car charger and is the only one you should consider. It works well and seems to have good protection so that you can start your car with it plugged in without frying your phone or the charger itself.The Motorola logo on the end of it lights up when it's plugged in, which looks very cool especially at night. I was pleasantly surprised by this as well as the performance and build quaility.I can't vouch for the company shipping it out promptly since mine was included as part of my RAZR phone bundle but I would recommend this charger to anyone with a RAZR or PBLE phone.
This wireless headset is a wonderful solution for hands free cell phone communication.  It is light, has plenty of battery capacity, and is very confortable to wear for somewhat extended periods of time.  However, it has its dissadvantages.  As others have pointed out, this headset produces rather low volumes, unless the volume is cranked all of the way up.  It helps if you turn the volume gain up on the cell phone itself, but that causes some echo for the other person that is talking to you.  My wife and I each have one of these headsets, and they are both identical with the low volume output issue.  They also both emit a light "hissing" sound in the earpiece when talking.  Overall these shortcomings are outweighed by the positives of this device.  It is a very useful and feature rich headset, but be warned that the mild hissing and low volume output will certainly be an annoyance at times.  I would still recommend this headset because the cons are far less than the pros.
Given that this is half the price of Twelve South's bookbook case for iPhone 5, I expected to get a cheap imitation here.I think it's fair to say this IS a Twelve South imitation, but it's a close copy of their iPhone 4/4S bookbook style of case, not their iPhone 5 bookbook case. (The new Twelve South iPhone 5 bookbook case has a clip to secure the iPhone 5, rather than sliding the phone into the leather holster and securing with the tab at the top.) Personally, I loved the Twelve-South's bookbook case for iPhone 4/4S, but didn't like the new Twelve-South bookbook case for iPhone 5 and I returned mine - it looked cheaply made, it was an extremely tight, awkward fit getting the phone into the clip and the case had large remnants of glue coming out of the over-sized piece of plastic they decided to stick in the (rather enormous) hole they cut for the camera.  This product is better quality than the Twelve South product.  It certainly looks and feels like real leather, although I suspect it may not be (based on its smell).  If it turns out to be imitation leather, that would just be a bonus for me, because I'm mostly vegetarian anyway :-)  If this were the same price as the Twelve South bookbook case for iPhone 5, I would still prefer this BoxWave case.
I STILL USE IT TILL THIS DAY. IT HAS NEVER LET ME DOWN. I LOVE IT. HEADPHONES CAN'T EVEN TOUCH THIS!
This is a nice charger but you can tell it was made cheaply in China.  When it is charging the phone, the car radio gets LOTS of static.  Not so much that I have to stop charging but like when you are near power lines and the radio station is far away.So, no RF shielding.I gave it 4 stars because it works fine for me, but if you listen to the radio, you might consider it is more like 2 or 3 stars.
Good, I was happy with this product.  I got tired of accidentally keeping my bluetooth earpiece in my jean pockets and sending them through the wash, so I bought this and it worked great until I bought a car that had bluetooth built-in.
I've never tried to charge both at the same time, but individually it charges both quite well.  High amp for the ipad, low amp for the iphone.  Great for travel.
You have to hold it in a certain place in other for it to charge. I'll just buy the Verizon  charger instead
Wish it was magnetized but it's sturdy & has the common pieces I need when I'm working on smaller items or electronics. Seems sturdy though only time will tell.
Good product. Quick shipment was provided by the vendor and item was exactly as described. I am Very satisfied with this purchase
I always buy BoxWave cases for my phones, because they are well made, practical, comfortable and good looking. This time I am disappointed, the cuts for camera with flash, S-pen, speaker and microphones are too big and it looks ugly. Plus because the S-pen is in the corner of the phone and the cut for it really big, it doesn't provide good protection at this corner. What if the phone falls on this corner?
The light works exactly as expected.  As long as you are using your headset then the light will indicate that you are on the phone.  I do wish that the lights were a little brighter, or possibly multicolored.  We have an individual in the office that is color blind to red, so that would have been a nice touch.Also for obvious reasons, if you are using your handset, this light is not on.  I wish that the lifter had a feature that recognized when the handset was lifted by hand.  But that is a wish, not a product defect.Overall, I am happy with this device.
Bought this for my daughter  for her phone and she loves it.  Solid case and easily cleaned with soap and water.
Over the last 2 years, I have tried over 10 different models of bluetooth headsets from different manufacturers. By far, Voyager 510 has the best all around performance - clarity, loudness, battery standby time, pairing, static free, ...If I have to pick one negative thing to say it would be the size.  It is quite a bit bigger than some other competing products but it is a small prize to pay for its superb performance.Get one, you'll be glad that you do.
Didn't work for my Galaxy S3 SPH-L710 so in case you have this same phone or just a Galaxy S3 (Verison, AT&T, T-Mobile) doesn't matter. It wont work.
Battery would not charge in iPhone. iPhone shut down after 2 minutes of being powered up. Had to throw it away.
I bought this in hopes that it would help keep the cord situation under control in my car.  However, after only two short months, the cord shorted out.  I ended up buying a different one.
I've bought about 20 of these things by now, and shared them with many friends & family, who rave about them.  It's comfortable and fits in your ear, and the sound quality (especially the noise cancellation on the mic) is *stellar* - you can be driving down a noisy freeway and the person listening to you will *never* know you're in the car.I tried several Bluetooth headsets and was thoroughly unimpressed: you have to charge them, they add latency, they add extra compression artifacts, and the audio clips in and out on you.This headset has the disadvantage of having a wire, but it's also about 1/20th the price of a Bluetooth headset, and won't give you cancer.  (Ever since I got a large benign osteoma in my skull after, suspiciously, 6 months of very heavy cell phone use, I'm a bit paranoid about cell phone radiation).The jack is the smaller size (2.5 mm), which is unfortunate, as most smartphones these days are 3.5mm (so you can plug in a headset or just headphones).  So, once I got a smartphone, I ended up buying half a dozen adapters, because I love this headset so much.
I owned two versions of this unit. One with the Nokia 3650 (apparently the 3650 requires a specific type as compared to some of the other BT phones) and the second one that I currently own is with the Motorola V600.This comparison will cover both Jabra units and will compare them to the Nokia HDW-2 Blutooth adapter as well as the Motorola HS-820 bluetooth adapters.The jabra unit boasts a much better design. The other two sit on the ear and feel extremely awkward. The jabra design provides a much better and more comfortable fit even with glasses on. the other two has flimsy over the ear plastic pieces that feel very out of place.I felt this unit to be relatively easier to use as compared to the other two. I had NO problems teaming either of the units with the 3650. I did have to jump through a few hoops to team with the V600.THE most important reason I wanted a BT adapter in the first place was to due to the fact that i get a phone signal in my liviing room and there is no signal at my desk in the basement which is directly under the living room. The reception was about the same for both (not use-able). I also noticed that when I went around the corner, I would lose the signal. true for all units.All in all, I would rate each one as follows on a scale from 1 to 5:Quality : jabra-4, Nokia-3, Motorola-2.5Design: Jabra-5, Nokia-1, Motorola-1usabaility (range): Jabra-3, Nokia-3, Motorola-3usability (ease of use): Jabra-4, Nokia-3, Motorola-3Overall: Jabra-4, Nokia-2, Motorola-2One thing i did not get to test was the battery life. Jabra did provide a good two and a half days of battery time with a single charge. i did not get to test the battery life of either Nokia or Motorola units.
It really does fit my phone like a glove - looks good - I think it will last a long time.  Worth every penny!  Prompt delivery.  I recommend it to anyone with a RAZR.
It's patent so very easy to scratch. However the case is cute. Seems to fit but phone has slid out on multiple occasions out of case.
Comfort: My main problem with this headset was that it is not very comfortable on my ear.  When I first got it, I couldn't wear it for more than 5-10 minutes.  Now that my ear has become accustomed to it, I can wear it for an hour or so.  It just takes getting used to.  However, I wish I could rotate the headset without rotating the earhook like some bluetooth headsets.  In order to have the headset have a tight grip on my ear (and not fall off), I have to rotate the headset so that it points upwards towards my eyebrows instead of downwards towards my mouth.  It's not really an inconvenience per se, but it looks pretty uncool.  Perhaps I have misshapen ears.Audio: The sound is fantastic.  Only sometimes does it get staticky in my pocket, and not often enough to notice, at least on my end.Ease-of-Use:  This headset was easy to pair with my Motorola KRZR and the main things I do (hanging up, answering calls, and adjusting volume) are simple and intuitive.  Only problem is that if you don't hold buttons for the correct length of time, it can perform the wrong function.  For example, pressing the call button once activates voice dialing, for 1 second redials your last call and 3 seconds turns it off.  I've done my share of accidentally redialing.Battery: I was disappointed when I learned the battery wasn't rechargeable and it instead uses a AAA battery, but the lifetime is very long.  It's supposedly 30 hours or so.  I can't verify that, I just know I've been using it for two months now without replacing it, and it's just a regular Energizer battery.Durability: I carry this around in my jacket pocket most of the time and it holds up well.  I do find myself accidentally turning it on when I lean against something, but I just need to be more careful.
I liked this case a lot until the plastic shell started cracking after owning it for one month. Unfortunately, when you buy it through Amazon, Boxwave would not provide a replacement because I had purchased through Amazon and not directly through them. I liked it a lot but it is now unusable.
i cant say it works because i tryit for a long time on my iphone and it didnt made a difference at all...
The battery life on this unit is great. I can use it daily for an hour or so every day, on a single AAA for at least two weeks. (It appears from other reviews that this can vary a lot.)I use this headset with both a Treo 650 phone, and a Apple PowerBook G4. On the Apple, I can use it as a generic output device. (I'm sure the same goes for other headsets.) The signal is strong enough on the Apple to use it from about 30 feet away; on the Treo 650, the signal is not nearly as good.The sound is OK. It's not the best. If it's noisy -- e.g., like driving, or in a hotel room with the air conditioner fan blowing full-blast  -- OR if the person on the other end is not talking very loudly, then it's sometimes hard to hear.It'll drop audio -- i.e., the call goes back to my cell phone -- when the battery is getting low. You can milk it a while longer, but that's really your first clue about the battery.The earpiece is OK; it's not as secure as I'd hope. If you're outside in a gust, you may want to hang on to it.Also, people on the other end sometimes can tell I'm on a headset with this one -- they mention that I sound a little staticky.This is my first bluetooth headset, so perhaps my rating is higher just because it's a nifty gadget. But the battery life on this is really the winner -- my work-mates have rechargeable headsets, and it seems like they're always having to charge them. I use rechargeable NiMH AAA's, and they just last a really long time with this unit.
fast delivery, works well. Not very long.
I have not used this as of yet , however, my wife has without issue.I have the x50 headset and she has the voyage, it works on both really well.
I don't see what others have liked about this.  It doesn't add any value -- doesn't make the phone easier to carry or use, doesn't add significant protection, or do anything else.  I'd recommend getting a pouch with a slide-on clip, that holds the phone horizontally on your belt or waistband.
I had a Samsung X427 before this and it was awful. Dropped calls, poor reception, wouldn't hold a charge. This phone changed my opinion completely. It does everything I need and then some, and the camera/video is a bonus. The only downside and the difference between 4 & 5 stars was that it did not behave well with my Jabra EarWrap-the remote button did not work-and the speakerphone is a joke. But speakerphone is not really what I needed, it was reliability and function.Really a far step forward-I recommend it for anyone needing a reliable phone.
Bought this for my new AT&T; Galaxy SII, the case arrived super fast, its fits the phone perfectly and snug. I have no issues with any buttons, and the rubber is in a smooth, sort of laminated finish. It does not stick to your pockets. Overall, I am extremely happy with the purchase, especially for so cheap.And just FYI: This is for the AT&T; (i777), or International (i9100) Galaxy SII.This WILL NOT FIT Sprint, T-Mobile or the AT&T; Galaxy SII Skyrocket phones. You've been warned.
This is my second headset replacing the Motorola one that came with my cell phone.  People I call tell me that the sound is very clear on their end and cannot tell that I am using the headset - sounds just like I am talking into the phone.  That was not the case with the first one. I travel a lot and wear the headset for long periods.  My ear does not get tired or sore from having it on.  The headset seems well balanced and never seems like it is going to fall off regardless of what I am doing.  I also like that it folds flat for easy carrying in my shirt pocket.
Don't expect more but it works well for the reason you buy.I was looking for a cheap skin case and was not willing to pay a hefty amount for the case at least for the initial period after buying my unlocked galaxy s II.Din't Expect much before buying.But it really does work well.4 $ with 2 day shipping free is really a good deal if you are looking for a perfect tpu case protecting your phone.
This is my second voyager 510.  The first one I had was great, but the charge wasn't lasting anymore, so I ordered this as a replacement....very disappointed with the clarity of the unit.  Lots of static in the background on my end.  People on other end don't seem to hear it, so I just deal with it.
This headset proved to be a very pleasant surprised after tryinga bunch of others.  Was definitely the most comfortable, hadgreat sound and actually fits in your ear.  Variable ear piecesare a great touch and this unit should fit larger ears better.Sound quality was very good.  Only downside is slightly hardto manipulate buttons.  But this is minor.If you've tried a bunch and can't get a good fit, try this one,it'll probably work - did for me.
I highly recommend this for anyone using a cordless home phone.  While I am a fan of bluetooth, this seems to be easiest for use around the house.
This tool set is better than expected. The machining and finish is very good. If used for small electronics and similar applications, this set should be durable.
Our office phones lifters stopped working so I decided to take a chance on these lifters instead of having to order a whole new headset and so glad I did.  They work great!
I've had this headset for about almost a year and it works flawlessly. It is quite comfortable to wear with right size ear bud. Only complaint I have is it's bit too large.
Perfect slim close fitting case and is well worth the money. The razr remains very thin since this case is wellcrafted. No bulk here and extremely stylish. Krusell makes the best cell phone cases in the world.
Works great on ear buds. I bought these to put on my basic ear buds and have them fit more comfortable so I can wear them longer. Great for wearing in the car during long drives.
It works great  thus  far no issues.  The only thing i might have limited was a usb Connect or it charges my t989 without fail
Since there is no rubber to "gasket" your ear, noisy environments can make it hard to hear. i.e. in you car.
This is another great product and i will always order from here in the future. money spent well!! If you need a great car charger this is the one you need!!
This is a very nice phone.  Much nicer than my Razr V3 that I returned 3 times because of the high pitched whining noise... if you can live with high pitched static when answering calls (yes, this only happens when answering... NOT when making an outside call).  I like the color (and toying with changing the face plates) and the functionality with great battery life.  Its camera is pretty descent as far as cell phones go.  It is clear and works.  It is not super fancy, though it has a lot of fuctionality.  I am a bit disappointed that T-Mobile and Motorola don't have more choices right now, as I would have been happy to buy them.  Anyway, if you want a good phone with Bluetooth (BT), then this is a very good one.
Great wind noise reducing headset.  Works well in any condition. Light weight even though it appears to be bigger than some units.  Most comfortable fitting headset I've ever used. If I had one negative thing to say it would be that sometimes people tell me that I need to speak up while using the device but that is very rare and could possibly have to do with me and not the device itself.
I bought this headset to work with my Audiovox SMT5600, not listed by Jabra as compatible, but I took the chance anyway. The headset, which I purchased online, arrived with no instructions, but did include the charger, charger cord, belt hook, and several earbuds. A quick search online discovered the manual and pairing was accomplished shortly thereafter. All functions of the headset, including vibrating ring and voice dial, work with my phone. Sound quality is generally excellent -- it's at least as good as the phone's earpiece. All bets are off if you're out in the wind or driving with the window down, precisely the same conditions under which you can't hear the phone's own earpiece either. External noise such as a crowded restaurant doesn't seem to be a problem for my combination of phone and headset. The short boom mike seems to be acceptable -- nobody has complained they can't hear me. In fact, I can talk pretty softly under most circumstances and be heard just fine. External noise such as a crowded restaurant doesn't seem to be a problem for my combination of phone and headset. The battery is advertised to last a long time and it does. I haven't measured any run-down times, but the headset needs to be charged less often than the phone, which with bluetooth on needs a charge every couple days. The headset is light and, for me, comfortable; after wearing it 12 hours a day for the first several days I forget it is there. The headset is reversable by the simple expedient of rotating the earbud. The dorsal sping of the headset contains one button and one rocker switch. Because of the location of the switches they do not need reversing. The rocker controls volume up and down; the button combines on/off and answer/hang-up. Press the button to answer or hangup, hold for about 5 seconds to turn off/on. My phone hangs up when the other party disconnects and conveniently, so does the headset. The headset slips into the charging cradle like a knife into a holster. An accessory clip attaches to the charging cradle so you can hang the cradle (unplugged, of course) on your belt or waistband to carry the headset when it's not being worn. With practice, the headset can be put on with one hand. There is no provision for charging in an automobile, which would be inconvenient were battery not so long-lasting. Just pop the headset into the charger in the evening and you're good for the next day. On an extended trip the charging cord and cradle must accompany the traveler.  Other than the lack of a car adapter, which can be remedied aftermarket, my only complaint is that the headset is somewhat wobbly on my ear and the ear bud occasionally works itself away from my ear canal. This is not always immediately apparent until a call is made/received. This is aggravaated by the fact that there is no way to adjust the headset, it being constructed of a plastic shell with a soft lining against the ear. Even the flexible shaft holding the ear bud does not adjust side to side.  The headset is rated for up to 30 meters; this does not include walls or other obstructions. Jabra recommends you wear the headset on the same side that you carry your phone. Practice proves this. Lack of adjustability aside, this is a good headset with outstanding battery life. It's available at a reasonable price and, thus far, no other headset has wooed me away.
The last bluetooth device I owned had poor reception. The sound quality on this device is clear enough to hear in my car with the windows down. I would recommend to anyone.  Great ear piece!
Product quality of this item is very, very poor.  After charging my phone for 15 minutes the charger began to overheat and the charge on my phone started to fail.  Had to return this item for refund.
I have been very happy with this headset.  I use it with a Motorola RAZR V3.My last Bluetooth headset was a Jabra, and it broke after just a few months -- the power button quit working, so it was always on until the battery drained.I love the HS850 since it has no power button!  Instead, you just flip it open or closed.  It gets great battery life, since it's so easy to put it in standby by flipping it closed.I have also used this headset successfully with Skype on both Windows and Mac.  The only catch is that it can only be active with one device at a time, so you have to disconnect/release it from your cell phone, before you can successfully use it with Windows or Mac.  This makes switching back and forth between your PC and phone a bit cumbersome.  Of course, it took a couple of hours to get it working under Windows, but it worked first try on the Mac ;-)
My wife uses this at work and had been using this for a year and it still works. I normally buy every 3 months because she breaks them. This is the only one that lasted more than 3 months.
Adds too much bulk to my phone, hence I purchased a different case.  Also unlike the pictures on the site, the buttons on your phone will be covered.  The areas on the case where the power button and volume rocker are located are covered by plastic.  Not good in my opinion.  Makes it harder to press those buttons.  Might be preferred by those looking for a good amount of protection for their phone.
Had a mix up with getting the item and slow shipping but it was all resolved in the end so I am satisfied with the purchase
I have to think that some of the other reviewers have older phones, and therefore problems with the unit. It's my first bluetooth headset, but I couldn't be happier.P.S. People dissin' it because it doesn't work 25 feet from the phone or because it doesn't stay on your head when jogging? I guess I'm not as adventurous with my cell phone as some others...
I tried two (yes, two) batteries and had to send both back because both were crap. I finally decided to spend a bit more hoping it would equate to more quality. Well that seems to have paid off (third time's the charm I guess). The battery itself replaced my old battery perfectly. It holds a charge well and reads the correct battery percentage. The included tools were a bonus. I already had a set of tools from replacing my wife's battery a while back. However these were much better. The old tools I had were stripping the tiny screw heads. This set of tools gripped the screw heads perfectly. Overall I'm very happy.
couldn't be happier with this. and those who are embarrassed by its "large" size may want to consider being less insecure.
I've been a loyal BoxWave customer for years. The quality, price, value, and dust free installation are unbeatable. These shields do a great job at protecting ALL of my electronics and also hold up well to scratches so that I don't need to even replace them. Could not be happier.
very good charger, it woks fine, no complaints!!! I would recommend it!! It was good, but not using it anymore!
This is a great hub and has been good for several months. Highly recommend and will buy it again for additional needs.
This is the 3rd "OEM" battery I bought via Amazon Marketplace -- as with the others, it was terrible. I ordered form the OEM shop a BR50. They sent a BR56 which is supposed to be even better with 3 hours talk time. It did not last 30 minutes after a complete overnight charge. Nowhere as long as the battery I am trying to replace which lasts over an hour instead of the original 2 1/2 hours.OEM sent a counterfeit fake battery --- not OEM. How can you tell? Because Motorola OEM batteries are made in Japan. These say clearly that they are made in china. I had the same problem and returned the same battery from Wireless Phone Accessories and Batteries4Less.AMAZON_- you should be screening these sellers and addressing these issues. There are a ton of posts under every single one of the Motorola Razr battery listing that say they got bad or counterfeit batteries.Theses companies make their money by selling junk, counting on the Amazon customer not to feel it is worth the hassle to return it. For every one I have to return I lose an hour of my time. My time is worth more than th $10 I get ripped off for. But I do it anyway b/c hopefully at some point AMAZON is going to take responsibility for the conduct of their market sellers. AMAZON's new logo is to become the most customer centric company on earth. Well AMAZON, you can start here: Bargain Cell -- which is one of the worst offenders, Wireless Phone Accessories and now the OEM Shop -- what a joke for a name for the last one since clearly they KNOW they are selling counterfeit batteries.I paid $30 for one from batteries4less hoping to get the real deal -- I got the exact same batter I got from the OEM shop -- the exact same counterfeit. So it has nothing to do with the price paid. Just dishonest online sellers.
I bought this thinking I was walking into a bad deal. However, it has been a great battery. I must say, for the price, I was extremely well pleased.
I lost the charge for my Motorola RAZR V3, and I found this cheap one, surprisingly, it works so great that i asked my frds whoever lost the charger to buy from eforcity
I set my phone down on my computer desk for 10 minutes and I checked the Signal Strength on my Droid X and it read -87 dBm. After putting the Universal Cell Phone Antenna Booster on the inside of my batter cover I set my phone in the exact same spot for 10 minutes and It read -83 dBm (closer the number to zero the better the reception). So I guess it works a little bit. Check out the picture I posted of the signal strength before and after.
This is my first bluetooth headset so I don't have anything to compare it to, but so far it seems to be pretty good. It's small, very lightweight, and comfortable. It's hard to judge the comfort of this device unless you try it yourself because everyone's ear and head are different.I'm using it with a Motorola Razr V3m from Verizon. It paired easily and quickly. The connection is a little crackly even right next to the phone, which surprised me, but it's not so bad that it takes away from a conversation. Naturally, the further you get from your phone the reception deteriorates. Volume and clarity are fine and sound just like holding my phone up to my ear.Overall it's a good headset and fine for my purposes. Only a few drawbacks: the volume and call buttons are a little hard to manipulate, and it would be nice if the unit could be held tighter against my head.
Overall, I think that it's a safe investment in a mobile phone. One sad thing about cell phones is that they improve so quickly, there's always a race to have the best.Right now, this phone is one of the best, without the 300+ pricetag. If you're paying 300 for it, you aren't getting a good deal.Clear reception, included ear piece is more comfortable than the generics that come with a phone like the R225 Samsung.Great display. Only downside is the wiping it off thing. Oils form your skin and ear show up easily on the pristine surface. Very clear pictures and nice graphics.I give it a 10 out of 10.
I bought this from Amazon. I linked quickly and worked as advertised.  I found the various button modes difficult to keep track of and found it a real problem over time.My biggest complaint is that this device is too too quiet at maximum volume.  Obviously Motorola did not test their design in a car that had some road noise.  I found it only adequate in a quiet room.  I suspect it is the fact that the speaker is a long way from the ear canal.  I am wondering if an in ear type will be better in the long run.Save you money on this one if you plan to use it in a car.  It is fine if your sitting in quiet room.
I like the look of this headset, and I really like the fact that flipping the boom turns it on and off instantly.However, the Motorola HS850 performs much worse than my much older Logitech Mobile Traveller Bluetooth Headset.  Everyone I call indicates that I sound muffled, and callers typically ask me to discontinue the use of the headset.  Also, the earpiece speaker is not that loud, so it is rather hard for me to hear callers when there is background noise (e.g., in the car).I just purchased this a couple of weeks ago.  I am giving it to a friend and ordering a different one (Plantronics Voyager 510?).
it works and it works well. i go through chargers pretty quickly so im hoping this one will hold up. so far, so good! the wire is thick and its well put together! as far as im concerned, its well worth the small amount
I started using this headset two days ago.  Sound is good.  You can speak at a normal volume level and you will be heard.  I don't use it outside though.  The earplug does give you a sense of being underwater, the way it blocks your whole ear canal.  But that's how it blocks out noise.  I do think for the money there should be some sort of volume/mute control on the cable.  But, I knew there wasn't when I bought it.  My only complaint is that it comes with a case, yet the headset doesn't fit in it without bending the microphone stalk and I'm not comfortable doing that.  It's sensitive equipment, with a filter in the earpiece that I know I'll have to change eventually hence the included tool for same, then it shouldn't be left in the open to collect dust.  Why not give a case that accomodates it and its accessories?UPDATE 4/30/08:  After months of using this headset, I have to say I find it mildly annoying.  You feel like you're hearing something under water, because the thing is so jammed in your ear (it's a little bit violating...).  I wouldn't recommend it to anyone shopping for a headset.  I really bought it because it was so hard to find a headset compatible with my AT&T; 8525.
I could NOT get it charge. Did not sent it back because it would cost more to ship it back than I paid for it. I ask for help on this and got no where. But I did order Nokia BL-5C and it works great.
This one came in broken  The bottom pice snaps on to the sides and the main backing is a inlay piece. Came in scuffed with paint and the pieces will not click in together. If it was not broken I would like it. Also if it wasn't in three click in pieces
This handset lifter is great.  It works exactly as I expected it to. It also arrived when I expected it to.
I've had this unit for about a year, it acts as an ear plug on the ear I'm wearing it on, and I can hear my caller even in strong winds. The audio quality is great. Since the microphone sits directly in front of my mouth the caller can hear me just fine and many times they don't know I am in the car. Since it's a wired unit, there are no batteries to charge and it's always ready to go. If you don't mind things in your ear this is a great head set.Update: Moved to an I-Phone from my Palm phone. I had to get a 2.5mm adapter to 3.5, The phone does not see the headset most of the time and won't route calls to it. Same with Blackberry Curve. I hope sure will make a new model for these phones, I miss using it.
arrive on time, good quality, functionally, recomend to protect the samsung galaxy S 2 I9100, fit exactly , recomend to the owners of this smartphone .
This case is great quality and nice Grey color. I have only had it one day so no long term review yet.
GOOD PRICE AND IT WORKS FINE SO FAR . I ALWAYS CAN USE EXTRA CORDS FOR MY CELL PHONE YA KNOW THANK YOU AMAZON...
Works Great, a very useful accessory for any wireless headset and the Amazon price is right compared to what Plantronics wants!!!
Excellent sound quality and easy to pair. Looked just as the ad said and the shipping was right on the money.
I was looking for something different to my wife and this case its strong and beautiful. Good price and i recommend it.
Very clear transmission of calls both incoming and outgoing.  Easy integration with current phone system. I would buy again if needed.
Bought a couple of this for my wife's ipad cause it wont charge on the regular usb port in my car. This worked great.
Like so many other reviewers, I had this Think Outside Stowaway "collecting dust" as I had bought it for an older phone.  I was actually looking on Amazon for a foldable keyboard and came across this and these reviews.  So I found my Stowaway (quicker than I thought I might!), did not load the software that came with it (as the instructions tell you to do), but just decided to see if it would sync with my Playbook.  First, of course, I had to put 2 AAA batteries in it and, VOILA, it worked!!!  I am a happy camper!!!  As another reviewer said, it is surprising that some other manufacturer hasn't continued this concept in folding keyboards.
I'm a great believer in spending as little as possible on glitz,bells and whistles, and generally go for performance and practicality. Sound quality and features are fine for the price.  But the unit is quite difficult to wear -- the boom is wide and boxy; the weight is unbalanced, as well.  I could not get a comfortable fit.  My ear is well within normal range of size and shape, but was bent out of shape by the headset.On the positive, wind noise and lost connections -- common criticisms of other BT headsets -- was not a problem here.  If you don't care about medium to long term fit and comfort, or the aesthetics of walking around with such an large unit hanging off your ear, you may be happy with this headset.  I wasn't, and am returning it.  I'm going to give the Cardo Scala a try;  if it's no good, I'll probably go with a Jabra, and spend a bit more money.
This unit has been very reliable over the last three years.  I've lost one and worn out the replacement.  It has suffered much abuse.  Even the slightest breeze makes it unusable, thats my only complaint.  Sound quality is very good and the ear piece fits me very well.
I got this case for my nephew, and he claims that it was not what he expected. He has a charge case for his last phone, and it covered the whole thing. This is just like a back of the phone replacement, so it doesn't add to much weight
It's ok but doesn't have enough range connection with the phone. If I walk a few feet away you get a lot of static. It's only good if you keep the phone right by the headset. It's great when driving in the car but not for walking around the house. I guess my advice is keep your phone in your pocket. All-in-all it's good for the price.
As everyone else says, it sounds very clear, comfortable, and sounds crystal clear for the people listening to you.  It sounds better than my phone itself.
I ordered a cell phone from Amazon, the Motorola V3. When I checked my account the next day, a weird message told me that I was not approved, and instructed me to cancel my order. I was puzzled, but did as directed. Later that day, I went and got a great deal on a free phone from my local membership warehouse store.Later in the day, I was checking my e-mail and found one from Amazon. It explains that sometimes cell phone approval is slow and included the following:"Until this is resolved, it is possible that the information in the"Your Account" section of the Amazon site will incorrectly indicate thatthis order requires your attention and may direct you to cancel - pleasedisregard this until we get more information."WHAT???!!!They tell me to cancel the order, knowing that this is incorrect???Well, I followed their screwy directions, and they lost an order and alot of goodwill on my part.Amazon has been successful, they must know what they are doing, but this kind of behavior makes you wonder...To new cell buyers, BEWARE the incorrect message.
Well, went on the internet first....$14.00, then to a very well known store, here in Gloucester, MA, $28.  I was not happy.  Then, of course, I knew Amazon would come up with something...they did, $4.00 and change...it arrived promptly.  I cannot say enough about Amazon, they are realistic in their prices, knowing that people do not have that kind of money to pay for a wire,,for 14 or 28 dollars. I have never been so happy to get what I need without spending my last dollar for it.  Thank you again and again.
I really like this hub.  I have an Acer One Netbook, and I use this hub to power my cd/dvd external drive, my laptop cooler pad, and my 1tb external hard drive.  My cooler pad also has a few usb ports, and I have a 4-in-1 memory card reader plugged into that.  Everything works fine.  Sometimes I have to unplug my cd/dvd drive to get the netbook to read it properly.  I had that same problem with another hub though, so I think it's the drive.  It works more often with this hub than with my other though.This is very small.  The main picture makes it look huge, but it's really palm sized. I took it with me on vacation, and it fit just fine in the carry-on.  You don't need to keep the stand on it.I also like the one port in the front for when I need to plug in a usb drive.
I heard about these on Twit.tv / Macbreak weekly. They gave it high praise so I picked up a few. I now have them in all cars and they work fantastic. Two ports, one high Amp one normal and a small for factor make this a winner.
Considering how old the phones that use this type of battery are, I am not surprised that I received a used battery. I am a little mad at the fact that the product listing said these batteries would be new though. The battery I received holds the charge for about a day, which is the same as my old one.Disappointing indeed.
worked wonderfully with the cellular phones.  the charger seemed to charge the phones quickly, never ran hot like prior charger.
I read a lot before buying this headset and was kind of nervous because some bad reviews I read but I must say it was worthy because this headset is really good, I can hear perfectly when using it, it doesn't hurts my ear or anything, I don't use it like everyday so the battery has last for almost a week so far. I have a samsung captivate and didn't had any problem pairing it and using it.5 stars!
There are better chargers out there but I like the feature of having the dual charger outputs with one fast charger.  My wife and I grab this charger anytime we travel.  It works in the car and at home.
As always with these types of case you get what you pay for but at this price, you can buy several and change them out and have something different almost weekly
I used the Motorola H500 before and the sound clarity is not as good as the Jabra BT250v. So I bought this product June 30 to replace my H500. Received it July 11th. The person in the other end of the line noticed that I sounded clearer and louder. Used it while driving to test sound clarity and it passed. My Jabra250v was just used for minutes of light usage (3 hours max in 7 days), but the headphone stopped working August 15. The person on the other line can hear me fine, but I don't hear anything from the headset. I asked Amazon for a refund or replacement, but Al from from customer service emailed me this, "Unfortunately, more than 30 days have passed since you received this item, and we are not able to provide a replacement. Our return policy states that within 30 days of delivery of your order, you may return any merchandise in new condition, with the original packaging and accessories, or any defective merchandise, for a full a refund or replacement. " Fair enough.He gave me a phone number to the Jabra corporation: 619-622-0764&lt;---this number does not work. So I had to go to the Jabra website and ask them for a replacement and or refund. As of August 17 12:54am EST, I have not heard anything from the company.This could be an isolated case. And for a good brand name like Jabra, I hope it is. But it sucks when you get a faulty piece of equipment. I hope you have a better experience with this product than what I have experienced. Just do know that this product is not free from possible defects.
This case is a little thicker than my old TPU slim case but I expected that and really like the firmness of the material used.  No gaps or flimsy rubber on this.  This is my everyday case now.  Fit and finish as great and feels good in the hand.
These Ear Gels Work Very Well, Comfort Is The Main Reason I Bought Them, Fit The Ear Very Well, The Price Was Right, You Will Not Go Wrong With These Ear Gels, That Is Why I Gave Them Five Stars
A very good car charger for your phones, charged my phone pretty quickly and quite affordable, I recommend it to anyone to have as a back up to your charger.
I purchased this device after reading several reviews and just being focused primarily on price.  I've had it now for 3 days and it is great.  I use a 700w, so despite the other review, this works great with my 700w no issue whatsoever.  Yes it helps it to be on the same side as the phone, I carry my phone in a holster on my side, when I moved it to my left side as I was talking considerable static showed.Volume is great (I was struggling with volume on my wired hands free headsets, but this has no problem with volume.)Configuration, took about 2 minutes, 1 minute reading the manual and another minute doing it.  The manual is about 2 pages, pretty quick and easy, just follow their steps and you are golden.Distance, any further from my hip and it would get more statis, about 2-4 ft it is good, beyond that, forget it.  Considering the price, no complaint about that, my hip to my ear is all I need.
Bought one for me and the wife (diff color;phone, not  wife, lol.). Firefighter work 24 hr shift and never know when if will get to recharge so this is perfect for me and anyone else that can't always plug in to charge each day.
I bought this phone because it was a Editors choice in a leading computer magazine.  I would have preferred the Motorola V3 Razor but that is still far too expensive and I have found that this phone is basically the same as the Razor just not as thin or stylish.Plus points of this phone include:- A beautiful screen. It is large, bright, and has excellent resolution.- very good pictures from the camera.  I can't believe that it is just .3 megapixels... of course you won't be able to blow them up into posters or anything like that but for viewing on a computer or even the occasional 3x5 print the pictures are very good.- excellent sound quality from the speaker so your ringtones and the speakerphone sound great.- very nice construction with a easy to grip rubberized metal trim and back.- the button layout is very nice with a dedicated button for taking pictures and volume buttons on the side.  Also of note is that most of the buttons are user programable.- the phone also has voice dialing and picture caller id (although the pictures are very small and do not appear on the external display)- the bluetooth is very easy to set up and use- it is a true Quad band phone that can be used worldwide (although it has to be unlocked first).- excellent battery life.  I can't believe some of the reviews that say it needs to be charged every day... I find myself charging the phone after about 4-5 days with moderate use.  Of course I have the screen saver turned off and I make sure that the bluetooth is disabled when I am not using it so maybe that is why I have great stanby and talk times.  Also the place where I purchased my phone told me to charge it for 24 hours before the first use (to condition the Li battery) so maybe this has helped to increase the battery life.The Negative points about this phone include:- the blue external display looks cool but I think it would be more visible if it were typical backlit black on white LCD (like on the motorola v180)- the instruction manual (like most Motorola manuals) does not do a good job of explaining all the features so you will have to play with the phone a little bit to fully make use of all that this phone can do.- Even though the pictures from the camera are excellent, the video quality is not so good.  Of course this is a cell phone not a video camera so I guess it is about what you would expect.  Also there is no flash on the camera (unlike some other camera phones) so low light pictures are not that great.- there is no USB port on the phone so unless you want to buy a motorola cable, the only way to transfer pictures to your computer (and mp3's to your phone) is via bluetooth. (HINT: you can get a bluetooth adapter for less than $20 bucks so don't waste your money buying the motorola cable. Also with the bluetooth adapter you won't need any special software to transfer pictures or mp3... just use the software with the bluetooth adapter).- the connector for the charger has the typical motorola design so occasionally you have to jiggle it to get it to fit in just right but make sure that your PRESS the button on the connector before removing it or else you will damage the contacts... this may be why some users are having problems charging their phones- the phone only comes in blue so it does not look as cool as other motorola phones like the v180 or the razorAll in all this is the best phone that I have owned.  User's who complain about call drops and bad signals should be complaining about the carrier and not the phone.  Personally I have noticed that ever since the Cingular and AT&T; merger, signal quality and call quality have both declined.  A Cingular rep told me it is temporary until they are able to better integrate both networks... this makes sense because I have only had this problem since I switched my SIM card to the new Cingular SIM that makes use of both networks.
Pro'sUnit has great range.Comfortable in the ears, can wear it all day.Battery life is awesome.Mute function make this very useful for someone that spends a lot of time on the conference calls.Con'sLasted two months and now will not turn on anymore. Trying to get motorola to fix it, but no help so far.Audio books may have issues. The headset will cut out during short pauses and makes you lose out on a few seconds of the story as it reconnects. Only certain books caused this behavior.If it did not quit on me I would certainly recommend it as a phone headset.
I work for Verizon Wireless in their tech support department and I have yet to use a better Bluetooth headset. I've owned 4 over the last year; a Jabra, a Motorola, this one and another Plantronics. And I've used several different ones over time in the testing process, and this is easily the best I've used. The earlier Plantronics was also very good as well. The Jabra didn't have very good noise-reduction and the Motorola was a terrible purchase altogether. But this headset I can say with ease is superb. Great sound, it picks up very little in the way of ambient noise, and the charge lasts forever, seemingly!UPDATE: When I originally purchased this device over 2 years ago, I di have to replace it back in July. Why? Because I had it in a messenger bag that got stepped on. I used it just about every day, and the only reason I had to get a new headset is because it was physically damaged. Guess which headset I got to replace it? THE SAME ONE! If the previous one worked for over 2 years and only stopped working because it got stepped on, then this is the one I'm sticking with for as long as they make them.
I bought this because of all the positive reviews and was surprised when it was not very good but Plantronics does not support my cell phone the Treo 755P. It would have been nice to know this from the web site prior to purchasing. I love the sound quality of the Jawbone but it does not fit me-and many others.The hunt continues and Plantronics says it does not have any bluetooth headsets for the 755P!Caveat emptor!
I just got the Treo 650 through pre-order the other day after using the Treo 600 for over a year (and 4 replacements ... the 600s just kept breaking). It is a dramatic improvement and I love it.The screen is now high res and looks incredibly clear, the Bluetooth works wonderfully with the wireless Jabra headset. When a call comes in simply hit answer on the phone and the call comes through the headset. I don't particularly like the comfort fit of the Jabra on my ear so I will probably be looking at other alternatives as well.The camera is now actually good enough to take snapshots you would keep. Almost as good as some of the low end digital cameras.  A few of the critical buttons are placed more intuitively.Initial setup went pretty smoothly, so far, it seamlessly upgraded my old Treo 600 software and imported all my contacts and calendar as well as almost all my applications.  The Sprint phone rep that activated my phone actually seemed to be quite knowledgable.The only real CON is that the Treo 650 Hotsync cable connector is big and clunky compared to 600. IMHO they made a backward step by replacing the sleek original Treo connector with the Tungsten design connector. It requires a separate power supply to charge.  I have been used to charging my Treo 600 through the single USB hotsync cable to my laptop.  This extra power connection is a messy annoyance.  The upside is that since the battery is removable I can have a spare charging elsewhere.Overall opinion is that I wouldn't even consider returning to or buying a Treo 600 now that the Treo 650 is available.
I'm here to let you know; everything you are hoping this product to be, it is. The cord is healthfully long and the sound quality is very good. The retractable cord makes it very convenient to keep out of the way.
1st month, very good. 2nd month, dropping calls and no one can seem to hear me.  It was like I was not on a wireless bluetooth.  It was bad having to always disconnect this because everyone on the other line could not hear or understand me.  I replaced this after 2 months with the Samsung WEP and have had no problems.  Not worth it.
Was here right on time.Wall adapter what I expected and works well but dose Not Have Quick-Charge As This ad states and that was the,Whole reason I chose this chager so that is horribly disappointing and inconvenient ..... The micro usb is useless it looks and acts cheaply made, and dose not fit well in to ports an either end will periodically stop working and my phone will freeze and turn off periodically as well....I know its the usd because I tried it in several devices and adapters and it had the same problems....I Will never order from Amazon Again Only two orders out of 13 have come without Defect or Wrong Probuct!Ugh!
This very high quality retractable cable will retract to as long as 32 inches (I measured this). And it will easily retract back into the holder making the length of this whole cable unit at just 4.5 inches, which is PERFECT FOR TRAVEL. For me, I purchased 3 of these (the maximum that is allowed in one order). And I am so pleased with these I hope to order more later on.You may wonder if the cable part is flimsy...If it is not yanked, rather pulled gently and retracted gently, it will do fine. Remember not ot yank the cable out and it should last just fine.+ The main pro I find over this cable and non retractable cables is you just pull out the length you need, and no more dangling cables!Very highly recommend this as it works well.
Bought case for me and wife to qualify for free shipping. Came in different colors to match phone.  Can go entire 24 hours without charging; but I am not a kid playing games all day long. No complaints or problems. (Personally I wrote another review in the wrong spot since we had diff phones and diff colors I f&%$ up)
I actually like this case a lot. I was worried about the price and it being a TPU and all. I have to say, I have a feeling this one is going to last a lot longer than the Spigen Neo-Hybrid I owned for 3 months before it broke. And even better, I can fit all of my charging and headphone devices perfectly, unlike the Spigen. It doesn't make the case bulky, as it may look. It actually feels quite nice in my hands. Overall, I really like this case. If that happens to change eventually, I will absolutely re-review it!
This is a great case... It fit my phone perfectly and I still use it from time to time. Would recommend
Sidekick II is meant to be your one-stop-shop wireless gadget for e-mailing, web-browsing and IM chatting anywhere you go.  You can also download limited content.  You can also sync with your Outlook calendar and addressbook, but only if you pay extra for a third-party utiltiy program.  Compared to the original Sidekick, SK II is thinner but quite a bit longer.  I also think it's uglier, esp. the new thumb keyboard, but the keyboard is still very useable.  Battery life is terrible after the first couple weeks, requiring you to carry the charger with you all the time.The problem with the whole T-Mobile data service, though, is the poor quality of T-Mobile's GPRS coverage.  T-Mobile is infamous for its sporadic GSM (voice) coverage in the U.S.  When it comes to GPRS (data), it's even worse, and the slightest degradation in reception will cause the Sidekick to go kaputt.  And when that happens, SK has a tendency to fail to re-establish the data connection when signal strength returns.  This makes a very frustrating user experience, esp. when you need Internet access the most (e.g., when you want to log onto amazon.com to compare-shop that big Sharp Aquos LCD TV you are looking at inside a Best Buy store).  Unfortunately, T-Mobile has not improved its coverage or download speed, so if you get the SK, be prepared for slow speed and lost connections.  Once the novelty factor wears off, the SK experience is a rather stressful one.Of course, currently no other device - not even the Treo 600 - has the same portable form factor and useable keyboard as the SK II.  If you are an absolutely Internet junkie, you'll probably find T-Mobile's abysmal coverage tolerable and SK's true wireless Internet access appealing.
This is the first battery case I have had for my Galaxy S4. The S4 fits very well, is slim and doesn't add much weight to the Galaxy S4. It doubles the battery life. You can charge either the battery, the phone or both. There is a handy on-off switch with leds to indicate the level of charge.The battery case came on time and was packaged well. Well worth the price.
Thanks for the quick delivery time. And, it actually is a quality note pad! Mom loves it, it was a replacement gift for another brand from another company that did not work, this one is awesome!
This charger is full 850mA, unlike others advertised here that are only 500. Due to that, it charged all of my USB devices perfectly, especially the ones that don't charge unless it is that high of a power rating.
This thing is a waste of paper, it doesn't give u any better reception. This is a total rip off in my book :-(
This tool repair kit is useful for repairs on a laptop, smartphone, eyeglasses, and anything else with very small screws.
Was about ready to send my Jawbone Era back. Then I ordered the Jabra ear gels. Now I can wear my Jawbone all day! Aliph should include these with the Jawbone headsets. And I intend to tell them! Jawbone Era is awesome too!
Once you get a keyboard for your pda / smart phone, you won't go back. This keyboard communicates via bluetooth and does a great job at turning your small device into a productive tool you won't want to be without. I use this keyboard with my Palm TX and it does a fabulous job during meetings - it's small (smaller than a notebook), VERY portable and reliable. the entire keyboard as well as my Palm PDA fits into the pant pocket of my cargo pants / shorts. You really can't get much more portable than that.To use you invoke a 3-button key combination to help it initiate contact with your device. Once connected, you'll be off and running. My Palm TX will only stay on at 1-3 minute intervals so the only thing I don't like about this combination is that I have to keep hitting a key once in a while so my Palm doesn't shut off. This of course is a design flaw of the TX and not reflective of the keyboard.
This is a great case for the Samsung Galaxy S3 and BoxWave does a great job in making a quality classy durable product.  I love that it incorporates my wallet with my phone so that they are together instead of having to carry it separate.  It provides access to all the buttons, camera, charge slots, speakers and it makes it look not so obvious when it is closed.  Many people often mistake it for a journal, calendar, bible, etc.  I also like that it protects my screen in the closed position.  A great product.
I recently moved to Phoenix, Arizona, and thought it a good time to get a new mobile phone.  A friend recommended Nextel, saying we'd use the direct connect function.  Cool.  So I ordered an i730 from Amazon.  After charging and activating and waiting the required day, I called to get my phone number.  It was a Palo Alto, CA, number!?  That's over 700 miles away!  An 11 hour drive to the next state.  No way close to a local number.  Nextel did not seem to understand or care.  &quot;It's the closest we have.&quot;  &quot;There are no 602 area code phone numbers left.&quot;  I begged for maybe a 480 number or anything that is a local call from here in Phoenix.  Nothing doing.  After a few more days and a few more calls to Nextel that went nowhere, I called Sprint (who have not been customer service stars to me in the past) and within four minutes had a local 602 Phoenix number working on my current Sprint phone.  I canceled the Nextel service.  They are charging me $35 (expected) plus $11.53 in taxes, fees and assessments &quot;we can't change&quot; for a couple of days when all I called was customer service.If you buy the phone, I hope Nextel has a local area code for you, because if they don't you are stuck for $46.53 and an Amazon return.  It was a pretty color screen though . . .
Okay, this little guy ROCKS!  When plugged in to an outlet, it will support 2 HDDs, a external ODD, and a printer with no issues.  Also, during a move I misplaced my power cord, so I called up the company... WOW, for free, the NEXT DAY, they shipped me out a replacement.  I would DEF. buy from them again, and will use more of these as the need arises.Also, it's been quite some time now since the purchase (over a year) and it works perfectly like the day I got it.
Its a charger, its great, it does the job, my kids use it all the time, would buy another, and would recommend.
I used it for less than a week and charged it 3 times. On the fourth try the green light disappeared and it wouldn't turn on.I bought this because i loved the Jabra 250 and I still use it, as a matter of fact.I was just really disappointed that something like this (for the price I paid for it) would just stop working for no good reason.I should've bought the plantronics.Don't waste your money on this.
I like this phone. It feels well made and has a beautiful quality generously proportioned screen; a definite plus for folks who like games on their cells. Although the Amazon listing calls it a Tri-band phone, it is in fact Quad-band. Most importantly for me, it speaks Mac. Using a data cable ( pick up a cheapie on ebay ) it functions flawlessly with iSync for iCal and Address Book. The only thing that I'm not very pleased about is that contact email and addresses don't seem to transfer to the phone ( the only reason I gave it 4 stars instead of 5 ). There might be a way to accomplish this, but I haven't been able to figure out how to do it.But what I really like about his phone is that it functions quite handsomely as a wireless bluetooth modem. My phone uses the T-Mobile network, and combined with the "  all the data you can eat " program ( around $20 a month ) and my iBook with a D-Link BT adapter, and I'm good to go. The set up is a bit complex, but the nice folks at T-Mobile supplied me with the  info.It's controls are very easy to use and it looks great, I live in a signal challenged area, but I have found that the V330 works better then any other cell I have ever owned. The photo quality isn't anything to write home about, though the zoom feature is pretty effective.  Generally speaking I like my cell phones to have data card capacity, particularly for photo storage, but T-Mobile has a nifty Album feature which lets you store your pics online. I was also impressed by this little phone's sound.The V330 is a real winner!
What a bargain.This is my second bluetooth headset.  I waited for a year to write a review because my last one quit working after 3 months due to poor design.  This one is still going strong.  It's easy to use, it recharges easily and quickly and the sound quality is great.
After a week only one side works
First of all, I love the idea of a cordless headset and I have a Motorola phone so I thought getting a Motorola bluetooth headset would give me the best sound quality. I think that the HS850 is a nice design but has flaws the actual ear piece would do better if it sat just inside the ear (Like an earbud) the way it is now sitting just up against the ear makes it difficult to hear your party. More times than not you have to press it against your ear. I also think that the users voice comes out a bit muffled and people complain that they can't really hear you. Lastly this headset needs improvement it terms of cancelling out wind noise. I look forward to future models addressing these issues. All in All I mostly enjoy this device even with the flaws.
This is a good headset; nothing flashy, nothing top-of-the-line, but a good product that does its job. It's not one of the newer A2DP headsets that do audio other than a phonecall, but if you don't need that, it's good for just phonecalls. It's a little bulky, but sturdy and fits well.
I didn't like it but my husband seems to think that it works great for him and uses it often.
"This cable not recommended for this device." That is what I get for an error message. Plus it is really short.
Works fine IF you don't move the phone.  If you handle the phone, the plug works its way out within two or three minutes.  This despite a relatively stiff fit.  Note that the cord that came with the phone plugs in smoothly and securely.  That's my general-use cord now; this one is relegated to overnight charging where the phone isn't being used.
I like the case so far fits ok my Samsung Galaxy S2 I like that is very shiny and soft to the touch. My only concern is one of the corners is not totally covered so it wont protect it from scratches or a hit there that is why I am just giving it 4 stars. Well for the price i think it is ok.
I bought tis booster for my phone because I needed better recepion, I tryed it and it made my phone come in a little better I would buy is product again, if fact I bought one for the whole family.
I have a Siemens SX66 (yes, the PDA-phone that supposedly works with no Bluetooth headset out there), and I'm very happy with this headset.It's reasonably comfortable, has great sound volume, even in noisy environments, people say I sound clear even when in an automobile while driving, and it synchronized right away with the SX66.Most importantly, with the boom mic to flip, you can turn this unit on and off in a fraction of a second.  My SX66 recognizes the HS850 headset within a second (I'm at the latest Bluetooth v1.1 driver from Siemens/Microsoft - I tried applying the patch from Siemens' website, but the phone was already at the latest version).In short, everything works well, and the ambient noise cancellation features seem to work well, according to the people I'm talking to.I haven't run this to the point it has completely lost power - I don't know how long it lasts.  At least 3-4 days of idle and 4-5 hours of talk time.
It was what I expected to be and works fine, thought it might have been a larger gauge of wire?
works great. it is always good to have backup cables and this one works great and replaced my old one.
I must agree with Gary Tuscon's review. For under $5, even though the smallest flat-head screwdriver in here is 1.4 mm (too large for the screws that hold the links on a Seiko women's watchband), the quality is such that I will keep them. The case is very good and labeled very clearly. The screwdrivers have a decent weight as well and the handles turn smoothy.If these came in smaller sizes, with tempered tips that smaller sized tools need to be strong, I would definitely consider them as well.If I had one minor nitpick, it would be that a color-coding of the handles would be a great help, but really, this is an excellent value for the price.
The charger works fine.  It was a great value considering how much they cost in stores.  However, it doesn't retract at all.
I use a nextel i730 and this jabra adapter fits on the back perfectly with velcro. (adapter is approx 1/8 thin)  The adapter has 3 tiny setting to adapt to different phones and I find setting #2 to work fine with my motorola HS820 wireless earpiece. This adapter works on Nextels direct connect and regular phone calls, my last adapter would not do the direct connect. So far I have had the adapter and earpiece on for over 16hrs with out a charge, while receiving many phone calls and direct calls during these hours. Can't wait till Nextel comes out with a bluetooth phone but till then, this is the only way to go!
I have owned several Bluetooth cell phone headsets, and the PLT 510 is the best so far. It fits my ear perfectly, I can wear it for hours without noticing it, and it gives great sound. I had no problem syncing it to my iPhone, and although I haven't tried any other devices, I anticipate no problems.I only have two complaints:1. The on-off switch is very small and hard to use. I find that I have to push it with my thumbnail to make it work. If you have smaller fingers, you may have less of a problem.2. Plantronics uses a proprietary connector for charging, while other manufacturers are switching to mini or micro USB. A proprietary charging interface means one more wire to carry with me.In summary, a great purchase.
I bought these to use with my Jawbone Era bluetooth headset.  The Era comes with 9 different options for ear inserts.  But I always felt like the earpiece was about to fall out, unless I jammed it into my ear so far that it became uncomfortable.Enter the Jabra EarGels...  These made a huge difference.  It fit perfectly onto my ear (the nub on the top goes into the spot above the ear hole).  I could wear this all day.  I wouldn't wear these eargels without having an over-the-ear hook attachment on my Era, but these have made a huge difference for the comfort of my bluetooth earpiece.
This animal is fantastic. Fool that I was I was using a headset with a wire. Every time I turned me head the ear piece would fall out. If I did not turn me head I still had the feeling that this thing was just waiting to strangle me.I reluctantly went to the Motorola HS850 Bluetooth Headset to find what life could be without a wire. All I had to do was initially charge it. The phone did all the rest for me; it located the headset and immediately started to use it. I have it set for one ring tome just to alert me and then it answers. There is virtually no background noise so you have to say "Hello". The voice comes in clear and loud enough to use in noisy areas. However I just tell the caller to hold on and go to a more appropriate location if I am on foot. I do not want to be accused of being rude or talking to my self. When in the car the warning gives I time to turn the radio off and the caller can not detect that I am mobile. Again I try to make care calls curt or call back from a static location. Other mobile commuters do not get offended by me having a hand up to me ear as I change lanes with out signaling.I keep the phone on my belt but never have to pull it out. I seldom make out-going calls however the phone and the headset are designed to make voice dialing instructions and still not have to pull the phone out. At home I leave the phone on a book case across the room and the headset still works well. When I feel like being a recluse all I have to do is fold the headset and it is turned off.
I bought two of these, one for me and one for my girlfriend.  She likes going out without a purse or wallet, but would like to hold her ID and credit card on her, and she does manage to fit both cards in this case, but it is a very tight fit.I use my case to hold my ID card for work.  It is an RFID card that we use to badge in and out of the building.  I always have my phone on me and therefore, always have my work badge on me as well.  The case is very low profile and holds up pretty well.  It doesn't offer a ton of front or top/bottom protection, but if you're looking for a case to take out to the bar, or something to hold a credit card/id, this works great!
This headset was a piece of junk right out of the box. I had nothing but problems with it and threw it away after the first day.
I have used this car charger for the last 2 months. So far all is well. Nice retractable cord. It retracts at the push of a button.
I keep one of these at my office desk and one at home. It provides a great place to locate my cell phone or bluetooth stereo speaker. No clanging when I lay the items down. No strange echo vibrations from hard surfaces. AND no vibrating off the counter - which had happened before without the pad.
Bought to replace another that I bought for my wife a year ago and it is great. Not heavy, stand work the way it should and it fits like a glove. Gives grate stability to the slippery side of the phone and allows for one handed function.
Nothing too special over here.  Just some screwdrivers.  Seem to hold up well.  I used them on my g-shock band, and they worked and didn't strip, so I was pleased.
The BoxWave provides good protection for your Samsung Galaxy Note 2, and doesn't provide near as much bulk as the LiviTech Defender Double Layer Hybrid Hard Case.  I still would recommend the Samsung OEM Case over them all.
It does tear up way too easy. This is my 3rd one. I've tried others and find I go back to it. Problems that have occured: The input jacks bend, short in the cords, and failure to retract as designed. While its a great design, some thing needs to be done so it can stand up to the real world.
I bought 2 of this and tried to test first ... after few minutes of charging, it felt hot. Pulled it out and the product smelled burnt. Tried the other one too and same thing. Be careful... this one could be fire hazard or could potentially destroy the electrical system
Scosche cables are the absolute best.  Clear audio connection which is very compact in size.  I use this brand for all my retractable cables and find their quality to be superb.
I got one for myself and one for my husband.  The sound quality was good on either end, whether I was using it or I was on a landline talking to my husband while he was using it.  He loves it.  I gave mine to a friend.  I have smaller ears so the headset does NOT fit me.  If the ear piece going right into my ear the way it should, the headset rests above the top of the ear and falls off.  If I get it to rest on the top of my ear so it is on securely, the length going to the end of the earpiece is too long and extends below where it is supposed to fit into the ear.  Hubby likes his, back to square one for me.  Those with small ears, you might want to find a different style headset
I had my doubts because this product was priced so cheaply, but it has performed very well now and has given my phone noticeable life.  I would highly recommend this product.
This bluetooth did not last me a year.  I called Motorola for a replacement.  They sent another model and I've been using it for four years now.
This didn't work in my phone. It was rather cheap, I ended up giving it away because it was cheaply made!
this is a genuine motorola charger. Got this charger to have a spare at work for my KRZR. not quite the same intensity as the original one, so it will take some more time than usual to fully charge your phone. not really a problem for me anyway. this item was super cheap and the delivery rather quick.
Pros:1. Compact in Size;2. eye-ball-absorber design;3. Good bluetooth connection (w/ HS820 headset);4. Convinient input keyboard;5. The screen is clear enough to show a vivid picture;Cons:1. battery is toooooo weak. A full charged battery can only last for one day (with normal amount of incoming and outgoing calls and without any other devices connected). A lot shorter than they claimed in the description (6 days in waiting mode)!2. A little bulky compared tp other camera phones(like samsung);3. The phonebook is a little different from all the other brands;4. System freezed up once when I input phone numbers with bluetooth device connected. I have to reset it by taking the battery out;5. No zoom function with the build-in camera; Can't observe the picture from front small screen when taking photos with the phone closed;6. No software; Just one Java game come with the unit. No choiceother than purchasing more on line.
I received the item in a timely manor, but the best thing about this product, was the outstanding response I received by the seller. It was an excellent purchase experience and excellent customer service.  I would buy from this seller again.  I was unable to make the item work with my blackberry 8310, and the seller provided me the opportunity to return it for a full refund, however, my life got busy and the time alloted to return it expired, but that's my fault and not the seller.
This device takes a signal from a wireless headset like the CS540 and lifts up the receiver from your base phone unit. Depending on your phone's angle and the conformation of the receiver, it may work or not. My phone is a Toshiba digital phone and I was able to get this to work only by angling the phone almost horizontally, which makes it look stupid on my desk and also makes it hard to read the LCD and caller ID.Installing it is a bit twitchy, as you have to temporarily mount it somehow on the side of the phone as you play with where it is to sit, and if it's angled correctly. That's because the stickum adhesive is pretty permanent, so you have to decide the optimum  placement before you attach it. I had to resort to duct tape for this step.I'm going to be frank and say I have a love-hate (maybe mostly hate) relationship with Plantronics equipment. I go through headsets lately like nobody's business. My first one lasted 10 years! That was excellent. But the next one lasted 2 minutes (an M22) which only lasted that long because I tap danced on it before I threw it in the trash. The latest is a CS540 which I will review once I have one that doesn't arrive DOA. That's right, dead out of the box. I got it overnight shipped, only to diagnose a bad cable from receiver to amplifier (which will take a week to get replaced.) Nice! Overnight emergency turns into a tech job for me, plus a week's wait. I put all this stuff in the review, because I'm not sure Plantronics deserves their top spot in telephone headset and accessories. We're pretty much stuck using them and I see the quality going down over the years. This lifter is case in point; it's not the swiftest design imaginable. The little extender rod/gripper that is your last-ditch method to get your receiver to hang up is a kludge, in my opinion. Perhaps you've had better results, but I find this thing less than perfect.
I have had 3 phone chargers go bad in two weeks. I can not say where I purchased them. Most chargers for cell phones are cheaply made. This one is OK I guess.
OPERATION: It's like BMW's I-Drive - It does it's job, but has the most unintuitive, overly-layered interface. For example, the memory card is under the battery. The phone must be shut down & taken apart to change the memory card... and turning the phone back on takes a little while. This is representative of the entire phone operation. Not for the impatient.If you've never used an advanced mobile phone before, you might assume this is par for the course, but it simply isn't. Even the instruction booklet is out of order.APPLICATIONS: It has lots of applications and they work very well... when you eventually find where they are and they finally open. No matter how accustomed to the phone you become, too much time is required to get to, open and close applications. On the other hand, one may leave many applications open at once, hide them and return to them just where they left off - similar to a Mac. Me likes.The 6600 has more ameneties than most - World phone, Camera (VGA/zoom/night mode/timer), Video (w/ audio & zoom), Speaker (good sound), Bluetooth, infrared, Modem for computers, electronic wallet, Internet access, Calendar, calculator, converter and more.The phone does not have an Mp3-player, FM radio, 200k+ color screen, megapixel camera, quad band, PDA, photo editor. I'm not sure that a phone w/ these and all of the above features exists just yet. ...I'm not sure I'd want to spend THAT much time w/ a device, anyhow.DEPENDABILITY: I've seen no glitches. I've had no problems w/ this phone.STYLING/ERGONOMICS: The keys are small, which generally doesn't bother me if they are spaced because I can employ a little 'Braille,' but the keys run into each other, so careful attn. must be paid when dialing.As for appearance, well, that's subjective. Few will look at the phone and know it's 'all that'. It's not as stylized as a Sony or Samsung. Less Benz/obvious; more Audi/understated.Although it has chubby hips, the device isn't really so big. Solid, squeak-free, large screen.MEMORY/STORAGE - Seemingly boundless. First of all, the phone houses a great deal of memory for multiple videos, sound clips, photos, texts, etc. Secondly, all info can be sent to a computer and w/o the hassle of USB wires. Still not sure? If you max out the phone memory and have sent all you wish to a computer, there is a memory card w/a good deal of storage as well. This is no small deal. If you're still whining about storage, deleting some games will free-up still more memory.RECEPTION: This really depends on locale & carrier. The 6600 (T-Mobile) is the true 'world phone' in that it has the mhz to operate around the globe, including New Zealand and Australia (900) whereas the  6620 (available from Cingular) replaces it w/ 800mhz (some refer to as 850). The latter will provide better coverage in more remote areas of The States but still operates in many countries, excluding New Zealand and Australia. The 6600 will provide similar service in more developed areas of The States and not as well in more remote areas. As the 6600 uses 900mhz, it operates in more countries than the 6620.The battery life is less than stellar, but it charges w/ the quickness. Remember, this phone uses an operating system - Symbian... and it's feature-rich w/ 65k colors. It films 10 second video, for crying out loud. The battery life can't be very long; let's not be greedy.GAMES - Java. Don't use them, so I delete them for addtl space. In my humble opinion, games, along w/ 'flip phones' belong in the hands of teenagers.IMP: Two important pieces of advice - Visit Nokia's site. There are number of downloads needed/available for this phone & they will be texted to you at no cost. The downloads are for basic and advanced operations.The second piece of advice - Be prepared to spend a lot of time w/ this phone. If you expect to be able to pick things up when you're out and in a rush via common sense, many times you'll end up frustrated. A Sony Ericcson may be the phone for you... but good luck finding one w/ all the features & such a competitive price. Keep in mind that for nearly every screen, there are a number 'along side' and 'beneath' them... for every 'save,' there are choices of phone memory, memory card or sim card.Despite a critical start, this phone deserves four stars because it accomplishes what it sets out to do (which is pretty lofty)... does more than most... does it well... is dependable. It's a high-line Audi, on a Cadillac suspension, at a reasonable price.When you consider expandability (downloads via computer), the numerous features, two transmission programs and multiple storage devices, dependability - this is a phone that isn't easy to out-grow.I would suggest this phone for all but the simple-minded... or those who simply don't need so many features.
The headset sounds excellent.  The earbuds will not aggravate your ears when they are in... even for long lengths of time.  I would definitely recommend these.
Great deal.  Motorola all the way.  Could not touch the same unit for 3x more.
This is my second bluetooth headset so I am able to compare this with my previous one (a Plantronics M2500).  Overall it is not a bad headset but it does have some flaws.*** Plus points include:***- uses a single AAA battery so there is no need to lug around a charger when traveling.  This alone is reason enough to make many people consider this headset over others.- Great battery life.  I don't understand the user that complained of only getting 1 hour of standby time.  Normally I get about 5-7 days standby with 4-5 hours talk time on a AAA rechargeable that is already somewhat depleted.  A fully charged AAA or a AAA alkaline should do far better!- fits snugly on the ear and is relatively low profile...although some users are right in that occasionally it feels like it might fall off the ear even though it is snug.- Great price from Motorola dot com.  I got this for $23 bucks with a leather pocket clip (including shipping).- No internal battery so you won't have to throw it away when the battery dies (the plantronics has a non replaceable internal rechargeable so when the battery dies in 1-2 years you will have to buy another headset).*** Negative Points Include: ***- The side multifunction button is too easy to press accidentally so occasionally I end up redialing the last call.- The plastic is a little too lightweight so if you drop it, it will get scratched.- Switching ears is not as straightforward as it was with the Plantronics headset.  You have to remove the earpiece clip and then reprogram the volume buttons.  It doesn't take long but it is still a hassle compared to the Plantronics which only requires you to rotate the rubber ear insert.- The volume is definately not as high as the plantronics headset but it should be adequate for most people in most situations.- The light does not give you any clue as to the status of its battery.  The Plantronics will start flashing a red light when the battery gets weak whereas the motorola just starts beeping.  Great if you have it on your ear but not so good if you have it sitting on your desk or in the leather pocket clip.- The motorola does seem to have a lower range than the plantronics. I am not sure if that has to do with the battery not  being fully charged but I was able to use the Plantronics downstairs while my phone was upstairs whereas the Motorola will lose the connection as soon as I get to the base of the stairs.Overall the Motoroal HS805 is a great headset for first time bluetooth users or for anyone who travels a lot or talks a lot and does not want to lug around a power adapter, but if you want a lot of the latest features then you should look elsewhere.
this case fits perfectly on the s4 and keeps me powerd all day I can't complain! a+ recommend it to all
Product arrived on time. I charged the battery fully and it works as intended with no problems in my phone.
nice case, protective and good looking, it also has a nice changing texture in some areas. good buy for the price
I bought this headset at the same time as my Verizon Palm Treo 650.  Pairing was a snap, and it supported the hands free profile.  The call quality was great on both ends (however wind or car A/C caused people on the other end to have lower quality).  I only charged it twice - day one and one week later.  I used it for about a total of one to two hours a day on my commute.There was just one drawback, and it was a deal-breaker for me.  I wear glasses, and the bulk of the headset behind the ear made it very uncomfortable.  I returned the headset today after I had to end my call on the way home after 20 minutes.  If you don't wear glasses, this is an ideal bluetooth headset for the Treo 650.
I purchase this for a backup at work.  It charges my SGS4.  I would recommend this charger for the Samsung Galaxy S4.
This headset generally works, though there was times I needed to re-pair it. My problems with it that are:1) Its hard to turn off - if you pay attention you can turn it off easy enough, but nothing like the Motorola H700 where you just flip the boom.2) It's big! It's comfy enough on your ear, but its huge in your pocket and since things stick out of it, its hard to get out of your pocket.3) Flashing blue light is way too bright! When is dark and I'm in the car, I keep thinking that the cops are behind me the way it blinks so brightly. It disturbed my passengers too.4) Wind tolerance - it's better than my H700, but its still too noisy to hold a conversation in any level of wind.I'm sending mine back and getting another H700.
you do not get a 6 pack you only get 1 of them do not be fooled i was very upset that it only came with one and i do not liked to be tricked like that
I like the case. it is as described and looks like an note book. if you are interested in that look then it is best. only one thing i dont like. it is that it does not stand horizontal only vertical, other than that  very good product quality.
It works fine. It connects consistently and the sound quality is acceptable but, the battery life is not so good. The stand-by battery life could be a lot better.
I've owned and used several different models over a couple of years, and the 510 is hands down the best I've used so far.  Battery life is excellent, fit is excellent, sound quality and mic quality is excellent.  Got mine when the price temporarily dipped to under $40, cannot beat it at this price.  Highly recommended.
This product arrived when promised and in the condition promised. It is a genuine Blackberry charger. It was brand new and worked perfectly. For the price, I don't think you can ask for much more than that!
I have been a fan of the LG HBS series since the amazingHBS-700and also own theHBS-730and the newHBS-800.With the SF500, Motorola has clearly taken a more than close look at the HBS series and attempted to improve on it. Here's how I find these two compare:- Battery life: Moto wins. This thing keeps on going, and lasts even longer than the already amazing HBS-730. Too bad the remaining battery life estimator is so inaccurate (it reports 4 hours remaining on a full charge, when it's much closer to 10)- Convenience and durability: Moto wins again. The Buds sit tight around your neck and don't bounce. The cords are not as fragile on the LGs, and the magnets holding the earbuds are much stronger on the Moto Buds. Unlike the HBS-730 and 800, the Buds do not report their power level to the Bluetooth host (the iPhone shows a little bar next to the bluetooth icon indicating the battery status when you use the LG headphones). That's funny since the older SF600 have the feature.- Ergonomy: LG wins big time. The button layout and functionality are intuitive and logical on the LG, and completely convoluted and inconvenient on the Buds; on the Buds, the same button is used for FF (one press) or REW (two presses); also, the power button on the LG is a sliding switch, whereas the Buds use an electronic switch which makes it much more difficult to find out if your headset is on or off.- Sound quality: I would rate the Buds somewhere between the 700 and the 730; mostly, they lack bass and presence.- Range: excellent, but the outlandish 150ft range advertised is only available when connected to a Bluetooth Class 1 device, and these are rare -- only featured on a few Motorola phones as far as I could tell. When connected to a Class 2 device (which most devices are) the range is 33ft like all other devices; I think Motorola is a little disingenuous when advertising this extended range.In conclusion... They're not bad, and if the LG series didn't exist they would deserve 5 stars. However, considering they're a blatant rip-off of a successful concept, it's disappointing that Motorola improved on some of the flaws of the HBS series (mostly the cord durability and the magnet strength) but failed to pick up on the ergonomy (button layout, power switch).Which one should you pick? in my opinion, the cheapest one you can find, unless you need to connect to two devices, in which case the Moto Buds or the HBS-800 are a must; and if you easily get irritated and confused by complicated controls, stay away from the Buds.Recommended, but they're not the LG HBS-series killer that Motorola probably designed them to be.
The keyboard will connect to an iphone 3GS with iOS 4 but will not reconnect automatically.I did the CTRL + LFT FN + RT FN keys and the light on the keyboard starts flashing.  Then check the bluetooth on the iphone and it discovers the keyboard.  Then when you pair it the iphone will ask you to enter a 4 digit code and press enter on the keyboard.  That part works perfectly.Then you can use the keyboard on the iPhone 3GS.  But when you close the keyboard and the bluetooth connection is broken, it will not reconnect when you open the keyboard back up.  I tried pressing keys and waiting.  I checked the bluetooth status on the iphone and it shows not connected.  No matter what I do it will not reconnect.  I have to manually re-pair the keyboard and phone to get it to work.  That makes the keyboard completely useless on the iPhone 3GS with iOS4.  There is a video posted on youtube where another person had the same problem.If anyone was able to get it to work properly with an iPhone 3GS with iOS4, please let me know how you were able to do it.
I had a previous version of this product a few years ago. It lasted for about two year until a capacitor blew out. You could see it through the translucent case. I like the previous version. This one not so much.The AC prongs do not fold in so they are in the way when being used in a lighter outlet or stored in a pocket or computer back.It's larger than the combination of some separate ac only and 12v only chargers I have, so there is no space savings.When connected to my ipad or my razr maxx, the screen keyboard malfunctions. Spurious and random characters are generated when the screen is touched instead of the keys that should be detected. Unplugging the cable immediately stops this problem.I contacted BoxWave and they did send me a return shipping label. I have not gotten around to returning the charger yet. I dont know if this is a design issue or if I just got a bad unit. But the first two issues are reasons I would not recommend these even if the malfunction is just a bad unit.
This is the best product I have gotten for my cell phone and I have had many of these blue tooths. But this one is the best people hear me clearly and there is no noise in the background that they can hear as well....
I purchased this item sold directly from Amazon...It is as "Genuine Motorola" as it gets...It works perfectly...AT&T; wanted $29.00..Amazon wanted $8.38...Beware of some other sellers!!as their items are not genuine and ruin your battery if they even work at all!!
very helpful and good quality
good product at low price.purchased this looking for a smaller charger and I love Griffin products.Free shipping just took a little longer
This is one of the nicest phones I have used.  It is a traditional flip phone for those who use their phone as a phone and works very well.
Fits perfect, nice clean look, I am going to buy another one to leave it inside my car just in case.
I thought this would be a Samsung product but look like a cheap counterfiet. It came crushed and is slow to charge my phone.
It's amazing the sound quality considering that when you have this thing over your ear, the "mouth" piece is a lot closer to your ear than it is to your mouth.  I made a call right after I bought it and the person on the other end could not tell I was using a hands free device.Like all Jabra hands-free ear gizmos, this one comes with a variety of gel-like ear inserts for different shaped ears and for those who want to use the gizmo on their left ears instead of the right.My less than perfect rating is the less-than flexible adjustment for the piece that goes around the ear. It's a snug fit, to be sure, but a little too snug. After a recent lengthy phone call, my ear was so fatigued from being squeezed for so long, it gave me a headache. There is no way to take the snug tension down a notch. I have normal size ears, not circus ears, so I'm not just complaining for the sake of it.The gel-like insert feels great - but it's the over-the-ear gizmo that is doing the pinching. It's almost like wearing 4lb clasp earrings or something. It really takes two hands to put this thing on, too.The quality in hearing conversations is also excellent. There is the most subtle of echoes in both receiving and sending, but it is barely detectable. My phone has an excellent hands-free speaker built-in, but a hands-free device is essential when you want privacy and don't want to hold your phone up to your ear for an hour.
It looked like it was used! It was broken when it got to be the paint job was horrible.I would never get it again
Item shipped and arrived very fast. Item is perfect for my car & phone, very compact. Item is as advertise.
The Pros:The function and design of this headset are first rate. Right out of the box it was easy to pair with my Motorola v505 phone.It is small and unobtrusiveThe battery life is really good in standby mode, and lasts several hours of talking. (and it does issue warning tones when the battery runs low, plus the phone issues a message saying "headset signal weak - switch to handset?"The combo belt clip/charger is a really cool idea.  It would have been EVEN COOLER if Jabra had made it compatible with nokia, Moto, and Ericsson phone chargers.  Now I have yet ANOTHER power supply to drag with me on trips....Reception is very good as long as line of sight is unobstructed by anything full of water.  I can pump gas in my car with the phone on the passenger seat or wander all over my hotel suite waving my arms wildly while the phone sits in its charging stand on the desk.  If there is a body in the way (or an aquarium, etc) then the signal drops off (attenuates) dramatically.  In fact, there is a marked difference between putting the phone on the opposite side of your body from the earpiece when carrying your phone in your pocket.  If on the opposite side, the signal degrades noticeably.The Cons:I have been unsuccessful getting it to pair with either my laptop or my PDA however (an HP iPaq 4155).If you have a bluetooth PDA and use BT to Activesync with your PC, it will interfere with this headset while it is "connected" (from Activesync's perspective).  You will hear a constant "crackling" noise that sounds like the other person is popping popcorn.  It took me a while to figure out.  You don't have to turn off the BT radio on the laptop or PDA, just "disconnect" the BT session temporarily while talking.  This is a hassle, but not a killer (one of the reasons for 4 instead of 5 stars)My biggest problem with the unit is that it does not fit my ears without feeling very insecure.  The "hanging" design always feels like it is flopping around for me, and if I lean too far to that side, the unit will actually fall off my ear.  There is no way to tighten the fit of the unit; I have already tried different earpieces and positions of the earpieces, but this doesn't help.  This is the reason why I will probably replace this unit with another.  Its a shame, since it is such a nice unit, but the floppiness on my ears is unacceptable.BTW, I am not a midget - I am 5' 10 and weigh 160 lbs.  I have a fairly narrow face, but I think the bigger issue is that I have small earlobes.  If you have small earlobes (rather than pendulous ones) you may want to test fit this unit in a store before buying one here.  I wish I had...
luving it  right now will last about 4 mo so you cant beat the price for it I got 4 of them
This is a really great case, looks and feels amazing, not to mention that the battery lasts for many hours.
This is fine for what I use it for.  It is exactly as described. I plug my phone into my car radio and it works just fine. Plain and simple
I screwed up; shouldn't have ordered this; it's of no use to me.  Since the real price was hidden in the "shipping and handling" it's pointless to return it; I'll just write it off as an "educational expense".I actually bought this to use on a cordless handset that had a "hands free" 2.5mm jack. (Siemens cordless phone system).  The owners manual says "...any 2.5 mm headset", so that's what I bought.  I don't even know where this thing is anymore; I put it back in the little bag and forgot about it.I tried it on three of the handsets in the system; the plug simply captures the line and makes a loud, "screeching" sound...  ...playing with the plug, I can find one tenuous position about a quarter of the way out where I can hear audio from the phone, but the moment I let it slip it goes back to the screeching.I can't get it to work on anything else either including my wife's Samsung Intensity (which also has a 2.5mm headset jack; same results), but I don't have access to a PalmEvery so often I do something stupid; buying this was one of those occasions.
I was expecting a bit higher quality product but it is what it is. I've used it for a few months and it definitely helped when I dropped my phone. But at this point, I am not using it anymore due to the quality of the product, although 'good', it could be better and more solid.
I'm sure that there is something that says it will not come as pictured, but still I was disappointed.The tools helped me get the job done, but they also did not hold up well. The plastic plying tools bent and broke fairly quickly. I can't say that it wasn't user error, but they seemed very cheap.
Purchase through Amazon 4 months ago. Works great with my Razr phone. I'm a truck driver and have had problems in the past with hearing other party and with other party hearing background noise. I can hear very well with this bluetooth. The person I'm talking to can't tell I'm on a bluetooth about 90% of the time. I found that alot of the sound quality towards who I am speaking with has a lot to do with what they are talking on. I can't talk with Verizon customer service with this on. Calls are crystal clear while speaking with another person with a handsfree unit on. Speaking with someone on a landline is pretty good clarity for them, they can tell if my window is open or not and if boom is too far from cheek they can hear alot of background noise. No matter who I talk to I can hear great every time.
I have used this headset with my Nokia 6620 and with my PC, and it works great with both, switching back and forth easily by telling either the PC or the phone to connect with it.  Light crackling on occasion when 802.11b is active in the area, but not terribly noticeable.  Sound quality is great indoors.  The great thing is the comfort; I find that I can wear it all day long, even though it's not the smallest or lightest headset.
Samsung Note 2 lets face it is a large phone... Howeva I am all about putting it in nice cases. This case hits a stars. Has a credit/ID slots and a money slot - Love that - so I don't have to carry a purse. Plus the strap is nice to have on wrist while on the phone (you know how crazy people are now a days running by snatching phones, extra secure). Best parts phone is secure in case holder when flip case over open. There is an appropriate hole in the back of case for the S-pen removal. Also the phone button closes versus most magnetic closure cases out here.Only con: No Speaker hole in front to close case while talking on phone.Howeva regardless -- highly recommend. Might get another in another color.
its a worst product I have ever seen by motorola. It charges my phone but I have to hold the jack that goes into phone, and also have to drive at same time.I bought Belkin's similar product from Walmart for $10 and it rocks.

I bought this for my son and this is what he has to say: &#34;This is a great case and held my phone waterproof on a whole cold weekend trip. My whole pack got wet and this case kept my phone dry. I would recommend this to anyone who needs  tough waterproof case.&#34;
I am using this device with a Polycom landline phone.Trying the 3 settings I can get a decent connection on my end with a separate Bluetooth earpiece, where I hear the other party fine with little noise and no echo.But on the far end, even landline to landline, there is an annoying whine and some echo, no matter what the setting.  This isn't good enough, I prefer to use the corded headset.I am returning this product to Amazon.
This was my first bluetooth headset and I have used for more than 8 months now. It is perfectly fit for me and I am satisfied with the quality of voice both ways.Pros:1. Very flexible and can fit as u like.2. Can be used on both ears3. Voice activated dialing works, so it is convenient to call someone while driving.4. Battery retains charge for quite long time, depending on your talk time.5. filter for air noise works. I tested it while driving on highway with open window. Caller confirmed very little air noise disturbance and great voice quality.Cons:1. Switch off little inconvenient to use when it is on your ear. But the flip side is that you would like to keep it on, while on your ear. So, not a problem.2. Some reviewers have mentioned, difficulty in positioning on ear due to flexibility. But it is not a big issue, since once positioned, it stays there.**-> The best thing I liked is the Customer Service from Plantronics. My first headset developed some problem with the microphone and people were not able to listen to me. I called Plantronics on a Sunday evening and the rep guided me through the online warranty form, very nicely and I got my replacement part within three days. Perfect..isn't it?
works great and charges ipads, tablets, smartphones as well as bluetooth speakers and headsets. I would recommend it to anyone looking for a universal car charger.
i like camera phones, but i can't believe this phone don't have usb cable to upload pics..i have to pay $.25 for sending each pics..Viewing all camera phones, this one is pretty nice..It's got flash, and it's got 4 different types of resolutions..It zooms in more than i expected..Other than camera, for contact list, it gives you to save #s, pic, ringtones for a person..I think thats good..i guess that's all i'm gonna say..Overall, phone is decent.For other viewers, if you wanna buy this, you should buy it now, and don't wait cause more updated phones will come out soon
This product appears to be a genuine original equipment Blackberry car charger.  It has the Blackberry name and logo on it.  The plate on the bottom of the cigarette lighter plug of the unit states that the electric output is 5 volts, 500mA (500 milliamperes or .5 ampere).  The plate on the wall charger packaged with a new Blackberry 8800 states that the wall charger output is 5 volts, .75 ampere.  Thus, it appears that the car charger produces two thirds the electrical charge produced by the wall charger (.5 vs. .75 amp.)This car charger is used with a Blackberry 8800 and has performed admirably and without any problems.  It costs a fraction of the price charged by AT&T; ($29.99), apparently for the same product.
well bought this so i could have a spare cord since i have the original cord in my car with a usb charger there got tired of keeping track where i had it last.  so this cord works on when plugged into the wall.  when hooked to a pc phone wont stay connected to the pc to transfer files or anything.  so if you just need a cord to plug into the wall this will work but don't even think of this cord if you want to use it with a pc.
I bought this for my father who uses a Nexus 4. The case looks and feels really nice and generally works well. However, there is one significant problem - the inside leather leaves an oily residue on the phone when closed. Suede and leather do need to have some oil retained to keep them in good condition, and while this makes the material look and feel wonderful to the touch, it is a bit of a problem when it comes to these kinds of electronics. The genuine leather on the outside is nice, but I think a synthetic inner lining may be more appropriate for this type of thing.
This model, the C250 EarWave Boom, is one of 4 Jabra headsets I have ordered. I continued to try different Jabra models because the ear piece is by far the most comfortable and best sound quality I have ever used, however, all 4 Jabras had very poor microphone quality. With each one, the persons on the other end could not hear me. Disappointed. I ended up getting the Ge Tl26593 Earset Microphone by Jasco, which has been the best so far.
The Hype says:"Getting on the Internet is easy with the RAZR V3 as it supports Cingular's GSM-based Wireless Internet Express service. When used with a Cingular data plan and the phone's Bluetooth or USB data capability, the phone can be used as a wireless modem for laptops and PDAs."I say:CACA! If you plan on connecting to the internet using this phone and bluetooth you had better get a mongo battery for your laptop because it's the slowest, laggiest, painfully irritating, useless piece of doggy doo that I have ever had the displeasure of using! You could run to Seattle and knock on Amazon's front door faster than connecting to the site.Update: 6/7/2006I tested the actual bandwidth and I connect at 39.1 kbps, that's slower than dialup with a 56k (53.3) modem. When connected to Cingular's GSM it says connected at 115.2 kbps when I connect via bluetooth and 230 kbps when I use the USB cable. Either way the actual speed is 39-41 kbps and I surely don't have the patience for that.One last annoying feature ... Cingular "brands" their phones so you can't download games to your phone or delete certain ringtones etc., as you can with other providers. There is also an annoying "HELLOMOTO" video/commercial that uses 25% of your available space for videos of your own. There is no way to delete this and recapture this waste of space. This truly is about the worst product I have ever purchased.
The headset works very well.  The noise reduction is not that great, the Jawbone is better at it.  However, the overall sound quality both ways is better and the fit is more comfortable than the Jawbone.  It is light and seems large at first but is very easy to fold up and is quite sturdy.  Especially for the price, this is a great choice!
I was stunned. After 2 plantronics (a 320 and a 330) I was tired of earhooks that came loose and dropped calls. I thought it was my provider when my calls got dropped consistently in the same areas on my drive to/from work. But this headset is phenomenal! maybe one dropped call in a week... And the off/on operation is great! Open/close the boom to turn off/on! I love this headset... and I don't say that often
She used to keep her cell in the side door pocket and was always missing calls & messages, but problem solved.Has never fallen off.
Ok. I just bought this adapter today for my PDA cellphone.  The product integrates well with everything (My Laptop - sony vaio, cellphone (siemens sx56, my panasonic cordless home phone (although with the panasonic, ppl complain about my voice being faint)).  But the issue is , I hear static crackling noises even if I'm not in a call. As soon as my bluetooth headset is connected to the a210 adapter, it produces faint-medium crackling noise. The noise is exactly like the one it produces when you move out of range.  But happens even at 1-2 feet distance.  I was initially confused on what is producing this.  The battery was fully charged on the adapter.  The bluetooth headset is not the issue, as it connects well with my laptop (which has integrated bluetooth).  Then I figured, if I keep the adapter and phone closer (few inches away from my ear) to my headset, then everything works well. Otherwise even at a distance of 2-3 feet , it starts the crackling.  I even switched modes (1,2,3) on the adapter and still the same issue.  Although it works upto 20-25 feet, the crackling starts at a distance of 2 feet.  I even turned off my wireless networks to test this.  Also exchanged it for a new one, to see if it was a item specific issue.  But even the 2nd one is having the same problem.  The manual says, that it is due to interference.  I think many 2.4 Ghz can cause this inteference.  Alhtough I turned off all of my wireles devices, it still caused the issue even in my car (slightly better, but not totally gone).But in any case if you don't hear the crackling, it integrates very well with everything.  The crackling is heard only by you, not by the person on the other side.  So we can probably live with it.  There are not many bluetooth adapters that are available out there.Note: Many reviewers here complain about this adpater not working well with home phones.  First of all, if you read the manual, this is not designed to work with home phones (if it works well with home phones, then you're lucky).  It is designed to work primarily for mobile phones only.
I got this because I used Plantronics headsets at work and love the quality + the price was awesome. This solves the main purpose of the bluetooth - to enable handsfree conversation with quality audio. The voice quality is very good - people hear me very clearly and I too hear them clearly (at times, the volume seems to be a bit low but I do not know if it is because the other side is not speaking close into the phone or it is a problem with this). Pairing with the iPhone was a breeze. You can pair with 2 devices at the same time (I tried 2 phones, but I would like to add a phone and my laptop so I can take softphone calls on my laptop without an extended headset).I noticed that it disconnects from the phone after some time (less than an hour) of non-use. The first few days, I was always powering it off and on to re-establish the connection or going to the phone settings to reconnect and I was going to return it; however, one day I wanted to try pressing and holding the talk button for 2 seconds and bingo - it reconnects. So I don't have to power it off/on to reconnect.I am not sure if this is a feature of the iPhone or this device but I love the Voice Control - I press the talk button for 2 seconds to activate the Voice Control on my iPhone and I can say the number or name I want to dial and it dials for me. So now I am 100% hands-free while driving I use voice control all the time to dial people.I gave a 4 rating because this is not as comfortable as the Motorola H720 that I got for my wife (H720 is true over the ear headset - nothing going into your ear - you can read my review for that product on Amazon). Getting on the ear is a bit difficult - need 2 hands usually.For folks that want to listen to music from your iPhone/BBerry, please note that this headset is NOT A2DP enabled. i.e. you cannot stream music to your headset from your smartphone. If that is important for you, you can try Jabra BT8040 (I owned 8010 until I lost it, and I liked that - Plantronics or Motorola H720 voice quality was better than my old 8010 though).
This antenna works well but the mini is better.  The main complaint is the wind whistels through the coil, so it must be set way back on the roof.  No sound from the mini dual band version and just as good reception.Update 5-28-10: Actually, the mini has much better reception
This earpiece was a great idea, but the main issue with it is that it has no noise reduction, and that it begins to crackle too easily when my arm or body part gets in between it and the phone. Some may say that's normal, but NO--there are plenty Motorolas and Sony-Erricsons that have stronger connectivity that don't crackle as easy when obstructed, so don't buy into that line.
Even though the package and description stated there was no adhesive, there certainly was a white backing too remove and place on dash . I felt the item was very thin, and to the touch not sticky at all. There were no groves as competing products and the part that faced up that was supposed to attract and "stick" was smooth. Overall, I was not impressed.
I bought the Logitech Mobile Freedom Headset (980228-0403) for use with VoIP on my HP zt3000 Windows XP SP2 notebook. I wanted to use a wireless headset and VoIP to make international calls, mostly from hotel rooms. This headset did not work out of the box for my situation. The Logitech support website was great. It said to upgrade the notebook's bluetooth software. The HP site was also excellent. I downloaded bluetooth and many other newer drivers. Once installed, the headset immediately worked as docuemented. The other newer drivers solved all the weird hibernation problems I've been experiencing too. I'm using Skype for VoIP service. Skype setup has an option for using the bluetooth headset for Skype only, otherwise the normal audio devices are used. All in all, installation was a bit of upgrade work but competently supported. I now have a VoIP connected wireless headset that allows me mobile freedom. Due to my usage, I have no comment on the audio quality or useability with mobile phones. The device apparently will not work with the majority of PocketPCs due to a lack of bluetooth software. Thus I only gave it 4 stars. However, HP does sell stereo headphones (no microphone) for most IPaq models.Update: 15-March-2005 Am able to pair with Axim x50v PocketPc. Has considerable static. Skype and other apps nearly unusable. Continues to work with XP well. Suggest Plantronics MX100I Stereo Headset for using Skype on a PPC.
I was initially leary about purchasing this item due to the extremely low price and to have free shipping also, but I needed a wall charger since Motorola only includes a car charger with their wireless car phone speakers.  So I took a chance (due to the low price and free shipping) and was pleasantly surprised.  The charger appears to as well made as the other after market chargers I purchased previously for my e-book reader, PDA, camera, etc., and at less than 25% of the cost.  I charged my Motorola speaker without any problems.
Used this to replace an original with an old cell phone.  You can't beat the price and lasted years.  Thanks.
UPDATE:this silly 3.5mm cord lasted all of 3 months audio went out and the retractor went out very cheap quality would not buy this again went with the old standard non retractable cord
Oct 7th 2005If you look carefully at these so called "bad reviews" you will notice most of them either don't know how to use the phone OR may have been the 1-2 out of 1000 that received a faulty phone which happens from EVERY manufacturer, EVERY brand, EVERY type of phone.Now my wife & I have had ours for 12 days so far with no problems whatsoever, we ordered 2, I got the Black one she got the silver one. Got BOTH for FREE btw.Just a word about those of you like us that want a "shared plan" from Cingular BUT Amazon does not offer those plans while you order, I ordered 1 phone with 1 cheapest single plan each, now when Amazon sends you the conformation that your order has been shipped you get your "Cell phone Numbers" right then in the email.I simply called Cingular gave them the phone numbers of each phone told them the deal and had the service changed to a "single 700 rollover mins shared plan" before we even got the phones in our hands, so there is no problems at all in that respect. Once we got the phones I called back to check and yes the person from Cingular had done everything as asked, I also checked from the phone itself as you can go to "My Account" from the Main Menu page and phone goes online and checks everything about your account, how many minutes, the plan, when the next bill is due, etc etc, and sure enough everything was as it was supposed to be.As far as signal strength it is excellent in my area, I can go all through our house upstairs and downstairs and it stays between 4-5 bars, I don't recall seeing less than 3 bars all around town so far, the phone gets a great signal, and Cingular "in my area" puts out a great signal.My wife just came back from a business trip, she was about 150 miles away "With NO ROAMING charges" btw our last cell phone service "Alltel" would have been roaming within 20 miles.Anyway when she got to the hotel she called we both had perfect signal strength, we both put phone in "Speaker Phone" mode and she just laid the phone in closed position on the night stand while she unpacked her suitcases, I put mine on my night stand and we talked for about an hour with no problems at all, and it was a FREE call "Mobile to Mobile".We sent a couple text messages to each other that worked no problem.She used the phone as her Alarm clock the next morning which worked perfectly.Now as for what 1-2 reviewers have said about the battery life, most likely they have gotten one of those 1-2 out of 1000.I've had phone 12 days have charged it 3 times and have never let it go to the point where is says it "needs" charging, so average 4 days per charge and just like the manual states it appears as though battery life is getting a bit better after a few charges, So I'm easily going to get 3-5 days per charge, and that's with a lot of fiddling around with it because it's new and 1-2 hours talk time.Some one mentioned they dropped the phone on its hinge and it broke. I have yet to drop the phone but it seems to be very well made to me, either way I would suggest getting a Krusell cover for it which I did but has not been delivered yet, and also insurance for $4.99 a month from Cingular which covers anything and everything for life of the phone, thus that problem is solved.Someone mentioned something about the "address book being slow" not even sure what that means, I only have about 8 numbers in it so far but it comes up virtually instantly for me, maybe if you have 100++ numbers in it might take a couple seconds? dunno.As for searching through the phone book, they mentioned you have to make a new entry for each number for same person, NO you dont, you have the option to show numbers any way you wish, either by "Name" or "Speed dial #" or "Voice name" or even by "Email" and with or without a picture of the person.Want it faster and easier if you have a lot of names/entries? then set it for "list only" "no picture" and by "primary number only", simple. You can also separate numbers even further by putting in "Categories" such as "Business/Personal/General/VIPs"Bring up Category your number is in only that way even if you have 100s of Names & #s it thins them to category.When you have "primary number only" listed all you need to do then to get all the other numbers & Email listing for that Name is to "Highlight name and use left or right on the Navigation button to get all the other numbers" once again very simple and easy to use. I find the Phone book to be excellent & fast.1-2 have mentioned something about "ear piece volume too low" I'm in total agreement with "Harry G from TN" the ear piece volume is fine just make sure the "volume" is turned up and it is just a good as any other cell phone I have ever used, but like Harry mentioned make sure your ear is right at the "top edge of the phone", too low and volume will sound low.Now myself I find the phone overall to be excellent, gets a great signal, has way more than enough features for me, works very well for its intended purpose "PHONE" seems to be very well made, nice size, looks great, has a really nice screen with sharp image & colors.I have only ONE complaint so far......The screen which looks outstanding inside under any indoor lighting, especially if you are in the dark, well that same screen outdoors under "sunlight" is virtually unreadable. So there you have my one gripe.I will come back and update this if anything changes, but as for right now and for FREE and can hardly see how you can go wrong with this phone.(Update 4/30/06.)Well 7 months later and these phones are still working flawless with ZERO problems of anykind.I charge it maybe twice a week so battery life is still great.Neither my wife or I have this alleged sound problem some seem to have the earpiece and speakerphone volume are plenty loud.My wife is constantly playing solitaire on hers, so she has worked the hell out of that keypad the last 7 months and no problems.These phones are the best we have ever had by far, so like I said before take these "bad reviews" with a grain of salt.Some may indeed have a faulty unit which is going to happen regardless which phone you buy, but I bet a large percentage of these problems are simply operator error.These phones are excellent and I would recommend them to anyone.Still the only slight fault that I can gripe about on them is the screen is hard to see in bright sunlight.and it took an extra couple weeks to get rebate but was no problem, just a single phone call and problem was solved.(Update June 23th 2006)Have had these phones over 9 months so far without a single problem, they work flawless.As I said above anyone giving this phone a bad rating either has that rare bad one of the bunch or simply doesn't know how to use the phone. I have dropped this phone 3X so far, last time was 4 days ago in the parking lot on concrete and no problems at all, not even a scratch. (Of course the Krussel case is outstanding and helps a lot)We used both our phones while on a Cruise to the Caribbean and as long as we were in an area/Island that had cell service we had good reception and no problems at all, and as long as we were in a US territory (Puerto Rico, St. Thomas, St. Croix, St. John) the calls were not roaming.You get the phones for FREE, Amazon is good to order from with no problems, Cingular so far for us anyway have been very good and the service (in our area) is far better than what Alltel was.There may be some phones out there as good, some im sure will have a better camera, however I seriously doubt you will find a better all around cell phone & service.
The charger only lasted a week ad after that it just stopped charging my Samsung Galaxy S3.  They really need to start making these chargers better....I've been thru several!!!!
I recently used two of the plug on a trip.  I used the one for Chile and Argentina and they both worked perfectly.  I would recommend this set.
I owned the V300 and found it to be a bit quirky, strange things would happen when ever I charged it, when it was finished all the personal settings would revert back to factory standard. They seemed to have fixed that with this latest version of the phone. My understanding is that they have combined the features from both the v300 and the v 600 to make this phone. I've only had it for 1 week and so far so good I always enjoyed functions such as speaker phone, voice dialing and voice memos, now I get the blue tooth and a much better redesigned key pad along with video clip capabilities. All of this is good news! If I had to pick a down side I would have to say that I'm dissapointed that Motorola decided to make this phone look exactly like the v300. I like what the body of the phone feels like, but a change of color would be better, maybe silver.
these things are ajoke they do nothing for the phone but for the price it was a fun thing to try. but really not worth a dime
Came just as described.. It doesn't come unstuck and its cute! People ask where I got them from & it's great when driving.
I had a motorola Bluetooth headset.  I felt like Lt. Uhura with a giant ear piece in StarTrek.  I had a hard time keepig it in and after 20 mintues it hurt my ear.  It came with my accessory kit in one box with the car charger and case so I just used it and grumbled.  But when my toddler flushed it I got the Jabra as a replacement.I love it!  It works and stays in my ear, feels comfortable even after 3-4hours in my ear.  I use it only when I drive and I have used the voice dial and it works perfectly.  I set the voice commands using the headset and it works.  When I set them without using the headset it did not work well.Great little device.
Great case. Doubled my battery life like promised. Can't beat the price. I would recommend it for a friend. A+
This is a male to male patch 3.5mm cable - ostensibly to connect anything with an earphone jack to anything with a headphone input.  The reason to buy this is the retracting mechanism, but that mechanism gets tangled sometimes.  You have to pull both ends out evenly (with the center part staying in the middle of the span).  You cannot pull from one side only - it will get tangled and jam.
This product was pretty inexpensive so I had no expectations. When I received it I quickly noticed how flimsy the plastic was. You can probably fit 2 credit cards top. Might be a good case for nights out, but probably wont protect your phone much. I ended up tossing it because it was too flimsy.
****UPDATED on OCT. 18, 2010*sigh*I really tried to make this work for me but it just is not worth the hassle.  As previously speculated, I wonder if wearing glasses is the reason for the poor fit. I traveled quite a bit last weekend and found that, more often than not, my headset disconnected itself from my phone after a call.  My hands-free-device turned into a pull-over-and-muck-with-it-after-each-call burden.  Maybe I didn't have some obscure setting correct but I looked all over and couldn't find one.  Maybe mine was defective, I'm not sure but it was really more trouble than it was worth.  In almost ten years of ordering from Amazon I am taking advantage of the return policy for the first time.I found a different headset at 73% off but still $40 (orig $150 / Plantronics Discovery 925 Bluetooth Earpiece in gold) and it comes with its own chargeable case. Never seen a case that not only protects but also charges!  Other colors are a bit more. Check that one out if you wear glasses.  It fits into the ear, not over the top, so I am hoping for a better fit.* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *I was expecting more after reading the reviews.Let me first say that the sound quality is excellent.  Sent myself a voice-mail while rolling the windows up and down on the freeway without an appreciable loss of sound quality!  Amazing in itself but you could barely tell the difference from "all windows up" and "driver/passenger window down."HOWEVER.... I wear glasses and have a rounder face.  It is difficult to place the earpiece on my ear with glasses on.  The bulky part doesn't sit well on my glasses' frame.  The mouthpiece is not adjustable.  I have fuller cheeks and the mic comes in contact with my face.  Not sure why it was made that way since not all faces are the same.  The control buttons are also difficult to manage while driving.  The main control on the side is fine but the tiny on/off and volume buttons were hard to find and press without dislodging the unit.  I turn it on before I place it on my ear.  Maybe that has something to do with it sitting on my eyeglasses frame. I do like the sound quality and will continue to use it for a while before coming back to update.  If it doesn't work well for me I'm sure one of my kids will like it.  (I ended up returning it.  See above)Would also recommend getting a case for it to corral the charger and unit in one place.
Bottom LineStrongly recommended.  This phone replaced a highly-rated NEC 525 so my assessment is largely in comparison to it.  Based on my research, the V551 has virtually the same features as the much more expensive Razr V3(although not as thin and made largely of plastic rather than brushed aluminum).  From the many online reviews I've read, early versions of the V551 had problems with lockups and dropped calls.  I haven't seen many of those types of comments lately so I'm assuming Motorola worked the kinks out.Pros--Very good reception and sound quality.  Gets three and four bars in my office; I had to stand by the window to use the NEC--It's nice looking; the body is mostly plastic but appears solidly made (the NEC was plug ugly).  Nice raised number keys.--Calls and rings can be made very loud (which is good since I often carry it in a pocket or briefcase, or have it in the car with the sunroof open and music blaring)--Decent quality pictures for a phone camera--Bluetooth--MP3 ringtones; also extensive selection of built in ringtones (although most aimed at young users rather than professionals).--Good speaker phone function--EDGE makes for fast web browsing--Excellent procedure for downloading and saving data via WAP--much easier than the NEC--I can now access Hotmail which I couldn't with the NEC--Nice looking screen--ITAP text entry system works better than the similar function on the NEC--Good voice dialing (the voice tags on my NEC simply took me to that phone book entry and didn't actually dial which the Moto does)--Ability to change ring volume and method (to include a useful vibrate then ring method) with external keys is very handy; ring volume can be made very loud--Buttons and functions are highly customizable--Very good date book--Quad band (I've used my NEC and the Siemens it replaced in about a dozen countries, including Iraq)--Nice price ($74 from AT&T;)Cons--Organization of the phone book is a common complaint but once I figured it out, it's fine.  You can store five numbers and an email per entry. (You must save entries to the phone not the SIM, and organize by primary listing).  It's not the best--the NEC allowed multiple emails plus other information--but it works.--Battery life is also a complaint but I found that by following Moto's recommendations--completely discharge and re-charge it the first few times--it's fine.  Now I can go 3 to 5 days between charges with normal use.  (As another reviewer noted, the battery life was short for the first few days I had it but then improved dramatically.)--Physically the V551 is a bit thick compared not only to my NEC but also to my previous Motos--a Star Tac and V60.  But it does fit in a suit jacket pocket--Speaker phone function can only be turned on during a call, not before--Maximum time before the screen turns off for power saving is 20 seconds.  You have to touch a key to make it come back on.  This can interfere with things like downloads--Screen icons are small and fuzzy; the user's manual doesn't explain what they are--Small navigation keys, but that's the price you pay for a relatively small phone--Of the three built-in skins, two are glaringly bright and tacky.  As with the ringtones, Moto was clearly focused on young users rather than professionals--When using a Bluetooth headset, the V551 will only use a cheesy, stock ringtone--personal ones will not work--You have to go through the recognition routine with a Bluetooth device every time you use it (although this only takes about ten seconds).--Works great with a Moto Bluetooth headset but I've had less luck linking with a non-Moto Bluetooth adapter for my computer--Lousy user's manual--Lousy user's manual--Did I mention the lousy user's manual? (this is inexcusable)--Voice dialing is not universal.  In other words, it "learns" one voice rather than responding to anyone saying the correct word or phrase.--Stubby antenna (although this is a trade-off: I get better reception than with the internal antenna on my NEC)--I would have been happy to pay the extra fifty cents or so it would have cost to have real metal on the front instead of plastic made to look like metal.--The synchronization software (Motorola Mobile Phone Tools)and cable cost extra.  I have not been able to make it function.  Motorola's support is utterly worthless--I asked for help online and they told me to call them.  Two attempts led to disconnects after 10-15 minutes on hold without ever getting to an actual tech person.  The software developer--BVRP--is trying to help but hasn't been able to fix the problem.  I may seek a refund from the online vendor and look into alternative sync software.
This is an excellent divice, I have order several within 6 months for family and friends who wanted to take mine. Love it!
I can walk away father than the next leading one and it doesn't fade out even thru some of my thickest walls
I bought one for my dad to use occasionally and tested it for a couple songs and had no issues like others have had, maybe I'm not using it as long. It is cheaper feeling than my more expensive ones. I will update this if things change.
Item does work well as far as sound quality and setup ease. However ear loop is basically not adjustable at all, consequently making the ear piece itself to constantly work its way out of my ear and feel as if it were just hanging there... After days of pushing ear piece back into my ear canal and hoping the loop would give a bit. i returned it for exactly those reasons... Great sound quality and no one i spoke to claimed to hear any distortion. just didn't fit well with no possible adjusting available...
I got this to try and replace a screen, found out I'm not a phone repair person.  It did have what I needed, lacking skill needed to do the job.  I can replace my hard drive in my home computer, and add memory, this takes allot more skill.  If you have the skill, the tools are great and very complete.  I had everything the video said I needed, minus the skill.
a couple problems with this headset, when using it with the Treo 650 -1. it does not automatically connect when a call is received or initiated2. the volume is way too lowcheck out the Jabra JX10, Cardo Scala, or Palm Treo headset ---- there are too many great headsets out there, to settle for this onehappy shopping!
This device allows me to answer incoming calls on my NEC phone while I roam the office with my Plantronics wireless headset in place. This headset already has enough wireless range to cover half the floor in my building, so the ability to answer the phone at such a distance is extremely useful in a bunch of situations. A couple of key features:When a call comes in, either Intercom or from an external line, there is a chime in my ear that alerts me to the call. I can then press the single button on the headset and the receiver is lifted, allowing me to receive the call.When the call is done, I press the single button again and the receiver hangs up.It's about as simple as conceivably possible.The install instructions were however less than perfect. To get this to work properly, I have to unplug the phone base from the handset and in to the Plantronics unit. The handset is then plugged in to the Plantronics unit. This was not explicitly stated in the install instructions. It took 10-15 minutes to figure out the trick. Once that was worked out however, everything has been perfect.The only thing that I cannot easily do is pick up parked calls as there is no function to select a line. I can live with that shortcoming.
The idea of the design is a sweet idea but it wears off as the paint is over the case and not under a sealant or anything. It has a cool 3D effect but at the cost of the paint rubbing off.It is quite pretty though.
This is actually a lightweight comfortable phone headset.  The problem with it is that when the phone rings and you go to pick it up, it takes a while to attach to your ear.  Also, the speaker part is covered by some foam that picks up ear wax and gets dirty extremely quickly - not an item you would want to share with someone.  Once you get past these two problems, the sound quality is good, and it is easy to wear.
Plantronics HL10 Handset Lifter was what was promised and it was delivered on time. I got this for my boss and he seems to like it.
Absolutely love this screen protector. It came on time and the product was just as expected. I love how it comes equipped with everything you need to install it. A wetnap, dry nap, cleaning cloth, and the flattening clip you use to even out the protector once its on. It looked very professional and my Galaxy S4 Screen looks SUPER vibrant and clean. You can not even tell that theres a screen protector. I would recommend this screen protector to anyone because the value surpasses the price. Afforable and efficient.
It's big, and bulky. Works okay. Bought a Sony that works great, and is small.
I bought 2 of these headsets (one for me and one for the girlfriend) on recommendation by my Cingular sales guy. It was either the BT250 for $80 or the Moto HS810 for $99.Not knowing too much about Bluetooth headsets at the time, I opted for the BT250. Two weeks later and I'm giddy like a kid in a candy store.It took a while to figure out how to install the headset to your ear, but I'm sure most, if not all, Bluetooth headsets share the same minor inconvenience. The other minor inconvenience are the buttons; they don't have a nice feel when you push them and the locations are sometimes tricky.If it's one thing I would REALLY like, then it's a replaceable [rechargeable] battery. I'd really hate to buy a new headset just because the battery will no longer hold a charge.Regardless, I have found the BT250 to be a better value than the HS810.
Not much to say, here.  This little charger works well and it was a lot less expensive than Sprint store.
I used this charger for a couple of months now. Its a very good charger. It charges my phone very quickly.
This is a nice case that resembles a wallet because it holds your credit cards and papers while still keeping your Galaxy Note II protected.
Be careful when ordering these cases. Not all Galaxy II's are the same. Mine was a Sprint and this one did not fit my pnone. It went into the trash can as it wasnt worth sending back. Otherwise I am sure it's a great case.
This is one of the better BT headsets that I own. You can hear at your end AND you ARE heard clearly at the other. Talk time is great standby time is great. I let my wife borrow it to see if she liked it, needless to say I have ordered another one for myself. MOTO keeps getting better.
I love not having the wire, but the microphone is so close to the earpiece that everyone I talk to with the headset is annoyed and complains about hearing themselves (in echo). This problem can be diminished somewhat by turning the volume down, but then I can't hear the person I'm talking to either (unless I'm in a perfectly silent place). Other than this design flaw, the headset is a nifty gadget with elegant controls, good battery life, etc.
First off, I have had this product since 2007 and was fortunate to catch it at a great bargain!!  Since then, I have not had one problem with it except when I forget to change the batteries!I have been able to successfully pair and use this keyboard with originally a Samsung I760, then a HTC Touch Pro 2 and now my Motorola Xoom tablet.  I was surprised that I didn't even have to download drivers, it worked once I simply paired it.Not having number dedicated keys was a sacrifice but I can type memos, emails or simply work on a novel at anytime conveniently by having this portable keyboard.  The keyboard itself is very durable and has a sturdy feel when you are typing.
I waited to review this product to see if time would show it is no good, and it did not show me that.  This is the best blue tooth device i have ever seen or used and have already convinced 3 other people to switch.  The battery lasts for I would guess about 8 hrs of talk time and 2-3 weeks without a charge with me only using it a little each day.  The sound is better than using my phone and people can hear me without any static. The only improvement that I can think of is to put a battery meeter to let you know how much power is left instead of it just dying on you.  I just try to charge it every 1-2 weeks now before it dies and it is great.
Oem battery, works great and received in just 3 days! Love the razr but original battery died, bought an aftermarket, it only lasted 9 months, so back to OEM.
HL10 Handset lifter works great, very fast to pick up if away from the phone base!  I would buy again.
This is by far the best wired or wireless headset I've ever used (over a dozen). It comes with a the headset, a medium length cord with 2.5mm plug, a small and large windscreen, and a 2.5mm-line in/ line out adapter for your PC and a carry case, plus 3 different sized earplugs and a cleaning tool. I use it for 4-5 hrs per day on averagePros:Very high quality speaker. Like high quality headphones, if you phone has good signal it sounds great, but you'll hear lots of distortion with a poor signal. I use it with a blackberry 9650 and a femtocell - it is sounds as good as a high quality landline. It didn't sound as good with HTC and Samsung (CDMA) phones, but this is indicative of the quality of the phone's voice circuitry.Great noise cancelling microphone - with the windscreen on, you can use it outdoors even in strong wind (20 mph). Background noise is very muted and callers are usually amazed that I am on a cell.Works with glasses and hats - unit is held in place by friction. It's light enough so it works well. This makes it great for outdoor activities.Cord is perfect length and is designed to work with the phone on a belt clip or pants pocket. Form factor is great and it takes little space.Surprisingly, friction alone holds the unit in place. It is pretty durable too (sitting on it or dropping it)Cheap - for $35, it performs much better than the Jawbone/Plantronics bluetooth variety without the radiation risk and outperforms high end corded headsets too (call center sets, theBoom)Cons:2.5mm plug. Every modern smartphone uses 3.5mm. Time for an update.Uncomfortable and itchy after extended (4-5 hrs) use. The plugs are made of soft plastic so you need to air out your ear after a few hours (no discomfort then)
As a long-time Motorola bluetooth headset user, I can tell you from painful experience that there are fundamental flaws in the HS850.  In fact, I went through FOUR HS850 headsets (under warranty) before Motorola decided to upgrade me to the H700 (despite the lower model number, the H700 is a newer model).The HS850 and H700 have the same characteristics:- Over-the-ear swing arm earpiece that can be used on left or right ear- Flip-open boom microphone that turns the headset on/off- Easy volume controls- Toggle switch to connect/disconnect calls (or put them on hold/mute)- Easy pairing- Good published battery life- Standard Motorola power connectorsWhat's the difference?  Well, "good published" battery life is the distinction.  All four of the HS850 headsets worked for a few weeks or months, but then would not hold a charge.  Battery life went down to MINUTES.Dealing with Motorola support was a nightmare.  Apparently, their support center for these products was in Argentina, and they could only do what was in their script to help me.  After the fourth failure, I insisted on getting a support contact at their corporate HQ in Illinois.  That support contact was a dream.  After reviewing my case, he gave me the H700 as a replacement.  I had that headset for 1.5 years, and it had kept its battery life and functionality.  Of course, I lost it and had to buy a replacement...and given all the choices, I got another H700.Do NOT fall for the lower price of the HS850.  I've seen prices as low as $15 for this model.  I think you'll be frustrated and disappointed in the end.
Sound was fine through the headset, however the Mic did not work at all.Waste of money and not worth returning.
This wired Motorola RAZR headset is better than a Bluetooth one for these reasons:-the mic is closer to your mouth so your voice will sound better and clearer than a Bluetooth headset where the mic is way up by your ear. I tried a wireless Bluetooth headset and my voice always sounded distant and callers could hear ambient room noise around me. They said I sounded like I was using a speakerphone. But when I use this wired headset, they say my voice is quite clear and loud.-it's easier to just plug in this wired headset at any time than fool around with the settings for syncing with the Bluetooth when you want to by on headset.-This headset is easier to carry with you than a Bluetooth one and no AC adapater charger or battery is required.-This headset is cheaper than a Bluetooth headset and in fact comes bundled with some RAZR phones.The only reason I'm not rating this headset 5 stars is that I agree with other reviews, the earpiece doesn't fit that snuggly in the ear. This is a minor complaint for me though as the headset does pretty much what I want it to do and it does it nicely.
The driver for this device completely broke my Treo 650, fortunately I have Sprint's insurance plan so I was able to get a replacement Treo. I used the latest driver from the Thinkoutside website. If you have a Treo do not get this device.
I bought this set to fix a pair of eyeglasses that had loose screws. The smallest screwdriver in this kit was perfect for that job, so mission accomplished. The tops of each screwdriver twirls independently from the shaft, meaning you can keep a finger on top of the head to stabilize the driver while you're screwing. (Sorry, there's no other way to say that.) The box suggests these screwdrivers can be used for repairing eyeglasses, cameras, watches, fishing reels, hobbies, electronics, and small appliances. I think this set will come in very handy.
I've been using this headset (although mine doesn't have the call answer button like this version does) for a few years now.  It's the first headset I've ever used that was comfortable and had great sound quality in both directions, and I've used it with 3 different phones over the years all with the same results.  I hear people perfectly and I've never had a single comment much less a complaint about the sound quality from other people.  It comes with two different size gels for your ear, and a spare of each so you're totally set.  Depending on the shape of your ear you may prefer one or the other of the ear gels.This headset is so comfortable I can wear it on my ear for hours at a time without it bothering me, and it stays snugly against my cheek and doesn't flop around in the slightest.  I don't know why it has gotten some bad reviews on this site, on other sites it averages at least 4 stars with many, many reviews.  Bottom line, I'd gladly pay 2 or 3 times what Amazon is charging for this headset, especially now that it has an answer call/end button on it.
I love this case! It's so pretty.And I love the way the case feels to the touch because of the rubber. Very happy!
For one, this product is built very cheap. This means that overtime some ports will simply stop working...why? I'm not really sure...perhaps cheap components, and slight bending?Secondly, it does not support charging, and yet it does at the same time. If you plug in say an apple device you'll get an error, but it will charge which again does not make sense.This is not a 3.0 USB hub, it's a 2.0. Many new devices will require you to have 3.0 now or in the near future. For instance, my new webcam hates being plugged into this hub as the performance greatly drops.Lastly: Mine is just about destroyed, because of a slight drink mishap. Nothing seems to be wrong with device other than...it stops working from time to time, and I sometimes have to clean the ports with a small amount of water to get it to work again..just very annoying.- Additional Notes: The Stand is horrible. It won't stay on, especially if you have multiple cords attached that pull in various directions like the power cable. (It falls out easily, it does not snap on, it's basically just a slightly heavy stand that it "rests" on top of. (Useless)- It glows neon Blue. Why? I'm not sure. I like it because it matches my setup, but it's very bright, and I'd rather the "power" be used towards the other devices.Finally: This device will likely not support 7 devices being plugged in at the same time....I would get 3-4 to work...maybe.... at any given point. Eventually the two bottom ports simply decided to "not work" entirely which is completely stupid because I rarely ever used those ports to begin with. This also made me think there was something wrong with my device, and wasted my time trouble shooting. (just had to switch ports) In other words...don't buy this device...get a cheaper hub with more slots, or a 3.0 hub with more features.This is cheap...
I gave one of these away 2 years ago, when it failed to stay paired with my BB Pearl.  Decided to give it another try with my MotoQGlobal (ATT), and am thoroughly satisfied.  Reception is great, and there is an audible signal for every function, including receipt of e-mail or text messages.  Great purchase at just over $40!!UPDATE 8/5/2009: Just stopped working, with no warning.  Out of warranty, unfortunately.
Love it works great never had a issue with it at all would buy a million more ifi needed them
I used have one of this earpeice 2 years ago and I lost it, so I ordered this since this is much much cheaper than my previous one.Different from the previous peice, this item came in with extremely cheap package and it's sound quality is worse than my previous one. My friends complained about the ECHO and noise sometimes so I suspect if this is actually a refurbed one. Sometimes the manufacturer sell such items for much less with simplized packaging.
Plug this in. Sometimes it connects; sometimes it doesn't.I hear callers just fine, but they ask if I am in the bathroom when I wear this.If I leave it plugged into the earphone jack of my phone, it somehow manages to turn my phone off after a few minutes of non-use.I would send it back, but my total cost was only $3.My phone is an older Motorola v365, and I'm sticking with to my BluetoothPlantronics 510 [Retail Packaging]. Maybe this can be an emergency backup.
Got this is a timely mannor, put it in my phone, chatged for 12+ hours and nothing ! Never worked ! Annoyed to say the least ! I ordered this just in time to go into the hospital for a ce section so i wouldnt have to charge my phone all that often considering bending and such will be painfull. A lot of good it did me.
I could not be more impressed. I was highly skeptical as I have been buying bluetooth headsets like crazy trying to find one that worked, and they're all pretty much junk. This thing worked all the way out to the sidewalk, and likely much further, but that's as far as I went. The quality on the other end is very clear. The manual is plain stupid, it looks like they were half way through putting it together when they released it, but on the Mac the manual was of course not needed, just plug it in and it worked without any of the driver install nonsense Windows requires. BTW, I am using it primarily with Skype.OK, I have to add something to this review. There's a fatal flaw in this device. A flaw that makes the device near worthless to me now. If the USB cable is unplugged, but the earpiece is left clipped into the holder/charger, the battery runs down within hours. Obviously a simple diode somewhere would have prevented this, but for me the device now is close to useless.Update: May 8th 2011. So, 5 years later, the device is seriously failing. the electronics in the device are dying. I am having to constantly remove the battery to get the headset to work, and it's cutting me off in the middle of calls. It also refuses to charge, and discharges when not in use even when the base is connected via USB. It's a pity its failing, and I came looking for a new version, but there is none. Should I just buy it again?
Ever since i bought this headset I have become a fan of it. Its so comfortable I can wear it whole day without even feeling anythin is on, voice is crystal clear and its very easy to use. It pairs perfectly with my nokia 6610 as well as with my Dell Laptop so i use it for both VOIP calls and mobile phone calls. Also the service was great. I received the package right on the estimated date and never had to followup with anyone. A Superb Product !!!
It works, that's about all that can be said for it. It charges my Galaxy fine, but cord does not retract. Mine came with a busted spring. Cheap enough I don't care, not worth the shipping to return. It charges, I suppose that's all that matters
needed a power source with a mini usb. This is exactly what I needed. It was also delivered very fast.  I use this to power a RCA to HDMI converter for a Roku 3.
I have placed these in several of my phones since they first came out in the 1990s. I know that they made a big difference in my older phones that had physical antennae&#8217;s which needed to be pulled out of the phone.  Since the phone antennae&#8217;s have changed, I haven&#8217;t been able to notice any significant improvements with these installed or without them. I install them now because I got some for free and this is probably what they are now worth. The level of improved reception is about as noticeable as the loss of cash that I paid to get these free signal boosters.
This bluetooth headset works great and the only reason that I did not give it 5 stars is because sometimes it takes a little bit to establish a connection with my cell phone.  However, this rarely happens and have had this problem with other bluetooth headsets.  Setup is extremely easy and have had no other problems with the device.
cable works fine with my verizon Galaxy S4, it charges and transmit the data fine.However, connector tip(phone side) is too thick, it won't fit if you use aftermarket cases.
But will keep this short and sweet -Cord contains lead and must be handled regularly in a car where there is nowhere to clean your hands after touching the thing.Sound quality quickly goes downhill with crackling evident after only 5 uses.Now stuck in my dashboard player because the modular adapter broke off and the cassette will not fully eject. I am sure the husband will be griping the entire time he tries to get it unstuck.Avoid at all costs!I scanned past the negative reviews since this product had a few really positive reviews with a lot of helpful votes. Big mistake as now I have to unstick the adapter from my cassette player and try to get Amazon to take it back. (I bought 2 on clearance)
I am in love with this phone!First off, the Palm functionality is wonderful! The address book and calendar all work excellently, and the cross-functions are greatImprovements include SMS messaging, which is much faster and now includes hyperlinks for phone numbers and web addresses, unlike the Treo 600The web on here is faster ---- the screen is crisperHowever, BlueTooth is the BEST new feature ----- wireless data transfer is, usually, quick, and the wireless headphones are greatLastly - many have complained that the phone is too slow with its functions and unstable --- however, ever since the system software was updated to 1.12, it has made the phone much quicker and much more stable!Ordering a new phone today should come with that 1.12 software built into it, alreadyI am a former Treo 300 and 600 user, and the 650 is a wonderful upgrade and worth every penny, considering the bluetooth and software improvementsalso - if you're going GSM, then the UNLOCKED model is a great idea, as this model can work on any GSM network in the world, depending on which SIM card you useso buy it!!! - you won't be sorryPS - the Cardo Scala bluetooth earpiece is the best earpiece out there for this phone
This item doestn work on 2001 Chevy suburban.I tried too many things to get it work but no chances anyways dual position thing is good for using with different players.
I bought mine from Amazon cuz this was just about the lowest price I could find. Before I actually bought it I did some serious testing and reading about other headsets. I've tried Jabra 250, Jabra 500, Motorola HS850 and they all had one major problem - quite static-y. Actually the HS850 was a little better in this area than the Jabra headsets. I've had Jabra 250 for almost two years - static-y big time. If I put the phone in my left pant pocket and the headset on the right ear theres' noise all the time - this is not acceptable for me. The HS850, unlike the Jabra, has poor design. Any time I turn my head sharply this thing is flabbing on my ear as if it's going to fly out at any moment. This is why I wanted something better, not the same.I went on Amazon and read reviews on all kinds of headsets and my attention stopped on the Plantronics Voyager 510 from some company I'd never heard of. The the reviews were good. Even though my BestBuy store didn't carry it I decided to make the investment, buy it online and test it in the hopes to keep it.I received my headset, hooked it up to my phone - that was easy, no problem here.Then as soon as I started using it I noticed that there was no static, almost no static. I could keep my phone anywhere around me and there would be no static - a major advantage to the previous headsets.Then I noticed how easy it is to answer phone calls with it. the answer button is large enough, right against the ear, so I just had to press it against the ear using one finger. How cool is that?! The HS850 design was like that too but the Jabra 250 needed two fingers to answer one to support the headset and the other to press the answer button - I noticed with the new Jabra 500 that wasn't an issue anymore.The Plantronics is light, easy to put on, not flabby  - wraps around your ear pretty good.There's only a few things I didn't like about it and I hope the manufacturer is listening now:1. Picks up surrounding noise. If I am out people can hardly hear what I'm saying - even if there's hardly any wind. It's so bad that I've given up on using it outside.2. The ear bud needs to be tinier. I loved the small jelly-type of earpiece that Jabra had - you could hardly feel it in your ear.3. The power button is too tiny and hard to push. Not that this is a big deal because I hardly ever need to shut down my headset but it would be nice to have one that's larger still one that's not easy to hit by accident.I didn't give this review five stars because the headset needs to do a better job at fending off surrounding noise.Other than that, I highly recommend this headset. I have yet to see a headset that's as good as this one!
The Torx screw drivers work wonderfully and the tweezers work well, but the pry tool is too weak and ineffectual for the project I used them on.I bought this kit to remove the cameras out of my HTC 4G LTE and I didn't have any problems except for removing the small plastic portion on the bottom rear side of the phone.  The pry tool was way too flimsy for the job and I'm not convinced that it would do the trick for any similar function.I'd recommend this kit if you primarily purchased it for the Torx drivers but not if you require the use of the pry tool as well.
I have never had a Bluetooth headset before the 510.  I use it with a Motorola i870 Nextel phone.  The headset works great, sometimes it disconnects for a moment and I just press the button on the side of the headset and it reconnects.  The talk time is awesome and I have gotten almost 5 hours continuous talk time out of the device.  The range isn't too bad I think I can get about 30 feet from my i870.  If only my crappy Nextel phone could keep up will the quality of the headset.  Since my i870 battery goes dead in like 1 1/2 with the extended batter pack I have to plug it in to charge.  However, while it's plugged in I can still use the 510 and wander all over the house and still talk on the phone.  It almost replaces the phone if I could dial from it.  The best part is that when you get too far away it gets a little static so that you know to come back closer and then the sound quality clears up.  Everyone I have spoken with on the headset says it sounds very nice and clear.Overall I would suggest this headset to anyone because it works, it's cheap and it wears extremely comfortable on your ear.
For several years I used a Logitech Bluetooth for my cell phone, and while it worked great, it was always uncomfortable. When it snapped in two, I decided on the Voyager 510! Wow, not only does it work great, but it is VERY, VERY COMFORTABLE! In fact, I can honestly say I actually forget that I am wearing it, something I cannot say about my previous device. So for all of you thinking of a headset, you cannot go wrong with this one! Five stars!
I have used it now for 2 weeks with a RAZR V3 and I am satisfied it works as advertised. It was very easy to pair the headset with the phone. The sound is good even in noisy environments. The headset is light, confortable and fits well.My only complaint is about the smart button used to turn on/off, answer, dial and pair. The button is also a LED indicator. The LED flashes diferently (different colors, intervals) for various modes but it is difficult to see the LED while pushing and holding the button. After a few days I got used to it and now I know how long to hold the button down to switch on/off, pair or use voice dial.At $42 it is a good deal.
I love this thing!  I've bought them for my son & cuz who are also music lovers!  Can play my music on long trips and just riding around!
We've had the Sidekick II for about two months.  Although my 11-year-old likes it for its buttons and Gee Whiz value, I find it very awkward to use as a phone.  It doesn't have a normal keyboard, so you must flip the screen up to press the keys, then flip the screen back down to listen and talk.  When you get into a voicemail situation, you have to keep flipping the screen up to "press 1 for English", etc.  Very annoying.You also must pay an additional $20 per month if you want to browse the Internet, use Instant Messaging, or even Download Fun.  Otherwise, all you get is phone calls and text messaging (which is also extra).  Even the non-sidekick phones let you get T-Zones for Instant Messaging as a $5.00 option.Another gripe is that the phone is falling apart after two months of not very rough usage.  The screen no longer slips into place when flipped open and the letter "A" has fallen out.  It occasionally just freezes for no reason. The first phone I received froze up the first day and had to be replaced.The battery is built into the phone, so you can't take it out to let the phone reset itself.  No such thing as having an extra battery on a trip, for example.Internet browsing is cool, but so slow you think it stopped working.  I think some of the fault is just the slow connection, but the other part of the fault is that the phone seems to take a long time to actually build the web page it's trying to display.Oh, yeah.  Another problem is that T-Mobile expects you to pay $9.95 to set up your album on its web site, then 29 cents for each photo you upload to it.The phone is too large and heavy and has poor quality voice reproduction.  You can't use wallpaper and the ring tones sound terrible.Although it looks good on paper, it isn't really ready for prime time.
The sound quality was excellent, but the earpiece is flimsy and irreplacable: terrific electrical engineering, poor mechanical engineering.I loved it when it wasn't broken.  Even wind didn't seem to bother the headset much.  The voice quality was great on transmission and reception.  But the earpiece is incredibly flimsy and can't be replaced.  I got a new headset the first time on warranty.  The second time it broke I could have gotten a free replacement again but I didn't want the hassle.  I have a Scala now that I've been using for months and I'm very happy with it, even though the sound and wind-immunity doesn't measure up to the Logitech.
Good quality and performance for the price. if you are looking for a good and cheap aux cable this is a good option. The only thing is that you need to be careful when you use it, is not unbreakable.
It was so much easier to buy this off amazon than to go a store and have to deal with the sales person.  Amazon you rock.
I've had my T610 for about 3 months now and I'm still in love with it.  I highly recommend getting a bluetooth adapter for your computer to take advantage of customizing this baby.  I've downloaded Midi files, games and photos off the web and copied them to the T610 for FREE!  No SMS charges or web site fees.  It's everything I wanted in a new cell phone.  Camera, color display, fully customizable.  It's great.  Battery life is still good.  Standby about 3 to 4 days, talk about 3 to 5 hours, maybe more.  The down side... Color display hard to see in bright daylight (but not impossible), it has frozen on me a few times, mostly with internet.  Internal antenna may not be as strong as an external,  but I usually get great reception even with only 1 bar showing (inside bldgs).  Highly recommend, might want to look into the T626 or T630 for better color display.  Go get it!
I've had this headset for about a month now and at first I was very satisfied. I like the shape, it's comfortable enough to wear all day (and I wear it from 7:30 a.m. to about 9:00 p.m.), and the battery lasts almost forever. The headset loads into the charger like a knife into its sheath. The charger even has an accessory belt clip so you can carry it with you as a holster for the headset. The sound is loud and clear unless you drive with your windows down, and the ear gel can be adjusted to put the sound right where you want it. So why 4 stars?My only complaint is that aside from being wearable on either ear, this headset is totally NOT adjustable. Perhaps the shape of my face and/or ear is unusual, but the earpiece keeps pulling away from my ear. Add to that the fact that the headset wants to work itself off my ear entirely, and the lack of adjustability is a problem for me. Lest anyone wonder, I'm not a small person and my ears sit stylishly flat against my head.I solved the foregoing problems by cutting a heavy duty paperclip to length, bending it into the appropriate shape, and taping it to the headset with electrician's tape. Then I bent the wire so that the earpiece fits snugly into my ear. As a bonus, the tape adds a little extra bulk around the upper loop of the headset, which helps hold everything in place. Problem solved, but why not engineer some adjustibility in during design?I'd still buy it, no problem there, but I can't give it five stars because the lack of built-in adjustibility is, to me, a definite oversight.
Had all the marking of a legit samsung product but the cord stop working after 3 days. I'm not upset because it was very inexpensive but maybe you should spend a little more and buy a better product off amazon. When it did work it worked very well.
the Torx screwdrivers were great, the tweesers were substandard, and the spluger was very cheap, mine broke the first time i used it.  For the price you cannot expect high quality.  all in all it did the job
i bought the wrong cable- which is my fault.  so sue me.  but don't actually sue me- i can't afford a lawyer.
Not only is this sticky pad great to keep things from sliding but you can trim it to fit an area or 'shelf' on the dash.
A note of caution from someone who owned and used just about every major Blackberry model: if you already own a standard USB 2.0 cable and you don't need an extra, then you do NOT need this cable. All a Blackberry needs for data transfer is a STANDARD USB 2.0 cable with a Micro-USB connector at one end.There is NOTHING special about this cable and nothing justifies the artificially inflated MSRP listed for it. While this item is sold at a 90% off the MSRP discount, it's probably okay to purchase one, for as long as, after reading the first paragraph you decide that you will need a USB 2.0 cable.The items has 2 stars taken away for the exaggerated marketing claim (professional grade custom cable) and for the inflated MSRP.NOTE: Please make sure that you buy cable with a MICRO-USB connector because this is what your Blackberry needs.
This charger woks wonderfully on the Samsung Galaxy S4.  it chargers the phone fast and the price is great!  Highly Recommended product!
This case was by far the best case I bought for this phone.  It is very stylish and I received many compliments
It's no problem charging mobile devices while you're driving, since these devices can be charged from a USB port, either built into the vehicle (newer models) or from USB chargers that fit in the vehicle's power port (aka cigarette lighter). But a lot of small electrical appliances are only made to work with AC power, and for those devices, a 12-volt in-vehicle power inverter is the answer. I have bought dedicated power adapters for laptop computers, but these are expensive and usually only work with a particular model laptop. I tried the Sabrent 75-watt inverter in my Subaru, and it worked fine for providing both AC and USB power. I used it with two of my AC-powered camera battery chargers and a AA battery charger:Canon G10 battery charger - 14 wattsNikon D3200 battery charger - 20 wattsMaha AA battery charger - 16 wattsI also used the inverter to charge my HP laptop while using the laptop. The laptop uses a maximum of 50 watts while running, which is well below the inverter's limits. While using the inverter for AC devices, I also recharged my Android smartphone with the 1A USB charging port.One caution: Every vehicle's electrical system has a maximum rated power that it can deliver through the vehicle's power port. For my Subaru Forester, the owner's manual says this is 120 watts. Trying to power a device or devices that exceed that limit will likely blow a fuse. I should also note that Subaru sells its own 100-watt power inverter for my vehicle, but it costs about $300, while the Sabrent inverter is a small fraction of that amount.For anyone who has a need for AC power in their vehicle, the Sabrent inverter is a good option to consider. The inverter is also available in 150 watts (Sabrent 150w Power Inverter with 2.1A-1A Dual USB Charger 12v DC to 120v AC (PW-C15U)) and 300 watts (Sabrent 300w Power Inverter with 2.1A-1A Dual USB Charger 12v DC to 120v AC (PW-C30U)).A product sample was provided by the manufacturer for review purposes.
I am pleased with this purchase.  The detachable cable option gives very good flexibility for use with other USB cable chargers.  Good quality for a travel charger.
My moms car couldn't have an upgraded radio (freaking saabs...) but one of the two positions didn't work. Still worked for her though.
Very please with the antenna but had to buy extra adaptor for it to fit my booster. Should have a bit more info.
This is my fourth consecutive Motorola phone. I've owned a Timeport, v66, and v600. The Timeport was simply terrible. The v66 was a little better, but the Motorola menu had to be the worst of any phone I had ever used. My v600 was a very pleasant surprise. My sleek and functional RAZR is the best phone that I have owned. I really like the large crisp screen. The tiny external screen is a great addition. After three weeks of fairly heavy use, I haven't had any problems. The RAZR has pretty good talk time, but I'm not certain whether or not one can really get the 7 hours claimed by Motorola. The feature that I really like and appreciate is the abilit to charge my phone with a standard USB cable. It's nice not having to carry around an extra charger when I'm already lugging around my laptop and its power supply.
thank you. it did not disappoint. was as expected and does the job though I am going to a new phone as the galaxy 2 has been acting up consistently. shutting down by surprise etc...
This detachable sansung galaxy s2 travel charger is simply good. It works perfectly.  The cherry on the cake is because it is longer than the factory original l received with the phone.
I bought this headset to use in while driving. The connection is really good. I have small ears and it was always a problem for me to find a headset or earphones. Luckily this headset has 3 different pieces to fit in your ear. The only problem is that it is hard to put it on although very comfy afterwards. Recommended.
This charger worked fine for a while but now it has a bad connection somewhere inside. I have to jiggle the body of it around until a good connection is produced. The problem is not the wall outlet -- this happens in any outlet in any building.
Oh my, crystal clear... stands up to its name. ..absolutely easy directions to follow... No lint. . my screen looks like it has no protector on it. I am very careful with my device, so I do not know how it will handle items scratching the screen or fingerprints..I received it quickly, and I didn't have to pay for shipping, plus because I bought one item, received this packet for free. It comes with two screen protectors. If you follow the directions, you should not need the other. I have purchased others, and followed the directions and still end up with lint underneath... YES, I would recommend this item. ..It is a must have for your phone. ..
This earpiece worked well for me.  It had good range and sound quality and the hands free activation was very useful. One huge design flaw as I see it however was the on/off button.  To turn on/off the device you have to hold down the button.  After only a few months of use the button began to malfunction and over time the button totally stopped working. I purchased the device in November and by March the button had stopped working at all.  Since this is the same button that you have to push to answer a call, disconnect a call or activate voice recognition when the button stopped working the device became pretty useless.
these are the very best quality at a AWESOME price.Save $20. over a cell phone company price.
This charger works great with my Galaxy S3. When its plugged in it takes up very little room and doesnt stick out of the accessory slot but about a quarter inch.  Charges pretty fast also...
although i do not use the charger, the cable is useful.  it is longer than what is given with the phone.  the additional length allows the phone to be placed in plain sight, instead of down by the wall receptical
Shure's QuietSpot headset is the best headset on the market, period. The only problem with it is Shure's coyness about how it works and why microphone placement is *absolutely crucial* when using it. Once you understand that, you understand everything you need to in order to want it more than you want anyone else's.The "problem" with the QuietSpot--mentioned by other reviewers here--is not a failure of engineering or quality control, but one of emphasis in their documentation. Barring an actual defective unit (which will usually not work at all) there is nothing wrong with the QuietSpot that proper adjustment doesn't totally eliminate. I believe that Shure doesn't tell you this for fear of alienating technically unsophisticated customers. Since I have nothing to sell you, I am blissfully unconcerned with boring you and can write something useful. Please note that I write this on the basis of a close examination of a working QuietSpot and an educated layman's knowledge.Observation tells me that, Shure's QuietSpot headset uses active noise cancellation and it is the only cellular headset on the market that does.  This means that the mouthpiece of the headset uses two microphones: one takes in the sound from the world around you while the second takes in the sound from your mouth.Using  a trick of wiring, this dual-microphone arrangement uses the sound from the outside world and uses it to weaken the sound from the microphone closer to our mouth. Since both microphones take in surrounding sound, the strongest sound that *isn't* cancelled out is your voice.For this to work, the microphones need very good alignment with your mouth. The  QuietSpot demands that you have the 'mouth-side' microphone pointed directly at your mouth, and the 'world side' microphone pointed directly outwards without mis-alignments like having the microphone-housing too far below or two far above the side of your mouth, or having the microphone housing turned on its side.The tough part about this is that the boom that holds the microphone can twist and bend while the QuietSpot is in your pocket or case, turning the microphone head around onto its side. If the microphone-head is turned on it's side, or set too far above or below your mouth, then both microphones pick up your voice with equal intensity and the arrangement does exactly as it's supposed to: It treats *your voice* like background-noise and sends everything you say off into oblivion.The solution is easy and useful: you have to learn to put the QuietSpot's microphone in the right place every time you put it on. Once you learn to do this with the windscreen on, you have what is close to the perfect headset. I have used the QuietSpot, standing in bars in New York City with the jukebox blasting and not had to raise my voice very far above an ordinary conversational volume and with the QuietSpot's noise-blocking earpiece, I could hear my listener perfectly. The two-way noise elimination of a well-adjusted QuietSpot is amazing, providing a sense of intimacy and privacy in conversations that no other headset ever gave me including one or two that cost more.The only other thing you need to know about the QuietSpot is that it is particularly sensitive to wind=noise and unless you intent to never use it outside, it is best to keep the windscreen permanently attached to the unit. You can do this with a needle and thread through the foam, or with a thin-strand of wire. Once you've done this, you'll have to learn to make the important adjustment by touch but even then, it's still easy.Now that you know all this, give the QuietSpot a try. You won't be disappointed.
I bought these eargels for my bluetooth, which happens to be a Samsung WEP200, and it fit it perfectly. Gives great comfort and a perfect fit. Comes with more than just three. Comes with a whole bunch. Highly recommended product
It does well in the car and has good range.  It can reach my phone from everywhere in the house and can reach amazingly far at work.  Good thing because the are some cell dead zones at work.  The cell can stay where the reception is good.It sounds a little hollow though.  Folks can tell when I'm hands free.
Having had the Motorolla HT850, I liked its light weight and ease to turn on but it was never loud enough for driving.  The Plantronics 510 is very loud and fits well. My only negative is the small power on switch.  All in all, I vote for the Plantronics
I have bought many products from boxwave and have never been disappointed. Their products are excellent quality and at a great price. I would highly recommend this product.
The cover fits properly leaving all the necessary openings available for easy access.  It keeps the screen lifted off the surface when the phone is put face down.  Overall, it does all what I need it to do.  Operating the power and volume buttons is a little awkward as it is hard to find the buttons by feel.  I would recommend this product for anyone looking for basic protection.
I have been using the HS850 for the better part of 2008 and have found it to be a competent little unit.  It pairs quite nicely with my Motorola i880 that was assigned by my employer.  I find the volume level to be good, though not outstanding.  I can hear the other party quite clearly and have had no complaints going in the other direction.The HS850 that I got from Amazon came with a charger and minimal instructions, but I had no issues.  After being plugged in for one overnight cycle it was ready to go.  The fact that the mike boom also acts as an on/off switch is great, as it tends to conserve battery life.  Are there better units on the market ?  Most likely.  But I feel that I've gotten some decent value out of this handy headset from Motorola.
This is no imitation. I bought a knock off because it was $15 vs. $30 locally. The knock off died in a month. I saw this, at this price, and figured I had little to lose. It charges my cell phone quickly, and does not heat up. Interestingly, the phone does not get hot either, as it did with the first charger I had that came with the phone, as well as the knock off. It is great, and so cheap, I should have (will) buy more. This is a no brainer. It is reliable and works better than what I have had. Not much more I can say.
This case has a tackle touch which makes it nice to carry. Not worried about dropping the phone.Fits well and works just fine,  thank you very much. .
It gives more bars then had before. Such a perfect item. Made my bf very happy as well. So perfect of an item.
They are nothing special for sure, but it's nice that you can tell when it is powered up by the led that glows in it.  able to charge two phones at once in the car which is nice.
UPDATE: 18 March 2014After having the case for a week, I absolutely love it! It hasn't broken, however it has broken in nicely and is very comfortable to use. Cards are held securely and the pocket is just deep enough for bills folded in half. Plus, it is very stylish. I have received several compliments and questions regarding where they can get their own. My only complaint is that access to the volume buttons is restricted (I use them for skipping music tracks while I'm driving so that I don't have to turn the screen on).ORIGINAL: 11 March 2014I've only had the case on the phone for a couple hours, but I thought I would give you an update of what works. When I put the phone in the case, it came out almost immediately. Solution: take the back cover off the phone then put it in the case. It holds it much more securely and now I don't have to worry about it. The case itself seems well made and thicker than I had hoped, but hopefully that will protect the phone well. The one thing I am worried about is how thin the plastic is that holds the phone in the case. I'll give an update if it breaks or chips like many other reviewers, but until then, great case.
This is a usb wireless headset. just plug it in to your mac or pc and it sees it as another sound device , no drivers needed (xp or os x) I tested it with Skype on the mac and teamspeak on my pc . It comes with a sound api for windows for skype and a few others that allow the buttons on the phone to pickup or hangup calls , I did not try it out because I just like to use apps as is without special add ons ...The range is great , so if you skype and dont want to be tied to your pc then plug this bad boy in and your free to walk all over the house , same goes for teamspeak for the gamers out there.It was so pleasing for something to just work out of the box for a change! I tried for hours to do the same thing using bluetooth and it was a mess... This thing just works!
Update: I've been asked how they hold up with sweat (see below). No problem working up a sweat on the treadmill, but I must stress that I've not put in a summer run. I also must say that I do not expect longevity from a non-sweatoroof product, and that the s11 headphones are designed with a sweatproof nano coating. HOWEVER, since you asked, they still sound and work excellent. They bounce around running, but it's not intolerable... Just not ideal.  BATTERY: I've used them every day since I got them, and often times days at the house studying all day and going to the gym.  They last from morning to night constantly connected.  I often forget I'm wearing them when I turn on my music and don't hear any sound from my phone/tablet.Edit: just for the record, the Motorola site says these are NOT for working out (under questions about product, it says not sweatproof and should be kept away from moisture). I'm going to work out in them anyway and I'll report back when they fail.=============================================================I bought the jaybird bluebuds x for my girlfriend, and I've used them several times, so that is my comparison point.These headphones have a very utilitarian, price conscious design. They don't sound as awesome as the $180 bluebuds, and they aren't as sleek as them (bluebuds are just a cord with tiny ear pieces). BUT, they are very easy to control, very light, and sound very good. I'm not taking away anything by saying they don't sound as good as the bluebuds... The bluebuds sound as good as Bose or klipsch wired models of similar cost (even MKBHD says they are amazing). The Motorola buds really sound great. I'd choose them based on sound over any of the cheaper wired sets I have (skull candy, JVC, etc.)The ear pieces, at first, I was worried about them. They didn't look like they would be very secure, but I was wrong. You can easily work out with them and they will stay in. And they swivel a bit at the ear pieces, so every time you move, you don't hear a bunch of thumping like many in-ear wired sets.And taking them out to hear the world around you is nice, because of the magnets. No flopping around.The built-in equalizer settings are nice, the controls are easy, and they stay around your neck when laying on your back.So you sacrifice some portability over the bluebuds, but you get a great ease of use, very good sound, and less than half the price.And truthfully, while they aren't super stylish... People are walking around with those giant beats studio headphones on. These look way less ridiculous than that, and really aren't that bad. Don't wear them to a job interview.
The first battery received lost it's charge overnight..the vendor replaced it with another look alike that is working better.Not totally happy with the quality but the vendor was responsive and that is important for discount item transactions like this.
These were a supper price and while not supper strong they will do the job and you get a lot for your money.
Use this in my truck and its been working very well!  I would definitely recommend. Its also very compact, so I can take w/me when I go to another vehicle.
These are awesome and make my phone look so stylish! I have only used one so far and have had it on for almost a year! CAN YOU BELIEVE THAT! ONE YEAR!! Great quality!
I've bought several hard cases for my note2 and this one is my favorite. It's easy to put on and take off (once you figure it out). I don't drop my phone usually so I can't say how it will do if you drop it but it only covers the back and the sides. it's a one piece hard case which I really like.
I am not only please with the product but also the cost I got it at.
Purchased a total of 3 so far.. 1st one had no sound but seller replaced immediately.. others were purchased to use by co-workers instead of the $50.00 apiece ones they were given from verizon purchase.. Stay in ear and work well...
Loving it. Clearly sound on calls, long live battery and comfort ear hock. I trust all of Motorola Bluetooth Headset.
The cable is good, but it does not fit the Samsung Galaxy S4. It does plug in, but not far enough in to hold securely.
The order was delivered on time and the clear touch is nice fit for my Galaxy S4. I ordered the anti glare version and it is easy to apply w/o any air bubbles. The protector works nice on the sun light. Also no finger prints or marks visible. Would definitely recommencement.
A good inexpensive cable that works like the original.  I purchased this cable because I wanted one that would work with the touch stone I just purchased.  After reading several reviews and looking at competing cables I deciding on this one.  While several inches shorter (40") than the original it works well and with the touch stone.  I used this cable mainly for use in the car.
I always have triable keeping my phone from moving when in my sports car. I like to keep my phone close to my hands and this sticky pad allows me to do exactly that even when I make a sharp turn. The phone alway stays in place. If it gets a bit dusty, you can wash it and is as good as new again.
does not have the need amps to charge things like ipads, or hp touchpads. but its super small and compact.
This charger works great and is short, unlike most chargers. It does a great job with charging both my phone and my GPS when I am in the car.  Great value and easy on the wallet.
I love my Kindle Fire, but I hate the micro plug.when plugging in a charger cord, I find that sometimes it doesn't recognize that the plug is in and sometimes I have to jiggle it a little to get the charging box to turn green to show that it is, in fact, charging. I cannot stand the A/C wall charger that came with the Fire. It is ridiculously short making it very difficult to find a place to charge it safely and I have purchased several of these cords since last Christmas and a majority work for a while and then break or don't work at all. Sometimes it is hit or miss and then sometimes a cord charges and then sometimes it acts up and refuses to charge. I have the same plug on my Samsung Stratosphere and I don't seem to have the same problem.With this cord the part that plugs into the Fire virtually fell apart. I don't care how much you pay for one of these type of cord, they should all work. When I started using it, this cord "appeared" on my visual inspection to be well made, but I guess looks are deceiving. The cord, of course, fell apart after the return date so I'm stuck.I really don't recommend this cord. I realize that it could be just a single defective one,but, of the three other reviews, only one person out of four of us recommended this cord. So just beware.
..and I'm from Europe, where the phones and networks are much better than in the States. I have to say that I think Samsung currently have the best software (and I used to be a huge Nokia fan). Amazingly light, very intuitive, great audio, and just looks great. I recommend this without any reservations whatsoever.
I chose this product based on reading many reviews of Plantronics and Motorola headsets primarily on Amazon. I am very happy with my purchase. As others have said, most will never know you are on a headset. The battery lasts all day, so having a charger with me during the day has never been even remotely necessary. I've talked 3 or 4 hours some days, and had it on all day when I'm not talking, and have never run the battery down. I do charge it when I get home each evening. The volume is more than enough (and I'm a bit hard of hearing). It's comfortable so I just leave it on most of the time when I'm at work. It works equally well in either ear. It connects quickly and works great. Sometimes it seems a bit hard to get on, but other times it just slips into place. But we're talking sometimes it takes 10 seconds of fiddling to get it over my ear just right. Usually, it just slips on. I wear glasses and I think that's most of the issue there. Highly recommended and I would purchase this again w/o question.
They claim this works for Sprint PCS but I got one for my Virgin Mobile MC760 and it won't pick up any signal! In fact it actually makes the signal weaker!  I have to put the MC760 in a window to get a decent signal so I thought putting an antenna on the roof would be better but when I plug it into the MC760 the signal strength goes down! I tried connecting it to a spectrum analyzer to check but it doesn't get any signals compared to another cellphone antenna that does receive. I tried emailing Wilson but they weren't any help. Another problem was the cheaply made adapter that connects the proprietary FME connector on the antenna cable and plugs into the MC760. I had to try 3 of them before I got one that would work. The first one had bad threads and wouldn't go on all the way, the second one had a loose center pin that pushed back in when I tried to connect it. The third one finally did fit correctly but there was still no signal. I don't see how Wilson can get away with selling worthless junk antennas like this, they must get a lot of consumer fraud complaints. I'm sending this useless antenna back for a refund.I purchased a Wilson 301101 trucker antenna, mounted it on a magnetic base for a CB antenna and stuck it on the roof and it works great. This one must have been defective.
I love it.  It charges my phone quickly and the cord is super long.  I leave it at home but will purchase another to leave at work.
Just recived my screen protectors and there amazing. They came packaged very well. They come with a very thivk cleaning cloth and some wet and dry cleaning wipes. Once I put on protector on it was really clear no problems at all great feeling to the protector it was cut really well. Will defenetly buy more when I need them wont be using another protector but boxwave.. very satisfied (:
The concept of the phone is terrific.  I have to use a 2-way pager for work, and instead of carting around a cell phone and bulky pager, I now just have this one small item.  And while I didn't think I'd really use it, the Bluetooth functionality has definitely sold me.  I can use it not only for a wireless headset, but to connect to the internet and to transfer sound files back and forth as well.The software of the phone seems to be a bit buggy still, unfortunately.  When I lock the keypad, I still sometimes hear tones when the keypad is pressed and the display lights up.  The menus are sometimes slow to respond, delaying as much as 2 full seconds (doesn't sound like much, but it can be irritating).Overall, I'd buy the phone again without hesitation, but I'm an early adopter.  If you're willing to put up with the occassional buggy behavior, I'd definitely recommend this phone.
This is a terrific device.  I use it with my Motorola RAZR V3 and it works great.  I don't know what I did without a wireless headset.  Two things that could be better - first it doesn't recognize ring tones from my phone (but I think that is the phone's problem not necessarily the headset), and second, it occassionally will drop the signal from my phone causing me to scramble to figure out how to go from the headset to my phone.  This doesn't happen very often so it really isn't that big of a deal.
Defintiely worth the price...You should order several.  Most cases are $15 and up especially at the cell phone stores.  I can't believe the mark up on these things!
I am not impressed.I don't know what the other reviewers are smoking.  This device does not cancel out background noise.  Listeners on the other end say I sound like I'm in a tunnel.  Two strikes.As you can see from the pictures there is quite a distance between one's mouth and the "pinhole" for the internal microphone.  There is no way to cancel out background noise lest your own voice be considered to be background noise.  This is a design defect in all devices that have a similar design.The earpiece is not suited for driving or walking.  The "ear attachment" and its hinge is made of flimsy loose plastic.  As a result the fit isn't tight enough.  I often need to turn my head quickly while driving and it feels like the thing's going to fly off my head into the back seat.  It's an extremely annoying distraction that you don't want to have while driving.On the good side, I don't have any problems hearing and the volume controls are very convenient to use.
This is clearly not a HTC cable as it has the Blackberry logo on it and the bulk packaging label says Blackberry...but it's a OEM micro usb cable none the less and works perfectly on any micro usb device I plugged it into.While I haven't tested it's speed against other cables I doubt it outperforms any other OEM cable but it works and that's all I asked for of it.The cable is a bit thick and as a result is stiff but not unmanageably so.It should also be noted that the cable shown in the picture is not of the actual product, that is a mini usb cable and appears to be quite a bit longer than the product, this cable is 1m long.
This headset seems to work fine, but the audio quality is nothing to write home about, to the person on the other end of the line you will sound soft and like you are talking on a speakerphone. They will also hear a lot of background noise. I am much happier with the Cardo Scala 500 Bluetooth headset. It has much better audio quality and even comes with more stuff for about the same price.And, you may not really *need* a wireless bluetooth headset because you can just use a wired one or use your speakerphone. But I admit that it's sort of cool to be totally wireless-you can put the phone in your pocket or purse and be totally unencumbered by wires, which feels a bit safer and freer, especially while driving or when you have to work with both hands and talk at the same time for example.A note about the battery-do not store this unit (or your phone) in a hot car! Heat damages batteries and shortens their lifespan.
Perhaps I just got a bad one, but this thing won't consistently work 4 feet away from the phone, let alone the 30 they claim. It's a nice design, and if it worked I'd be very happy with it.UPDATE: I just got a new BT250v after Amazon was kind enough to exchange my unit sight unseen (they even shipped out the new unit before I'd shipped back the bad one). Unfortunately, while the new unit works somewhat better, it still doesn't work as well as it should. For example, there is noticeable popping (interference) if i put my phone in my pocket, even on the same side as the headset. I've tried many combinations of phone and headset, and the only time I have problem is with this headset, so I'm quite sure it's not an issue with my phone, or with bluetooth in general. (In fact, I've had far better luck with other Jabra BT products.) So, the design is beautiful and the product is great when it works, but I've found that it fails when I really need it.FINAL UPDATE: I chucked it. Don't believe the breathless reviews about this. If you use this in everyday life--i.e. with the phone more than a few feet from your head--people on the other end will hear static. I got so sick of people asking me "what's that clicking sound?" that I threw the stupid thing away. I'm amazed people love this so much. They must be so floored by the idea of wireless technology they haven't actually tried using it for a real conversation, or they haven't actually tried to call another person. With two bad experiences with this company, that was the last Jabra product I'll ever buy.
I bought this so that I could use and charge my Tab at the same time. My tab does not recognize the high power port and will either charge while off or use power while on, it will not charge while powered on.
Not a very well made case, thought it would be of better quaility, hard to tell from just looking at it on the site.
This device is wonderful, very light weight and portable and works excellent. I purchased as a replacement USB hub for use on my laptop and very much like that you can tuck it anywhere easily. Great quality product.
It's okay, I think this is gonna fall under the category of &#34;you get what you pay for&#34;. Only had to use it for a day or two because that cellphone broke.
Its cheap the wristlet is like a little thread and not sturdy at all. You have to clip your uncased phone into the plastic backing attached 5o the purse. Money part needs length to really pack some cash in. Id like a better cash compartment which is one thing I wanted in my purchase.  Id say purchase a cheaper product like this. Id the wristlet breaks and im positive it will your product is pointless.  Buyer be aware. Update. I stopped using this. The same day I got this my phone was kind of stuck in it and without thinking I was madly pulling at it. Needless to say my note 2 went flying and cracked the screen to pieces. Just be careful handling your phone since this privides no protection and can be tough to disengage from the phone.
Excited about this based on good reviews, but did not have the same experience.Tested on my Nexus S cell phone, person on the other end complained about static and poor quality sound.  I unplugged headset and switched to using my cell, and they said the problem went away, so unfortunately problem seems to be with this headset.Also, just FYI, this does not come retail packaged, but shows up in a plastic bag with no instructions.  Not a problem for me, but makes me wonder where these are from and the quality.
it worked for the first week then it only charge my phone to 20%. it is a waste of money.
I opened it and didn't see where the springs were.. If anybody can take a pic or describe it I will love u so much. Good product but i was getting the reel error on my tape display in my ford expedition. It makes my blackberry phone sounds great. Dislike the radio so please help me.
It didn't fit properly in my 2013 Sonata. I tend to think it's a design flaw of the car unit more than the charger itself. It seems to work just fine in my friend's 2013 Maxima -- so I gave it to her :)
I use this adapter for connecting an MP3 player to my car stereo on occasion. Being retractable it compacts to store in glove compartemnt when not needed. Never fails to rewind.
bought this for work and it works great. the sound is clear and the microphone is located in a convenient location. the clip is also a great addition to the headset.
This bluetooth is basically ok but the part holding on to your ear is very 'flimsey' and tends to want to fall off if u bend over so u have to keep securing it on your ear, which is quite annoying as I almost lost it a few times not realizing it was no longer on my ear...so it's a huge drawback for me. It seems to work ok otherwise tho sometimes I do have a  sound problem that is not present when I just listen straight from the phone without it...it's sometimes quite garbled. So this product for me though cute, is average in fuction.
Looks and feels like plastic. Like the snap instead of a magnet. Looks better in the picture than in person. Holding up great after a couple of weeks. .
I picked up one of these specifically for its ability to retract; it's quite fragile and flimsy, though, and within two days, it had broken and no longer retracts. It's fine as a cable so far, but now it has a heavy middle, which means if I drop it easily as I'm trying to plug it in, and have to go hunting for it between the seats.
I had to teach an on-line WebEx class. Normally I am provided a phone bridge. However, this time, they wanted to utilize VOIP only. I didn't want to use a normal head set with a cord tie'n me to within 6 feet of the computer. I needed 8 hours of talk time, I'm the instructor. This fit the bill. I let it charge over night and it's ready for the next day. I do put it back in the charger during lunch break. The only reason I didn't give it a 5 star is that my ear hurt at the end of the day. The piece that goes over the head to keep the unit to my ear put to much pressure on my ear. I will have to try the other ear adapters.
these were advertised to fit the habra stone.  they did not. i don't know if they changed the advertisement since then but it was aid to be a package with the habra stone so i got it. not even one piece fit.  threw them away
Needed for my Razr cellphone to change the internal battery.  More tiny screwdrivers than I'll ever use but are of good quality for what I needed.
I've heard great things about this, so I tried it. Everything is great about it, except two things that made me want to return it.First, there is a little bit of crackling once my phone is across my body on my hip, and that is annoying to me because I've had some that never do that. I've noticed that Plantronics and Jabra tend to have this issue regularly with their headsets. The other thing is that it is bulky, and I prefer something a little more pettite.It does have good battery life and noise cancellation. So, it's a matter of preference when it comes to the things I disliked about it!
If you need an additional charging cord for your cell phone with a mini usb male plug this works very well. Newer phones use the more narrow usb plug so make certain you understand which version you are requesting. Well made and durable and the price is right.
Bought a few to have strategically placed around the house, cars, work, and in my briefcase and luggage packing so that I do not have to hunt for a cable.
I just love this keyboard. I've used it with my HTC and now with my unlocked iphone using BTstack Keyboard from Cydia. The only issue is that it really needs an extra row of keys. The numbers and symbols are placed on the top row of letters (where the letters QWERTYUIOP are in the keyboard). To access a number, you need to press the left function key and the corresponding letter. To type a symbol, you need to press the right function key and the corresponding letter. I work in finance and many of my annotations need numbers and symbols, like 10% for example. For that, it takes a long time. I find it easier to type "ten pc" instead of 10%.I'll buy a new keyboard just for that. But besides this, the keyboard is just amazing. So if you don't need your numbers and symbols too often, I really recommend it.
I was worried about having problems with the Auto Reverse, but it worked the very first time in my '05 Audi A4 with factory stereo. The sound quality isn't CD level, but then again its better than my old FM transmitter.
love it for moving from car to car.  great for a mobile person. can pack in brief case or backpack when travel, without worry about cord hanging or wrapping.
Vivo en Ecuador, lo compr&eacute; hace unso 8 meses, la verdad no lo uso mucho pero igual se desempe&ntilde;a bien cada vez que s lo usa, excelente calidad.
Its the only bluetooth headset I've used, so I don't have anything to compare it with.  Has made my ipaq 6315 much more usable as a phone.  Sound quality is good, some people say I sound far away, I'm experimenting with the gain on the ipaq, we'll see if that helps.  It was a little tight for me at first (big ears), I was able to bend the part that goes around the ear a little and its much better now.  Great battery life.Would be nice to have an external ringer on it, so I could hear it ringing or vibrate if I were away from the phone.  Good range 15-30'.
Fits the Motorola Razr V3 like it was specifically designed for it. The elastic top allows you to use the flip functionality of your phone unlike other leather covers that prohibit your phone from closing all the way.Perfect.
Does what it needs to do at an excellent price.  Fits well, seems rigid enough to prevent some damage, and the kickstand is a nice touch.  I don't know how well the kickstand will hold up over time, but works well.  The ridge around the front allows me to put the phone face down without it touching a table.  The case is pretty compact and still fits into the Smart Dock, although it prevents HDMI from registering.  So it charges and goes into dock mode, but doesn't seem to sit down far enough to engage the HDMI.
The phone does not fit into this junky case properly.  Completely worthless and just a money grab by the seller.  It was cheap with the coupon code because it doesn't fit!  I tossed this case is in the trash where it belongs.  I realize purchasing a cheap case is a gamble, but I never expected it be so bad that it doesn't even fit the phone. Completely useless.
I have been using this Coby CA-747 Cassette Adapter for more than 2 years to use my car stereo to play audio of my DVD-player and CD-player. Until lately, my car tape player kept rejecting it out. I thought it was broken and I was about to buy this same product from Amaonz again. While reading some other people's reviews, I bump into R. Penny's feedback on 10/26/05 about the "skip" mode as following:"One thing to keep in mind when using any product like this - some (but not all) car tape players have a "skip" mode. When a tape player's "skip" mode is active, it listens for silent portions of the tape. If it is detects any silence for more than a few seconds, it will automatically go into fast forward until it "hears" sound again. If your tape player has a "skip" mode, be sure to cancel this mode - i.e., put the player in "normal" play mode. Otherwise, you will find the tape player trying to "fast forward" over any silent portions of your audio feed."This is exactly the problem that I was having. By turning off the "skip" mode of the car tape player, my car tape player does not reject the Coby Cassette Adapter anymore.Again, even if it is indeed broken, I will buy the same product again. Very good product for the money.
I have an older computer with ony 4 usb ports and a laptop with 2 usb ports. I have 4  external drives and a printer and various other devices that require usb, and all i have to do is disconnect it from one computer and plug it into the other and everything Works great. As far as small flash drives that require external power i have no idea.  hope some reviewer will elaborate on that.  In any case its well worth the money.  It stays forever lit, and thats okay.  It will look funny 10 years from now when the lights are extinguished.
Bought it as a present for my mom to match her purse and she loves it! She likes it better that her &#34;signature&#34; case becasue of the quality
First of all, I must start out by saying that I am a little surprised that this little mechanical device is even necessary with all of the technological advances out there these days.  The HL-10 is kind of a "throw back to the seventies" in terms of its jerry rigging function.  Having said this...  Plantronics builds quality stuff and I am sure that there is a good reason for it.  The device does exactly what it is supposed to do once you adjust it for your individual phone.  I was a little concern that it would fit my phone but they include plenty of adjustment options to take care of any setup.  I am using it with a Plantronics CS351N  headset - which I love for it professional wireless function.  I tested the HL-10 by picking up/hanging up the headset 10 times in sucession and the lifter raised and lowered the receiver successfully each time.  That was good enough for me.  Definitely worth the $ if you own a wireless headset and you roam around the house/office while talking on the phone.
This earboom works a little better than most. Decent sturdy construction as well. I will buy another when it wears out.
I bought this for the at&t samsung galaxy s2 and the seller was very slow in getting this item to me. I also notice that this product do fit the SGS2, but the cut outs was NOT good. The cut out opening was too small for the power button, there was also an extra cut out for no reason. It does fit nice so I gave it 2 stars, but bad opening for my phone will be costly.
I bought this to try and repair a POS dash cam, even though this battery is great it was not the issue... It fit perfectly and accepted charge as it should.
On the strength of the very high rating and huge reviewer feedback here on Amazon, I bought this Bluetooth device -- my first bluetooth headset ever.  I finally have a phone that has Bluetooth capability, and I was keenly interested in a wireless headset that wouldn't have the cord tangle issues of corded headsets.This device does exactly what I wanted it to do.  It was a piece of cake to setup on my Verizon Samsung u540 phone.  You wouldn't even need to crack open the user manual except to discover the 4-digit code you have to plug-in to your phone (it's 0000, btw).  After that, it's a snap to turn on and link to my phone.My other important concern was voice clarity, both on sending and receiving.  Thus far, after several hours of use, I can tell you that the voice reception I hear is crystal clear.  No crackling, no hollowing or echoing.  On the other end, I've not had anyone complain about being unable to hear my voice or that my voice is coming across muddled -- interestingly, I've had such complaints while using my old, corded headset!The power button *is* small and it *is* a tad more difficult to depress than you might want, but then, you won't accidentally turn on or turn off this device because of the way it's designed.  I agree with others -- turn on the device before putting it on your ear, and do the same when you're turning it off.As for noise canceling, my wife and I tested out this device in very noisy home with four small kids, and I was very pleasantly surprised at how well this headset communicated my voice but not the ambient noise in the room.Using the volume control on the headset was pretty easy to do.  Note that you can control voice volume either through the phone handset volume control or the control on this Plantronics headset.  If other reviewers are complaining about low volume from this headset, it's likely because one of the two volume controls is turned down too low, or perhaps the mobile phone their using doesn't have much by way of signal output.  This Plantronics headset has *plenty* of loud volume if that's what you want.As for ear comfort, I found it to be very comfortable, although I haven't worn it all day long.  I talked to a friend for an hour yesterday, and I had absolutely no discomfort at all.  The device comes with three earpieces (small, medium and large).  I use the medium with great results.The phone fits snuggly on my ear and it doesn't move around at all, although I'm not jogging or even walking much while using it.I like the more discreet look of having the "guts" of this device behind my ear, with a thin microphone on the side of my face, rather than the fat Motorola designs.Other reviewers have cautioned about the headset breaking, so I just take very gentle care while handling it.  I suspect I won't have a problem with it falling apart.I can't speak to battery life, because after a lengthy phone call, I just recharge it so it's ready for the next call I might make.  Charging it is easy to do and doesn't take long, either.In sum, I'm very satisfied with this device.  As long as it doesn't break, it's performance and comfortable design make this an excellent choice.
Great sound, I use my phone for music at the gym so I am moving around and I have had no problems. To get it any cheaper, you have to steal it!
The phone is ok. I didn't find any difference between RAZR and the Motorolla V300 I had earlier. All the features are the same.Razr has a big huge color screen, bluetooth enabled and can capture videos. But there is no improvement on any of the calling features.So if you are getting the phone free after the rebates you can buy it, else it is not worth the $200.
This review is for the iPhone 5 battery and tool set. I realize now that the company is selling several different items under the same listing, so the reviews can be confusing and not accurate.Like many other &#34;power users&#34; (i.e. slaves) of their iPhones, I came to the end of the usefulness for my iPhone 5's internal battery. After lamenting on whether or not to buy some of the cheaper options available, I went with the &#34;you get what you pay for&#34; cliche and paid for the extra assurance that I was not getting a cheap knockoff.The battery I received had a manufacturer date only a few months from when I ordered the piece. Who knows how accurate that is, but if you're taking it at face value, I find certain comfort knowing that my battery hasn't been sitting on the shelf losing it's potential usefulness in holding a charge for my crushing of candies.After successfully opening my phone, I can confirm that all the labeling and signage match exactly to what is on the original battery in my phone. Any copycat can do this, but it gives me hope that this new battery comes from the same manufacturers as the OEM battery.The tools worked just fine for me. I was able to pry the top glass of my phone off by using the tools provided in the kit. Do some extra research around properly removing the battery. Use the clear plastic sheet under the battery to help lift it up and separate from the adhesive. That was the most challenging part of my battery replacement. After two months of use, I can make it through the whole day after heavy phone use without looking for a charger. My life is complete again!
I love the price of this charger!It works perfectly.It looks exactly like the original.I have been using it for less than a week, but I don't anticipate any problems.If I have to update on a issue, I will!Try this before buying one from the manufacturer!
This cover is very nice, it looks expensive. well built, and built to last. I recommend this cover.  Get it
I got this because I had to use a non-Bluetooth cell phone for a while and I prefer talking hands-free.PROS: Confortable.  Very good sound quality. Cheap. Fits in my ear well enough that I'm able to keep the phone volume very low and still hear just fine.CONS: Corded.I've since gotten my Bluetooth phone back, but still keep this around in case the Bluetooth has problems.
this is a good product is just a usb cable it work perfect just like a oem cable. . .
I drive a convertible and I have gone through 6 different hands-free devices that didn't work. Wind noise is awfully high with the top down, and my wife could never hear me when I talked on a hands-free. That is no longer a problem. The Shure works great! It is comfortable, clear sounding and best of all - I'm audible when I speak. If it had a "turbo" button, it would be perfect, but other than that - it is terrific. This is the best I've seen...
Works great. The blue led light is a nice touch in the car. We charge a Samsung and Iphone using this outlet. Nice low profile too.
I got sick of xbox 360 microphones breaking, so I decided to buy this to see if it would work.Unfortunately it didn't work that well. I got sound and the microphone worked but I got a lot of feedback and echo. Worst of all it was supposed to block outside sound, but it didn't do this at all.I know that it was designed for xbox so I am not going to give it 1 star. I don't have a home phone so I haven't tried it for that.
I've had mine for almost two months now and I'm happy with all aspects of this wonderful powerful phone.  Will definitely buy another S-E phone again in the future.  I still don't like T-Mobile's coverage and especially service support, but this phone is a star.  Some may find teh buttons a bit too small, but they are well-spaced so fine for my large hands.  Voice clarity is superb for me, and the quality/durability is great.
Simply awesome, the best one I ever had, sticking to this one after 1 motorola, 1 nokia and 1 samsung.
Forgot I had this on my phone until I got the request to review it. But, my phone has been working exceptionally well lately...because of these boosters!! I have a Blackberry Torch. You just put this sticky little piece of film by your battery and *viola* you have way better reception!! Seems to do the trick. Recommend!! And it's a great price to boost your phone's antenna.
Great Bluetooth headset. This is my second one - the first was stolen so I purchased one just like it.
This phone is amazingly small and light for a camera phone; it even has a flashlight/flash. Problems the phone has that I find to be a real problem: 1. The battery life is the worst of any phone I've ever owned. It MAY last 2 to 3 days in stand by IF I don't use it at all; if I use the phone at all, even just 10 minutes, no more than one day on a full charge. 2. No voice activated dialing. I like to use a speaker type hands free kit in the car so I don't have to look at the phone to answer, talk or dial. I think all phones should have it. 3. It is not very user friendly. The menus are not logical and are confusing. 4. It has an IR but it doesn't sync with your computer. You can't transfer anything. I don't get why they even have it. They have software and cable you can purchase that will let you backup the phone numbers you enter and photos you take, but (5) no syncing with Outlook, your PDA or anything else. 6. If you buy ring tones or wallpaper, you can't back those up.I do love the phone for its size, weight and even the color, I find it easy to hold and talk with. The sound isn't the best, but it isn't bad either. It rings nice and loud and putting it on vibrate is easy. I can't put the phone in a standard cell phone holder for the car because the camera button is on the side and it's a long key, the holder makes the camera come on. I had to get a small holder that only grabs in one small area on each side. I've had to purchased 3 additional batteries and every kind of charger available because the average use of a battery is 15 hours (regular phone use for me is: about 10 minutes a day, use the &quot;t-zones&quot; for a minute or two once a month, in 6 months I've taken a total of 9 photos, and transferred data twice). The battery lasted 3 days ONCE, when I was home sick and didn't use the phone and one 24 hour day I had to replace the battery three times as they completely discharged. I'm use to a battery lasting 5 to 8 days (like this phone says it will last).I also like T-Mobile. Their customer service is really good, the features they offer on their web site are great, the prices for wireless modem and wireless web are incredibility great and the national calling price plans are very good compared to what I?ve seen elsewhere. I was with AT&amp;T since they bought out L.A. Cellular. The customer service was great for years, but got so bad I?d wait on hold for hours and couldn?t get through to a person for days.
I have a BlueParrott, but I keep forgetting to turn bluetooth on, or it is paired with something else so I've been wishing for a wired headset with noise cancelling ability for a long while.  This is it.On my motorcycle you can't hear the engine, and with the windscreen it is good at low speeds (sans windshield - at 30 mph the smaller windscreen starts letting noise through.  You can't hear my stereo blaring.  I would say it is just slightly less able than the BlueParrot - but that might be because the boom doesn't quite reach the corner of my mouth.  But I only have problems if the noise is coming in at just the right angle.It has an isolating insert so it blocks out external noise (you might need an earplug for the other ear in really noisy environments).A few nits:They should have cases for the windscreens - they tend to get squished.  A stereo or dual mono version would be welcome.  The boom could be a bit longer.Only negative is they don't include an iPod/Blackberry/(some)Android 4 conductor 3.5mm adapter, but I already have several.  They have a VoIP adapter.So maybe not perfect, but this is way beyond all the other "handsfree" wired headsets I have used, and it isn't that expensive for what it does.
I have been with this RAZR for a few days, but it has been working great. Setup is really easy. It has good reception, feels sturdy, and price from Amazon was really good. I have read here some complains regarding the inability to connect to Internet. it does connect to Internet, but you have to ask your carrier for the browser settings, and set it in your phone.  Unlocked phones rules!!!
This is my 3rd bluetooth. Works very well, my others had lots of static and noise, this has minimal noise. also fits very well to my ear.Only thing I don't like, when I'm outside, for some reason the wind interfears with my reception, I can't hear the person I'm talking too, and they can't hear me. Works great indoors though. Would recommend.
I bought two of this for my gf and myself, it has high quality and easy to use. I like it!
Quality and value of this item are fine, but WHOA, it smells SO BAD!! Just like bug spray! I returned it promptly.
First of all, when I ordered this item the image showed it was WHITE not black. I ordered this specifically to match my white iPhone. Not only that the thing fell apart as I was taking it out of the box. I will be returning this garbage and getting my $5.00 back. Last time I ever purchase a Scosche product!
First, this is kind of cheap-looking, but I did try to buy the cheapest OEM car charger I could for my phone, so that's forgiveable.  The springs on the side don't have much force, though, so this is constantly slipping out of the 12V car port.  The cable is sturdy, but the rubber near the connector is kind of stiff, which makes charging AND operating your phone on the go a bit of a hassle.  It's held up well since I purchased it though.UPDATE:  Stopped charging after a month.
I bought this headset to replace my HS820.  I previously used both the Motorola HS850 and the HS820 and had the same two problems with each.- Insecure attachment to my ear.- Insuffcient volumeWhenever I moved, the motorola headsets wiggled and made me feel as if they were about to fall off. They never did but it was still annoying.The volume problem was in part related to this. The contact with my ear wasn't very firm and the ambient noise that the headsets let in coupled with a relatively low volume meant that I had to press the headset to my ear to hear clearly.I gave it 2 stars rather than one because of the GREAT battery life.I finally bought a Plantronics 510 and have been very satisfied.
Works well even in the wind.  Can't listen to music through it with my SLVR though, as expected.  I find I don't use it much though.I set up a shortcut in my SLVR for quickly enabling bluetooth when I am wearing my headset. If I have a bluetooth headset active, it refuses to play music at all - through the built-in speaker or a cable.  But this is the fault of the SLVR.Update:  I dropped it outside, where it got rained on for two days before I found it.  Thoroughly dried it out and turned it on.  Still works!
This Bluetooth 1.2 version has since been replaced by the newer generation, but the price of this model has come down by nearly $80 as a result.  I've used them for working out in front of a TV (if you equip your set with an inexpensive 3.5 mm audio out jack), listening to iPod, portable dvd player in the car, and computer.  Pros: The sound is quite clear and true, provided you aren't an overly demanding audiophile. The single charger has a Y-shaped adapter end permitting charging of both the adapter and headset simultaneously. Cons: they are considerably heavier than corded headphones and become a bit uncomfortable after an hour.
It's true! This cable outperforms the original! When I charge my phone, it's chargier. The data is more datery and the phone is more phoney in general. If I wear the cable around my neck like a bolo tie, people like me better and I can run faster and jump higher.  If I circle my dinner plate with it, the food tastes better. Basically this cable makes everything better than the original. I'm thinking about getting a 2nd one!
It came at last, good looking and the price was good and i believe it is worth the time I waited for it to come to me good job
Works as it is supposed to, lightweight, compact, and very economical.  Covers nearly every plug Ive ever needed in Asian except for India.
Looks like genuine Motorola charger, just like the original one that came with the phone. Well built and the original one is still kicking after 3-4 years. Just needed extra one.
This product looks bad with its odd structure however it performs very well and was a big hit with a colleague's trip to China. I plan to buy one for myself soon.
I have been in the wireless industry for over 10 years. Ive tried but failed several times to find a GREAT bluetooth headset. Until I came accross this unit.To simplify- It works perfectly! No outside noise, its lightweight and comfortable.Most important, is that there is no outside interference.Its the best unit I have used to date. I bought two of them. One for my wife and myself.I highly recomend this unit!!Go get it!Joel
poor manufacturing quality the connector is too long and does not properly fit in my phone. I would not buy this.
This headset works fine, but I expected somewhat better sound quality for the price. Also have not been able to get it to work with my Samsung Galaxy, I'm guess that was an issue with the 2.5 to 3.5 mm plug adapter I got since it works fine with my panasonic cordless phone. Not sure if this would allow you to initiate a call on the cell phone, however, which is what I am really looking for from a headset since bluetooth headset sound quality is so poor.
I've had this for 2 years now and am pleased with quality, durability, and reliability. It is surprisingly comfortable considering the girth of the piece that goes over and behind the ear. My past headsets with earloops were horribly painful after a very short time, this one I can wear for hours, barely noticing it. It came with 3 different earpieces - one small, one large, and one teardrop shaped - so fit was not a problem. Sound quality is good enough that people frequently comment on how clear I sound and I am nearly always using it in the car. Wind cancellation really is insufficient, but this has not been a major issue for me...I just use it with the windows up or mostly up. I frequently leave this thing on overnight and still use it for a couple of days afterwards with no loss of power. Talk time is at least the 6 hours claimed and stand-by time can be measured in days.  Some people are troubled by the proprietary power cord, but it's a small matter as I have a household-type plug in my car and charge it while driving if need be, though it cannot be charged and used simultaneously.  I came here to see if I wanted to upgrade to another Plantronics model and pass this headset on to my daughter, but I think I'm going to keep it and buy her the same model.UPDATE:Still a 5 star item and I am on my second one.  After 2.5 years the first one broke at the top of the earloop.  I taped it with sports tape and kept using it without any problems, but I figured it was only a matter of time before it didn't work anymore so I replaced it. Others have said that the new 510s are junk, but I've been using mine for about 5 months now and it's exactly as great as the original.  The broken one is still working, too.
Like others have said here, the screwdriver set is solid and good quality and will last forever.  The issue of course here is that the screwdrivers are not a true jewelers set and will be too big for most jewelry/watch related tasks.  So if you are looking for that type of set, this isnt the one to use.
I use this cord to charge my phone in my pc at work and it works great. Doesn't charge super fast but charges it none the less.
The gel inserts on the Jabra is quite uncomfortable, at least for me.  It's a bit hard to make the earbud stay in my ear, and forget about jogging wearing this.  Also the insert comes off very easily, and if a friend wants to borrow it and has different size of ears, you need to find the other sizes of the insert.  Sound quality is mediocre, as callees often complain about wind noise from my end.  I'm not happy with these.
I use these mostly for electronics repair and they get they job done. Great for phone repair or and small electronics.
Definitely a good buy, especially as the price keeps dropping!  Excellent sound.  I have it paired with a Razr, and it was fairly straightforward, after I carefully re-read and understood the instructions :-)I wish they had made it easier to fold and put in a pocket (and also that it shut off easily like some of the Moto models). Also note that if you use the little foam tip for the mouthpiece, it can fall off way too easily.
I had to replace the battery on my phone cause it had gone completely flat. Apple was charging a lot and this battery did the job perfectly for a lot cheaper and came with the tools.
It works fine. I like it if I have any problems I will update you.
A nice change for me - having a headset that doesn't slip and slide, fall out of my ear, or buzz. My favorite feature is the button that controls the sound level the recipient of my call experiences. The only time is doesn't work well is when the listener is also wearing a headset, and even then, I suspect that it is the fault of the listener's headset and not mine.
It's been two weeks with my Treo 650 and now I remember why I love the Palm OS so much. I switched to BlackBerry two years ago (7290) and I've enjoyed using it except for the very, very basic screen. I assume that's how they get such remarkable battery life. But, I've had to switch from the BB for work reasons and I'm very happily using Palm again. My last Palm was a Palm Vx and it's still alive and kicking after many, many years.The Treo 650's screen is really amazing. And, I've read the older reviews about the Treo 650 and the frequent resetting issue. I was certainly concerned and ready to send it back if I had problems (Cingular gives you 30 days to try it out). So far only one reset in two weeks with the Palm - honestly, I had to reset the BlackBerry constantly so I'm not sure I'd notice the difference. And, the BB resets are particularly annoying because they would happen at the start of answering incoming calls and then literally take 5-8 minutes to reset and let me use it again. I'm not sure why it took so long - I did have a big address book. The Palm reset only took 30 seconds.But, here's where Treo shines: screen graphics, photos, mp3s and videos. I can put 2-4 movies on a 2GB SD card, pop into the Palm and carry around some convenient entertainment. One little feature that really impressed me was the ability to display the screen vertically (it's longer that way). With letterbox movies it really increases the size of the video and exceeds the size of videos on my Zen Vision 30GB screen. And, the videos really look incredible.And, of course, there's a ton of free software out there for the Palm. So far, I've only downloaded TCPMP for the movies. The included RealPlayer is very impressive - you're ready to listen to mp3s right out of the box.Final note: I've used the Palm Desktop for PIM stuff (contacts, calendar, to do's) off and on for years and I'm still impressed with it's features and easy/quick navigation. They've always been ahead of the pack - I know many of the newer phones come with similar PIM software so your PC can talk to your new phone but aside from BlackBerry no one else is even in the ballpark.You can manage photos in there as well and even add photos to your address book so once you've synced up your incoming calls display a picture of the caller. I know this has been around for a while but it wasn't available on my old Palm V or the new BlackBerry I've been using for the past few years.
It is so funny watching text fly into my T-Mobile SDA smartphone (aka iMate SP5m or HTC Tornado) using the Stowaway keyboard. This keyboard is all class: just like a laptop keyboard, with the same spring to the keys, quality, durability and lovely looks to boot.Entering numbers is get-used-to'able, however symbols such as () and & or % can be a major pain, due to the fact that a) you have to use "custom" key commands using ctrl, fn1 and fn2 buttons and b) if you are an experienced typer, you "already know" the "motion" for & or * or (), and you'll find yourself doing them! (meaning you are incorrect, on this keyboard)That said, entry is obviously very fast and natural as this is a proper keyboard, just with some multi-purposed keys requiring key combos.The only solution is to FORCE yourself through it and just do it. You will get used to it, just like you got used to fast touch-typing.Anyhow, this thing is a gem for hammering out quick SMS text messages, etc. I mean no more "click-click-click, clack-clack, click-click-click-click, clack-clack" to type out a single four-letter word. Nothing feels quite like that lol!This thing will fit EASILY in a purse and will fit in a men's pant pocket. I wear shorts, pants, etc. and it fits fine.The keyboard clicks are quite silent. I use this in class to quicly type out extensive class notes, as I can type far faster (and more legibly) than I can hand-write.The case is durable sandblasted aluminum (like my old minidisc player) and the detachable device stand is sweet! I use it all the time to put my phone on one of those little chair-mounted desks in class, and type in my lap. Sweet!Anyhow, is this thing essential? I mean, I kinda hate not having a notebook around when in, say, a statistics class with graphs and stuff...you can't draw graphs with this thing very well. However, for text-based notes in a college setting, this thing is well worth it. A smartphone as above and a keyboard, and you have one of THE major functions of a laptop, but without having to carry a laptop. Just the phone you'd have anyways, and this flat little thing.NOTE: if you have troubles reconnecting this thing, use the bluetooth connect on your phone first, then use the special driver provided by Think Outside to finish the connection. Two part process.In all, I am a college student and I wish I did not have to pay over $80 for this unit (why can't they make it for $30?), but in the end this thing is slightly sweeter than it's price, so it's worth it.
Long battery life, connects quickly to phone. Phone callers can't even tell I am on a BT headset, no complaints of inablility to hear my voice will on a call. It is not for people with wide necks, does not stretch much. Can slide back when active and the earphones are not in your ears. Otherwise light, controls are easy to reach and distiguish. I have the similar LG HBS730 but prefer these due to the ease of finding the buttons you want but prefer the flexible neck of the LGs.
This is a great cable for me !!I love using it in my car.I connect it to my smartphone to listen to my radio app while I am traveling out of town.Once I lose  range of my favorite  radio station I plug it in and  continue listening  to my favorite radio station thru the app. .Great deal !
I love that this headset stays firmly on the head with the band and firmly on the ear with just the ear piece.  The sound quality is great, and the ability to mute the mic is the main reason I bought this.  The mute switch is in a convenient place and has a nice clip to attach to your shirt.  The only reason I give this 4 stars instead of 5 is because I have had a lot of people tell me I sound somewhat distorted when talking on it.  Usually I can make it better by adjusting the mic volume (another nice feature) or by moving the mic away from my mouth.  Overall good purchase for the money.
Contrary to what this site and T-Mobile lead me to believe, T-Mobile could not provide coverage at my home address.  This did not stop Amazon.com from selling me the phone, nor T-Mobile from transferring my existing (working) AT&amp;T number to their service (of course, this took two weeks and &gt; 10 phone calls).After receiving no reception, I called T-Mobile and was informed that they do not actually cover my area.I called AT&amp;T back, and they happily attempted to restore my account, only to find that T-Mobile refused to release the numbers.After a month of essentially no coverage from anyone, my phones are happily back on AT&amp;T where they belong.The bad news is that T-Mobile has sent me a bill for more than double the quoted monthly rate and Amazon.com has not refunded my purchase price.Even in areas where I could get coverage, the phone itself did not work well.  After pressing more than a few keys, the screen would lock up and I needed to remove the battery to reset it.Last warning:  Watch out for the charges for inbound messages--if you really dislike a T-Mobile subscriber, send them lots of text messages (free from their site)--the subscriber has to pay $0.05/message.
the tools are ok Just not quite what I  expected.  They were, however, better than the ones that came with the screen I ordered.
I bought this to work with a Palm T3, years ago. They never produced good Palm drivers so it was pretty much worthless. It's been sitting in a drawer for five years and some of the keys stick, but they can be prised up with the corner of a credit card. The keyboard syncs cleanly with an iPad 2 and, if you can tolerate the way it rocks back and forth as you type, it works fine.
And it was pretty much worth it (if you sign the plan and get the phone for $250). Otherwise it is a little pricey. The gain was enough to make me feel good about buying it though, and my plan was up anyway so no remorse there. It's difficult to tell from this picture if your i95 is any bigger - but it is less bulky. The features are the same but a little better. And of course GPS is nize.
I was very dissapointed with its audio performance. I don't want to write a lot because others have definitely written the positive features in good detail(good microphone, quick connect, good battery life, light-weight etc.), but the usability is very restricted.Here is the bottom line, if you want to take this unit outside of your office/home/any quiet environment, you will NOT be able to hear the other person even if the environment is moderately noisy (this is at unit's highest volume). I was using this in the car, and I can hear faint at best when the road is good, but when you pass through slightly patchy freeway, the other person's voice is completely drowned. The speaker's maximum volume is just completely unacceptable. By the way, this experience was inside a luxury car, not a cardboard car. I am not sure the reason behind this design, could be to improve battery life?I had high expectations. I am returning this unit to Amazon and will look at the Jabra BT500 (read good reviews about it: in-ear position & USB charging).By the way, I used this with my Blackberry 7100g, good syncing and quick connection.
This Bluetooth sucks. Plain and simple... I mean I paid, what, $15 for the thing so wasn't expecting the best but at least working quality. I always buy the Motorola H730 or H750 which are upwards of $60 but I always lose them. Always! It is a curse so I figured I would get a rinky-dink cheap one so I wouldn't cry in the corner losing out on a day&#8217;s worth of work pissed and distraught over losing my (what is this my 6th) Bluetooth. But with every call - EVERY ONE - it was unbearable static on my end so much so that everyone mentioned it. Hell, even the recorded lady on the voicemail was like this thing sucks! So yeah just spend the extra cash and go up a few grades because this was a lost cause.
I got this as a Christmas present for my brother and he absoultely loves it. When talking to him it sounds very clear and there is no static. It is a much better than my Jabra headset which cost nearly twice the price.
My car doesn't have an iPod connector so I bought this product. I have been using this for over a year now and I am very happy with it. This works amazingly well.
I wanted to keep my car free and clear of cables so I purchased a retractable cable to at least keep it more organized. The retractable part works fine but the cable is pretty thin. I hooked it up to my stereo and I could here a lot of static. I then tried a not retractable cable that was pretty thick and the static was gone and the sound was a lot better. You have to sacrifice sound for clutter free cables or go with sound and have wires all over. I stopped using this since I couldn't stand the static. I am not sure if its the cable I got or not but I will stick to the non retractable cable. I'll just have to find a short one since the 3 foot one I have is too long.
Let me say up front that I ordered this from Amazon after reading all the glowing reviews, and I've been fairly disappointed by the performance I've experienced.  My experience was specific to using the Scala with Sprint's LG-PM325.First, the audio quality was not good.  If my phone was lying on a piece of furniture within two feet of the headset, I could usually get passable quality and occassionally get clear reception.  Any other scenario resulted in garbled audio.  When using the headset with my phone, while the phone was in my front pocket, the audible was unacceptable and barely discernable.  And it's not by hearing.Second, there's the shiny blue light.  When I read other's comments about the flashing blue LED, I really didn't think much of it.  But in the dark, this thing is a strobe light.  At night, with my headset left on some countertop downstairs, and while I was upstairs, I could see the flash of blue reflected off my second story ceiling.  That's part A.  Part B, the flash results in a very slight audible clicking, not unlike when a camera flash goes off.  Which means if you use this thing at night while lying in silence, be prepared for a constant audible and visible reminder that you're wearing the Scala.Battery life was good.  Pairing was excellent.  The piece stayed on my head pretty well and comfortably, and making or answering calls was straightforward.I've returned mine because of the two problems.
My brother just got the HTC One, and I promised him an awesome case like the one I have for my S4.Super sleek look, fits well, doesn't get overheated and saves the day every now and then! Especially when GPS is needed!
not much to say about a wall charger except it charges my bluetooth perfectly.  I'm glad I bought it.  Thank you!
First off, the charger works just as it should and all the ports stay connected just fine.People in other reviews were complaining that the cord was too short-- about 2 or 3 feet-- and that was what I was expecting. Instead, I got a 5 foot cord which is a bit long for the purpose I was going to use it for (in my car). Now I have a long cord dangling everywhere. That extra length may be a bonus for most, but I bumped down the rating due to seller's lack of description and/or consistency. Also I'm fairly certain the product image was changed because when I ordered it, a different style adapter was pictured... I was expecting a square shape with the USB port on the side; I got the longer rectangle shape with the USB port on the end... hmm. There's no way to verify that now.In sum: Good charger with good connectivity, looks and acts like it's an original Samsung.  Cord length and adapter style may vary as it seems like the seller is not consistent.
I did take off a star in the rating because products like these are marketed in a slightly exaggerated way.There's nothing &#34;sticky&#34; about the product.  The pad is made of a specific material that is able to hold the objects in place while you're driving.  It's not perfect, but for the simple task of holding a cellphone, sunglasses, loose change, perhaps your EZ-Pass, it will do the trick.I place a camcorder there to film road trips, and for the most part, it stays put.  Like any other product of this type, if you off-road, drive over unpaved roads, or you intentionally drive abnormally, the contents of the pad may not stay put.Summary:  Just drive normally, and you won't have a problem.
Works fine. But I'm still not happy. This is my third/fourth Plantronics headset.This one  bought for dual pairing with my LT and my cell phone.(iPhone).It works fine with both.I am subtracting marks for the followinga) Changing charger designs. Third headset, none of the chargers are interchangeable, so I always get the AC charger, but have to buy the car chargerb) For iPhone, this works only for the phone. Music will not work. Now I am looking instead at the Plantronics 855 Stereo Headset - do handle both = phone/music and still do dual pairing with LT
Works.  Good quality battery.  What more can I say about a battery?  It fits.  It charges.  It powers.  It's a battery at a very reasonable price.
IT works fine but it doesn't fits tu well to the ear.
Tried to find a new one for my girls dad's house, they just started using my old razor phone. Works good.
The battery worked very well! I used the screwdriver and the plastic pieces of the kit in replacement, and the tips of the spudger get bent without hard use - such as prying the old battery out. Still, a great value in a DIY kit to give new life to your tired iPhone 4S!
Compared to Motorola Bluetooth headsets, this Cardo really rocks. It has much better mic and speaker sound quality and volume than Motorola. The Motorola makes me sound like I'm talking on a speakerphone while the Cardo is a bit better in this regard.That said, because the mic is so far away from your mouth, you will still sound very distant and a bit muffled. With this Cardo, callers still complain when I'm in the car or outside on a windy day that there is a lot of background wind noise.I ended up going back to the wired headset that came with my Motorola RAZR phone, which has much better audio quality and is not as cumbersome to setup during a call as a Bluetooth headset.
Even though this ear piece is designed for a razor phone, the ear bud is too big, uncomfortable and it keeps falling off the ear. After two weeks of use, the on/off switch stopped working, and this feature was the main reason why I bought this unit. In sum, it was a waste of money. There was no provision in this review for "0" stars, so I gave it "1"
Got this to replace a frayed OEM cord. The cord itself is ok ;however, the plug that looks like OEM and is stamped as such, is crap! Took 8 times longer to charge with this unit! When the cord was paired with the actual OEM plug in, it worked fine. So if you need a cord its ok; however, it is definitely not OEM and the plug is worthless. For the price and really just needing a cord it is a good value but I am very disappointed with the false markings as OEM when it is certainly not.
this is a great product, but i order the wrong size and i intend to pass it forward to anyone in need of it.  the purchase price was great.make sure you know the size of that adapter, before making your selection.
It seems that this keyboard acts a little like those gold fish you bring home in a plastic bag from the pet shop.  You have to put the whole bag in the tank until it acclimates to it's new surroundings.  I went from wanting to love the thing for the sheer coolness factor....to boxing it up to send back when it wouldn't sync to my Axim x50v....to giving it another chance and after it was good and ready to work flawlessly, I now love it again.  The keyboard is smaller than standard but very useable.  It's great for writing a longer e-mail, inputting contacts, or writing a letter in word, when you don't want to peck at the screen with your stylus endlessly.  The construction feels solid and opening and closing is a snap.  Pun intended. The only major flaw is with the cradle that holds your PDA.  It is removable which is the desired use to space the PDA a little further away from you.  But the feet that clip it to the keyboard just don't want to let go.  The plastic it's made out of doesn't seem especially robust and I feel certain it will snap off eventually.  Also the curved lower part of the cradle that holds your Axim, et al, is a little under developed and if bumped will readily jettison what it's holding.  Other than that it works very well and never ceases to make me grin when everyone passing your table at Starbucks has to stop and ask you about it. I previously gave it one star, but now that it's acclimated and working I give it 4 only because of the cradle shortcoming or else it would have been a full 5.  I know it shows one star, but Amazon wholdn't allow me to edit the scale.
I bought this cable to connect my MP3 to the car radio. I like the rotating design that I can adjust the wire in long or short distance, once I pull the cable, it will rotate back automatically.
I bought this battery to replace the one in my dash cam. i charged it up like the instructions said to do, and wow. i can use my dash cam a long time before plugging it in to the power point in my truck.the price of this battery is really good for the service that you will receive from it.if you need a new battery get one of these.
I've had this charger well over a year now, and it still works perfectly.  Most chargers would have broken by now.  The folding blades make this more portable than the chargers that come with some Blackberry models that have adapters for different countries.
This audio cable is great for in the car... The retractable cable is a space saver and looks cleaner while stored. Audio quality is normal, the end jacks and bigger that what they show in the picture, i wish they would change that. Over all, Great product, definitely recommend!
A very good high quality USB hub. Windows recognizes everything you plug into this hub and, the USB ports are nice and tight.I will say in my opinion, for a USB 2.0 hub, the Cyberpower-CP-H720 is at the top of the quality hub chart. You can plug a DVD player or web cam into this thing and it will work perfectly. My only complaint is a lack of a method of securing it to a table top but I suppose double sticky tape will do just fine. The rubber base piece is removable so it can lay flat as well.
The nice thing about this battery in my case, is that it came fully charged and ready to use.  It fit perfectly in the phone as I would have expected.  It's an excellent buy compared to other sources.
First a quick confession: I do not like T-Mobile.  I had them before and hated their (lack of) coverage and bad service.That said, the v300 is a very good phone.  I won't rehash the long feature list here.  What I really like (after playing with a friend's) is the loud ringtones, the good reception (despite the lack of GSM coverage in Brooklyn), and the great styling.  This phone is not made by Motorola per se but by their Asian partner, maybe that explains the &quot;girlish&quot; styling, but it's still pretty cool.  Of course, the light weight and good battery life make it a stand-out.My favorite phone is still the Sanyo VM-4500 video camera walkie-talkie speakerphone cell phone for Sprint PCS...
bought one like it at radio shack and believe me this cheaper product is ten times better than their [$...] dollar piece of crap. will buy more from this vender whenever i need a charger
Tried many, but this one is only one I can use while driving noisy truck.
this is really cute phone case, i like it alot, and it came in when it stated it would too
I ordered this for my husband and one for myself in white. we are both satisfied with product. He uses it regularly.
i bought this one because of the excellent review, however, after pairing it to my Treo 650 and using it for a couple of days, i'm quite disappointed.  The sound quality is ok, sound level is on the low side and some noises from time to time.  i had a Samsung WEP200 too and had better quality than this one, and Samsung WEP200 is about half of the price of this.  then there is the usability issue too, sometimes i hear the phone ringing, and pushed the button to accept the call and it wouldn't connect right away, had to wait several seconds to establish the link, the Samsung WEP200 and another Motorola ear piece i had did not have this problem.
I received this product before I expected. It looks pretty good and It works with my Iphone (3GS) and my phone (HTC Evo V 3D). It is a good deal because It is not easy to find something like this for this price
I use this on my MacBook so I can connect several items at the same time including a USB keyboard and optical mouse, my iPad and iPhone, a webcam, an external hard drive and even a light o Rama controller for my Christmas lights. This thing works great and provides plenty of power for all devices. I haven't seen any slowness in my webcam, iPad/iPhone syncing or even copying large movies to my external hard drive. This guy works great and I am not at all disappointed in performance. I am however a bit disappointed in the design. This has to sit on the corner of my desk and i need plenty of room on both sides to allow the USB cables to plug in. I would have had them design it like a tower with the plugs all on the back one on top of another. That being said, the current design does offer some added stability to keep the hub from falling over. Overall a great performer and a decent design.
I love these, have bought other brands and they break in a few months. These last and are a good product.
Lasted 3 months, lucky I have two(charge one, while using the other), the units last only for about 2-3 hours of use, hardly good for all day jobs.Like the fit though, but These items need to last the day.
The device was not as the description. It looked as if someone dropped it off their vehicle and it hit the road and skidded all the way down. I was VERY disappointed when opening it b/c it was the first thing I seen other than the front damage.I did email the seller and told them and they were very nice and refunded me as I returned the product back to them.
I was really impressed by the price and was very excited when it arrived. But it doesn't work like it says it does. At first it charged my phone just fine but then it stopped charging; I waited a day to charge again but it still didn't charge.
there is a different between the size/design of Galaxy II that is carried by USA and what's carried by Asia.  I'm in USA, I ordered the cover for Galaxy II that i bought from USA, the cover didn't fit, and the speaker location is different from the phone.  I copmared the cover to another Galaxy II that is sold in Asia and i found that the design is different.So if you bought Galaxy II from USA, don't buy cover from outside USA
I'm a lover of all gadgets and always have to get the "coolest" cell phone out there at the time.  This phone has been really great over the past 14+ months that I've owned it (I have the blue version).  I've not had ONE problem with it doing anything it shouldn't do (i.e. randomly powering off, antenna problems, etc).  I cannot say that for every cell phone I've ever owned.  LG makes a great cell phone and within their different models, I think this one is the best I've seen so far.  My brother has this exact model and loves it, too.The phone has a beautiful color screen, easy to navigate menus, a nice camera and video function, and OUTSTANDING battery life.  The only complaint I will echo is that it would be nice at times to have a speakerphone.  Other than that, this cell phone is the best I've found - including several other LG models that friends and family own.
Works great - looks just like the picture shown, does everything it said it would do and is suppose to do in the description.  Arrived within a week with Free Super Saving Shipping.  I use it for my car, I connect my mp3 player to my AUX port in the car stereo system.  Pulling both ends will release the cable, pulling one end will retract the cables.
Very comfortable to wear, good reception, price of ~$22 plus shipping was unreal.  I prefer this style over the Star Trek earpieces, but this one's boom mic extends further out from the ear than other models in this series.
I must have called Verizon ten times in four months, nagging them to offer the Treo 650 on their network. I almost deserted them to get the phone, but in mid-June, I finally got my Verizon branded Treo 650. It has not been a great experience.First the positives. It is very cool to have all my contacts, all my appointments and todo items on my phone. While the phone is large by today's cell phone standards, it is a great looking unit and functions well. It is easy to set up email and web access and it is great to be able to stay in touch with the normal too-much-email office when I am traveling.However, it is not all great news. First, I have had a heck of a time keeping the unit synchronized with my office Outlook. I get duplicates by the tons and, worse, deleted contacts. The dupes are somewhat tolerable to deal with, but losing contacts, which slip into my deleted Outlook folder is not acceptable. No one has been able to tell my why this is happening.Second, the reception and volume of the phone are horrible. Where my old Motorola TC30 could get calls in awful reception areas, the Treo is spotty inside my own house. I lose calls in transit and while sitting still. Worse, the volume is very faint. I purchased a software tweak called VolumeCare which slightly amplifies the wimpy sound from the phone, but distorts it as well. About the only acceptable solution is to use a headset and plant that sound right in your ear! Not a convenient or very affordable solution.All-in-all, I'm disappointed in the Treo. It has some nice features, but it is very disappointing as a phone.
These make using the home button easy. My daughter and I both like them.  I would purchase them again. Well worth the price.
i bought these tool to us for repairing my nephews iphone 4 but non of them were the right size, so if you buying them for the iPhone don't buy these
I read the reviews here and ended up buying this bluetooth device. After pairing it up with my phone, I ended up using while my phone was clipped to my belt. I got static, even if I move my phone I get static. I need to have the phone in front of me before I can use this bluetooth and not get static. Other than the static it's a nice bluetooth.
Great case, sturdy, doubles battery, wont have to worry any more. I purchased this for my kid and he is very HAPPY.
Got this headset to replace my Jabra (which was incompatable with my Nokia 3650). Fit and comfort is extremely subjective but I found the Jabra to be far more comfortable (I would actually forget I was wearing it); that said, this unit is not uncomfortable (until after a couple hours) just not nearly AS comfortable or securely fitting.Very few complaints as far as performance. It was easy to pair with my phone, my wife's Motorola V3 and even my laptop. Sound quality is clear for both parties (recipients occasionally complained of a pinging noise with the Jabra) and the noise reduction actually works to eliminate wind noise. Battery life is excellent. The single function can be a little aggrevating (especially when trying to turn it off as you have to hold it down for a long time). The only weird and very rare quirk is occassionally calls will be interrupted with a strange sound that sounds like someone dropping a manhole cover as it spins on pavement - very strange, very annoying and fortunately very rare.Overall, performance is top notch, comfort is acceptable and value is difficult to beat.
I have to say that this is a great phone and the Nextel service is great also.As for the review from the moron from Denver You need to have used it and the service before you open your mouth and make a fool of your self.People that review something and not have a clue just goes to show that stupid people should not breed.I have had the I90c,I95cl and the i730 and the 730 is great as for a alarm buy a clock if you need a alarm.The screen is a little smaller but the brilliant color makes up for it,the sound is as good as the other phones I have had.As for service I have had every carrier that is in the state of Colorado and Nextel is the best and for any one who is thinking of Verizon for push to talk well it sould be push to wait.If you want the best this phone and service is the best.
Guys,I have used several of my friends bluetooth headsets (motorolas and jabras) and had decided I didn't want one.  Then I found the Mobile Freedom and read the reviews.  I know Logitech and have used a lot of their stuff with good results so I tried it.  IT DOES EVERYTHING YOU HAVE READ!!  It's quiet in the wind, it's battery lasts for days for me, it's easy to use, easy to pair and the sound quality is awesome!!  Nobody could ever tell I was using a headset.  It takes a bit to get used to the ear clip, but once you do there are no problems.  It may be a bit heavier and larger than some, but then those little tiny ones that look so chic also have TERRIBLE reviews and TERRIBLE performance!!  Try it out, you won't regret it.
I liked the case, and for the amount of money paid, its a good buy, i personally like stronger cases, this is very flexible and indeed looks like a hard case, a little bit of more firmness wouldnt hurt.Protects VERY well the phone as well as the camera lens there is not one single part of the phone touching the surface of the table when i leave it there. Very Good purchase.
I use this hub with my Mac and it is great. I just plugged into my USB port on my MacBook Pro and have never had a problem with it. You can optionally power the device with the included AC Adapter, which lights up a bunch of green lights and one brilliant blue light at the top of the green lights. This blue light is extremely bright for its size and may need to be covered if you are sleeping in the same room with it. I have plenty of open slots for additional devices. If you are using this device vertically in the stand there is a front USB slot for you to attach your flash drive without any effort. Everything (at least with a Mac) is recognized and ready to go once it is plugged in. I would highly recommend this hub - you can't find anything as nice for the price that is powered.
UPDATE:The person actually using these adapters (an 80 year old grandma) just reported from Bassano Italy that they worked just find and she charged her phone with no issues. So if a octogenarian can deal with something, that speaks volumes to the product!In her case, she was using an iPhone overseas, so any issues of power converters were moot. All she had to do was plug the US style plug into the adapter. Even so, it did work for her and she did it on her own. So that is a plus!**********************************These little adaptors look like they are well made and the price was right.i will add more when I get back!
I have a Jabra headset for my work PDA/phone, and it works very well. But, with the new CA law regarding phone use in the car, I needed one which could switch between two phones. This does just that and it does it remarkably well.Although you cannot switch while in a conversation very easily (you have to hold the call button until it beeps twice to release the call to the phone mic/speaker and then could pick up the call, but have no easy way to switch back), it handles the obvious uses well. If one phone starts ringing, the headset correctly selects it so you can pick up the call - perfect.The headset is comfortable for very long calls, with a good balance on the ear.The microphone stalk is not as movable as the product brief suggests, and it does not fold up per se (sticks out no matter where positioned). Folding up the mic does not power off, which is a shame, although the battery life seems really good.Sound quality is good on the speaker and appears to be good on the other end, although I have not heard the other side to know for sure.Only downside vs. the Jabra is that it does not have a USB charger (small cord to plug into laptop when traveling), so you have to drag along the transformer.
I read the first few reviews and didn't read any further and now I wish I had cause this thing does not work for the Sprint Galaxy s2. Wish I had known that.
I bought this becasue I was very happy to see a phone with a metal case again.  I used to just use nokia phones back in the day and they would break at least once a month on me.  Bought the Moto v60 and was really blown away.  The best phone I ever had.  Then I upgraded to color phones and tried the other Motos.  Really big disapointment.  Moto phones are made so cheap and fall apart just like nokia.  When this came out I jumped on it.  Finally Moto was going back to the quality phones.PROS:-Some what sturdy case.  The metal parts seem solid. No marks as of yet (1 month).-The battery life is a little tiny bit higher then your average phone.  I have to charge it at night but it has at least half the life left on it.  I talk for about 3 hours a day.-Camera is ok not the best and by far not the worst.-Slim form factor.  And yes its wider then your normal flip but this is a good size.  Other phones always seemed to skinny for me.CONS:-Not all of it is metal.  The bottom is plastic and it seems to be cheap plastic.  It creaks when you push on it.  I think that is where the antenna is, and if it has a SAR rating of .80 (I think) at the ear then I wonder how much your jaw is getting.  Rather my jaw get cancer then my brain right?-The vol is almost a joke it is so low.  At the highest its about what a normal phone is at its middle setting.  I used to have to turn people down on my cell, now I am struggling to hear them sometimes.-The keypad looks nice but its a pain in the butt.  The donut thing in the middle is already scracthed by my finger nail.  The rest of the keypad is protected it seems and has no marks.-A pain to clean.  The keypad is shiny and gets crap all over it.  When you clean it the rubber lining between the keys grabs part of what ever cloth you are using and gets it looking even worse.-Phone book.  Good god man.  The fact that they used this phone book really shows that either they don't put a lot of effort into the phone or was a total mess up.  Either way it is a true shame.-Good luck with support and warranty from Moto.  Past experiences with them was very poor.  You send your phone to get fixed and a month later you get it back and they didn't even read what the problem was before they "fix" it and send it back still broken.The reason they make phones out of cheap plastic in my opinion is because what do you do 6 months after your phone looks like you dropped it down the stairs a few dozen times.  You buy another.  Strong durable plastic is used all the time.  For crying out loud Glad uses it all the time.  I am more then happy to pay 600 dollars on quality and if you have the money do the same.  This phone is not even close to meeting my expectations of what I thought I would get for a 600 dollar "basic" cell phone.  I have high standards and for top dollar I want the best.  Moto might be seeing this and is offering good rebates now. 250 or something on Amazon as of now.  Well worth it for that price.To the other reviewer about Verizon.  They use CDMA and this phone is only for GSM.  I doubt they will ever make a CDMA version.  But of course I have no real clue.  Call Motorola.Also sorry for my spelling mistakes and all.  It would take to much time to go back and review what I wrote.  I am not getting paid for this and won't waste my time.  Good luck and I think you will be very happy with this phone over all.
I've had this phone for a while now and here's what I think.The User Interface has had a bad rap from some people, and yes, it's not as intuitive as say, Nokia's interface, but it does have some pros.  You can customize every button, including all 4 arrows, and the left and right soft keys.  I have my left soft key programmed to go to "Shortcuts" and I have every function I need right there.  And of course, after a while of use, you will get used to the interface.The volume of the phone is decent.  I have no problems hearing other people, and they have no problems hearing me.  Speakerphone works great too.  My boyfriend says that he no longers feels like he's talking to someone in a tunnel when I use speakerphone for our calls.  The only volume problem I can see is that at the highest volume (7), it is still slightly hard to hear your phone ring.  One other thing - this phone has way cool ringtones.The address book issue is this:  If you use your SIM card to store your addresses, then no, you will not be able to have multiple entries for one person.  But if you use your phone's memory to store your numbers, you can have many many numbers stored to each entry.  I have all of my numbers stored on my Powerbook's address book, so I'm not too worried about having them on my SIM card.  And if you have a MAC, iSync works wonders with syncing numbers/calendars to the RAZR....now THAT'S cool!The screen is very large and clear.  I have no problems seeing it in dark or even bright light.  I have had no problems with reception with Cingular so far.  In fact, I have a stronger signal in most places than my previous phone (Nokia 6230)Overall, I am very pleased with the design, functions, and asthetics of this phone.
I have used this cable on and off for about a year and a half -- but there were at least six months in the middle there where I had misplaced it and didn't use it at all. It recently went bad -- lost one of the stereo channels. It now connects one channel only.The problem is in the contacts. If I bend the cable near one of the ends I can get the other channel to come in intermittently. Note that I didn't ever fiddle with the ends during normal use. I have only tried the bending game to get the lost channel to come in.If you think the price is worth about 1 year of use, this is the cable you want to get. It certainly is convenient and I like the retractable feature a lot. Just wish it would have lasted longer.
no special installs necessary.  with this cable, my sony ericsson w3001 just showed up on my windows xp system as another drive. works great.  too cool.
The only complaint I have is that this ear piece doesn't adjust to the inside of your ear.  The rubber piece is the only thing that you can adjust to position it to direct it to the inside of your ear.  But for the money.....you can't complain.
The ony draw back to this product is that it is corded. IF they could make the same product wireless it would be Exceptional. I love it, has great sound, cofortable in my ear and it plays the different ringtones i have for callers so i can know whos callings.
I'll never understand how one review can say this item works exactly as it should and how the next complains about it not working...for the EXACT same phone! I just don't get it. I decided to try it out despite the people that said it didn't work, and I'm glad I did. It's exactly what I expected and wanted. I actually bought 2 of these so I could leave one in my car and one at work. For only $4 and some change for the both...this was a GREAT buy for me and now I never have to worry about my Incredible running out of battery!
I like them but they are not super duty materials. Works great for the application but when I was dismantling a hard drive one of them stripped.  Im not too concerned because of the price. Over all good value!
1. The USB ports on the sides are spaced far enough apart that I can use all the slots. And the one in front is great for the thumb drive.2. The lights are cool3. It works great4. It stands up most of the time! when I came into the office this morning it was on it's side but no biggie. I righted it and it was fine all day.The weighted base does make a difference and I think they made it as heavy as they could without taking away the portability feature.5. Did I mention it works great. My laptop had no problem going to sleep. It was instantly recognized. All the devices I've put on it have been recognized6. I don't know what one reviewer meant by it making noise. Mine is absolutely silent.7. I agree you need a scissors or knife to open the clamshell packaging no biggie.I liked it so much I bought a second one!!
Received it, plugged it in, didn't work. Tried jostling the cable and plug around, couldn't get it to work. Can't recommend it.
Good charger and is perfect because it is also has a USB connection. Also love that it is original material it works like that too giving a quick charge when i need it.
I bought this to connect walkman type gadgets to my car stereo.  It worked well at first, but the wiring quickly started having problems.  The sound would cut out and I'd need to mess with the cable to find a position where the wires inside would be touching correctly again.  After 8 months, the wire is now completely detached from one of the plug ends.  Maybe the heat of my car played a role in the breakdown of the cable, but if that's how you're planning on use it, don't be surprised if it starts shorting out on you too.
This is a good buy if it is what you are wanting.  I misread the product info and did not realize this is all Torx screwdrivers.
This is a very good bluetooth headset, however I recently purchased a newer Plantronics as the sound quality and smartphone compatibility has changed since I bought this one. I still use this with one of my cellphones and it has lasted over 3 years now.
First, why so big?I like that the microphone turns the unit off/on but that is it.The ear piece has thin rubber around edge of speaker that eventually pealed off. Doesn't really impact comfort or help with cupping sound into ear so I'm not sure why that is there.The WORST part of this headset and the other 3 Motorola headsets I've had is that they take forever to activate during a call.  When my phone rings and I'm using my Samsung headset my call is picked up almost instantly, when using any of my Motorola headsets there is literally a 2-3 second pause after answering the phone until the headset is picked up.Often by the time my headset picks up people on the other end are already saying, "Hello?  are you there?"I won't buy another Motorola headset, that's for sure.I gave it a 3 because I like the flip on/off & how it fits in my pocket because of that and that it does work.  It just doesn't compete with my Samsung or Plantronics headsets.
This pad is extremely unreliable in that it does not stick to my dash and is very poorly made. One thing I will say is my wallet and phone have not fallen from the pad. Unfortunately, the pad moves all around.
Only works one side at a time. When you connect two cables, one side stop working and also overheated burning the fuses. I purchased two of them and it's the same problem. Cheap and bad quality.
You get what you pay for. They strip easily. VERY cheaply made. But I only needed them for a one time use and I didn't have to spend a bunch of money so I can't really complain. But if you will need them more than once...spend the money on good tools.
I've used this Bluetooth for close to three years. It worked very well for a long time, but recently the sound quality is beginning to wane, making it hard to hear. It fades in and out from moderately good sound to really poor sound.
A little bulky on the ear for a petite woman, but overall very good quality and battery life.  I can hear others very clear and have had no complaints that I am hard to hear.
I watched a short video on you tube then ordered this kit.  I changed the battery in just a few minutes.  Amazingly simple.  All the tools you need are here (the star screw driver is the only thing thats not really standard, but here its all in one place).  Just do it.
This is the perfect case for my phone. Even  having a big phone the case makes it feel small and easy to handle.It gives great protection can even take a drop or a slip out of the hand. I love this case the black patent leather makes it a very stylish case.
I have paired this with an unlocked RAZR, and so far they both have worked great (2 months).It fits well on both ears, not so big, and the voice quality is very good. I also found the price from amazon, really competitive
The charger did come in and does charge my mp3 players like it's supposed to. The shipping was longer than what I paid for. However I thought the charger was a disconnected charger to where the cable could come off the base and connect to a computer so I'll have to order another charger that does what I need it to do.
This portable USB Port car charger is a must have for people on the go.  Pair this with an extra or spare cord and you are good to go!
This is a great Bluetooth keyboard that is very compact and easy to use. It does work for Android and iDevices and has a shelf for you device to rest on so you can see the screen while you type.
This was my first foray into the BT department. I first had this paired to a Moto v551 then later to a RAZR v3 Silver and Black. The only shortcoming I can find is the method used to turn the unit on and off. There are times you think you have the headset turned off, but in reality you just redialed the last person called. The HS850 is a better designe here, but thats the only "one up" the 850 has on this headset. The volume and fitment of this 820 are much better than on the 850. I have only had 1 signal related issue and that was due to me being too far away from the phone. Overall a great buy!
This is an excelent USB port it has the option for it's power . Ether pluged in an A/C outlet or power from your device's nice option
This is my first "smart phone" so I can't compare this to previous models.  However, I can tell you that it is great for what I need:1.  Great wireless service coverage.  Verizon has the best coverage of any provider.  I even have a signal in elevators and stairwells.2.  Text messaging.  My job requires me to carry a pager.  With this phone, I have forwarded my pager.  Now I only carry one device.  It is great for responding to pages or initiating message dialog.  I have 1,000 messages on my plan, and that should be plenty.  It is very handy to be in meetings and be able to ping people back at their desk for information.3.  Organizer.  I installed the software on my PC at work, and now my Outlook calendar is available wherever I take my phone.  One thing I didn't like was the lack of options on the initial sync.  I wound up with all of my "Frequent Contacts" from Outlook on my phone - this includes anyone I had ever sent an e-mail to.  Luckily, it is easy to filer on these contacts and delete them.  Be sure to set device overrides desktop on contacts.I don't use the web or e-mail pieces because the data package is too expensive (~$45/mo).  Unless you need to send and receive attachments, SMS is sufficient for e-mail.  Most web queries can be done over SMS to services like Google provides.Overall it's great!
I am disappointed that the 1A didn't work with my iPad.  That's what I get for buying a cheap adapter.
The Motorola H500 is a very good unit.  It has excellent sound quality and is easy to operate.  The only negative thing is it does hurt the ear after wearing it for awhile.
Great I gave it to my GF and she loves it.
I hate this phone...I was drawn to it by it's appearance and size but what a horrible dissapointment.  I had to get motorola mobile tools and 'hack' the volume so I could hear it - the loudest default setting is just too low. The display is impossible to see outside in bright light, I detest it that it has such a poor means of displaying missed calls, if the same caller has attempted to reach you multiple times, it displays the last call time only. I just returned this phone for a replacement because of dust under the display screen, I was told that it is a 'known' issue, but that my replacement phones warranty will expire this month at the same time as the original that I purchased.
The iGO bluetooth keyboard works great. The only complaint is the extreme left and right tips a little when typing.
Great tools, I still use them and I like the quality, great price as well.Good vendor.I would buy more.
I doesn't hold a charge for very long which is to be expected for an inexpensive battery.  You really do get what you pay for, don't you?
I don't own this phone. I own the cheaper Motorola (Nextel) i710. I have many friends who own this phone though, although a few of them have since "downgraded" to the i710.The main reason I chose the i710 over this i730 was signal strength. the i710 consistently gets better signal the the i730 no matter which of my friends phones I compare it too. All my friends are on the same wireless plan from Nextel as I am, so I know its not service, it is definitely the phones.I can have full bars on my phone (5 including the little antennae icon) and my friends phone held right next to mine will have 2 or 3 bars. My phone gets signal in places their phones are "Out of Service."Now you might say that maybe my friend just has a dud phone. Well I have 4 friends who have the i730, 5 friends with the i710 and one with the i860, all from Nextel, and the i710's always have better signal compared to the i730's. The i860 gets as good a signal as the i710 (but its significantly more expensive too).I am not sure why two phones based on the same hardware and software have such drastic differences in signal. The only thing I can think of is some hardware added to give the i730 an external screen somehow interferes with the antennae hardware somehow.Other than signal strength compared to the cheaper and basically identical (except for external screen) i710, the i730 is a pretty good phone. Lots of features, solid and durable construction and good battery life. For me signal was more important that a silver case an an external screen but if you like those things the i730 is a decent phone to use.
After 6 months of use, the battery still performance well.  I can't tell if this battery is genuine or not.
I previously used both the Motorola HS850 and the HS820 and had the same two problems with each.  Insuffcient volume and insecure attachment to my ear.  Whenever I moved, the motorola headsets wiggled and made me feel as if they were about to fall off.  They never did but it was still annoying.  The volume problem was in part related to this.  The contact with my ear wasn't very firm and the ambient noise that the headsets let in coupled with a relatively low volume meant that I had to press the headset to my ear to hear clearly.I have been satisfied with my Plantronics 510.  The choice of 3 interchangable ear cushions, great volume, crisp output and decent range make it unbeatable.  The battery life is somewhat less that the motorola headsets, but I purchased an extra charger for home.  The power button is small, but using it is  a minor problem that resolves with a little practice.  The sound is crisp and clear.  The range is as good or better than the motorola sets.
It helped me get improved signal strength for cellular (phone) communications, but does nothing to improve my Android phone's 3G data signal or WiFi data signal. I didn't expect it to and I don't think it's design to improve 3G/Wifi so if that's what you're hoping for, forget it. If you want more bars... this works very well.
This charger doesn't work very well. When plugged in, it shows that it is charging, but after ten minutes I'm lucky to get 1% more on my battery. I only use it now if my battery is low and I want to keep it from getting lower...that's really all it's good for.
As many people complained, I found this headset's microphone was very weak. The other person can not hear me at all.  So I contacted Plaintronics for repair.  Their repair process has no tracking, just sending in your headset to an address.  Two weeks later, I received a used one back, not the one I sent in, packaged in an OEM box. Although this one has better microphone than the new one I sent in, it battery is not very reliable to hold charge, also the battery portion is kind of loose.I can not recommend Plantronics product at all.
For a corded headset solution, this headset is excellent.  I use it with my KRZR.  Sound quality is more than loud enough and quality is excellent.  One of the main issues I had was that I always have the air vents going in my vehicles.  In the past, people on the other end of my calls always complained about wind noise, with this headset that isn't an issue anymore.  Additionally, the headset is very comfortable to wear.There is only one item to be careful of.  When I first tried the unit I didn't realize that there was a mute function on the control cord.  As a result I called a particular person a few times and they couldn't hear me.  Finally, I figured out what was going on.  Of course it was user error.  Oh well.I would highly recommend this headset to anyone looking for one.
This little hub seems to be the only brand that does not blow out its ports.  Terrific for dental OP's running digital equipment.  Provides a local hub source for on top of the cabinet when the computer is located underneath.  Easy access, works well and very inexpensive.  Be sure to use the same port for the camera and the same port for the digital x ray sensor and label the ports.
I have been itching for a Treo ever since the 600 came out and I noticed that more streamlined design.  When smartphones were first introduced, I bucked the trend of combining the two thinking that as often as I use my cell phone and my pda, if I bought one that integrated both I would wear it out twice as fast.  And in my humble opinion, it was a valid reason because back then, the original phone/pda's were impossibly large.  Well I have finally become a convert.I spent a great deal of time researching Blackberry's vs. the Treo's vs. Pocket PC's and came VERY close to grabbing a T-Mobile Dash (which I still believe is the all-around smallest model availabe as I write this, or at least it SEEMED to be), but I finally settled with the trusted Palm OS platform (one that I have become VERY familiar with over the years using pda's for quite some time now).  When I set out to get one, I really had my heart set on the Treo 680...but as I read the reviews for them, one thing kept creeping in to almost all the reviews: battery life was terrible.  With that aside, quite a few of the reviewers mentioned that all things considered, they were more happy with their old 650.  I saw this on so MANY reviews that I began to think twice.  Then I noticed that the 700p was a more beefed up version of the 650, and began to consider it as well.  Unfortunately as I write this, it isn't available with Alltell service where I am (it will, but nobody can give me a target date, and dang it, I am too impatient to wait...) so I am right back with the 650.  It took a while before Palm was able to knock enough of the bugs out of the 650 that I felt like buying one would be worth it...and I am discovering more than a few bugs have been associated with both the 680 & 700p, so no matter HOW much time I spend considering upgrading to a newer model, I find compelling reasons to go right back to the Old School 650.Reason #1 to go with it: Since it is no longer available at Palm's Official website, and with the newer models coming out, chances are you can find some pretty sweet deals on the older 650.Reason #2: Virtually ALL of the problems originally associated with the 650 have been eliminated.  You want Push email?  You can get it.  You want web surfing?  No prob.  You want to view AND edit MS Word Documents and Excell?  Easier than ever with the 650 (that was one major plus over most of the Pocket PC's and ALL of the Blackberrys -- sure you can VIEW some of these documents, but you cannot EDIT them, too).Reason #3: No matter HOW convenient the pda, I found it next to impossible to give up a touch-screen's amazing versatility and the ease with which you can use it to edit things and connect on websites.One more important item to factor in when considering buying a 650: With the popularity with ever increasing wireless downloading speeds, I was afraid that the slower Treo would make internet surfing next to impossible because of the archaic speeds with which you are forced to endure.  I was VERY pleastantly surprised that downloading web pages did not take as long as I was at first expecting.  I have to tell you, after experimenting with the supposedly MUCH faster 700p with another online carrier than the one I was using (I won't say which, but they really did their best to tell me the 650 was slower than a dial-up modem from 1985), anyway, the 650 was only SLIGHTLY slower than this screaming fast 700p or the 700w.  I figured that was something I could live with to be honest.  Hey, it's a tiny hand-held device that allows me to send and receive email and surf the web...I'm still amazed that something like this exists at ALL to be honest with you...so downloading speed is still secondary in my opinion.  If speed really IS on your list of absolutes, maybe you ought to move up to something else...but keep in mind, it is only BARELY faster than what I experienced first hand.One more thing: the screen is amazing.  There are only so many ways to say WOW.  If you are considering buying a Palm that runs Windows Mobile, you ought to know that the screen clarity is almost reduced by HALF.  This apparently has something to do with Window's OS, and seriously put my decision to buy one on the back burner.Sure there are things that a smartphone cannot as yet do without some difficulty or impossibility...but that is the same with ALL current models.  Do some SERIOUS research into what you want vs. what you NEED and make an informed decision only AFTER you have had the chance to go into a store and test a specific model PERSONALLY.  Do that and no matter WHAT you decide on, you will most likely be happy.  So far, I know I am VERY satisfied with my choice.  Good luck on yours.***UPDATE***I opted not to get a Bluetooth hands-free device -- at first.  Originally I would see people walking around with these Lt. Uhura type thingy's sticking out of their ears and I couldn't help but wonder how lazy people are that they cannot raise their hand up to their head while walking around simply to talk on the phone.  For the most part I STILL feel this way, but I decided to buy a Bluetooth hands-free headset for while I am driving.  I cannot afford to miss calls, and being in radio, when not at work or home I can be found in my car monitoring the radio virtually 100% of the time and unfortunately this means I sometimes cannot hear the ringer.  The tethered device that came with the phone is certainly loud enough, but simply did not fit my ear (it kept falling out).  I bought a replacement that came with a variable size adapter and yet while it FIT better, the sound was almost impossible to hear (the worst I have ever experienced, actually).  So I took the plunge knowing full-well that the Palm Treo has a somewhat problematic history using these devices...so I made sure that I had an iron-clad return policy in place and jumped in.  It took me no more than a minute to configure my head-set and I went ahead and made a test call which had more than enough volume -- in fact it had plenty to spare.  All in all I am VERY satisfied with the performance. (I bought a Keycera Bluetooth, if that means anything)One additional item that requires mentioning: I currently have call-waiting as a service with my Treo and yet I have missed at least 3 calls (that I know of).  This particular feature does not seem to be supported by the 650...and IF it is, I have yet to discover any useful info regarding the problem, whether online or in the bible-sized instruction manual.  I will keep looking and IF I find a solution I will quickly report it here asap.  Just one more thing to think about.  Otherwise, I am amazingly satisfied with my Treo otherwise.  The ONLY thing I wish (other than user-friendly call-waiting) is faster downloads while online.  That is supposedly possible with the newer models using EVDO and yet the 700p I tested failed to work only slightly faster than my 650.  Maybe it was the network -- but not according to them (no surprise there).  I still think my purchase was WELL worth it.
I always thought it was obnoxious to leave your headset on all the time, but now i know why people do it. One you forget you have it on and two it's kind of a pain in the neck to setup. This particular product is pretty good, it pairs up well with my RAZR after saying yes to no less than three questions and works very well. The only complaint I have is it could be louder, but it serves my purpose.
We have three identical phones and three different bluetooth headsets. A Plantronics Explorer 320, a Motorola H350, and this Plantronics Voyager 510. Of the three, the Plantronics are superior in comfort and sound quality, and the 510 is outstanding in both respects. Although a little bulkier than the others, it is much more comfortable and my callers and I actually feel it sounds better than using the handset. As a result, I don't use the handset unless I have to!
Like the previous Motorola phones that I've had, this one has the easy intutive system for navigating its numerous menus --- I'm sold on using Motorola for this reason,  compared to the Noxxxx, Motorola is great!PROS:Almost everythingAwesome designGSMI found the volume to be excellent compared to my last phone (motorola v60).Good antenna, extremely low rate of dropped signals --- also, since the antenna does not protrude, I anticipate it will not require replacement (I had to replace the antenna twice on my old v60 --- broke off from carrying in pocket and/or dropping)Excellent color screen.Good camera for a phone.Great size, easily fits in a shirt pocket.Great battery life (with Bluetooth off)Easily customizable but items that I never use (media mall, media net, etc.) remain in a prominent place and can not be put in some obscure location.CONS:The most significant negative feature is the screen --- it is extremely hard to see in sunlight.Display on front (when closed) is hard to read.Price (if you are upgrading your phone with Cingular --- they wanted $199) However, since I was changing from AT&T; to Cingular I was able to buy the phone at BestBuy for $70.The manual that comes with it should be better writen.Screen gets oily from normal use and must be wiped off frequently.Alarm Clock interface could be better.Date Book Alert is not very loud.Accessory support at Cingular Stores rather poor --- two Cingular Stores did not have the USB cable (had to buy one at Wal-Mart).Of the four or five phones that I have owned, this one is by far the best in all respects.  Even with these cons it is still eons ahead of other phones.EDIT: Change from 5 stars to 1 star...  I loved the features on the phone and the flip lid was great.  PROBLEM:  After about 3 months the screen would not light up --- took the phone back to AT&T; and they sent me a reconditioned phone which lasted about a month --- took that one back, they sent another reconditioned phone,  Long story > short:  I had 5 phones in one year, the 5th phone finally worked and kept working for a couple of years.  Because of my experience with this phone, I will not buy another Motorola.
I bought this for my wife's 2 year old iphone 4S.  She said it seemed to work about the same or a little better than the old battery.  Not a huge improvement, but an acceptable replacement  if you need a new battery.
Since I am always on my phone, the battery life is very short. After purchasing this battery case I am no longer worried about running out of battery life.
I love the retractable feature as it hides away so nicely. I does the job just as well as a thick corded device. excellent product.
I've been using this phone for a few months now and have had a chance to use most of the features.  Most of them are pretty standard to cell phones these days, but a few things are worth commenting on:-Great speakerphone.  Very loud and clear sounding, both ways.-Decent battery life.  Almost lasts a week with minimal usage; 2 days with heavier use.-Battery meter is very inaccurate below 1/2 charge.  Seems chronic with Motorola phones.-Nice, clear display.  A bit hard to see in the brightest sunlight, but other than that, no problems.-Camera is of average quality at best.  Takes okay pictures for a new wallpaper, but that's about it.-Serious annoyance: One of the side buttons that remain exposed when the phone is closed controls the type of ring/vibrate.  It's very loud if you don't already have the phone on silent/vibrate only.  Basically, to quickly change to phone from a loud ring to silent--say in a theater--you have to make a loud noise.  Very short sighted.  And since the button is exposed even with the phone closed, you end up hitting it by accident quite a bit.Overall, I'm pretty happy with the phone.  I could've chosen a smaller phone with a better camera, but not with a speakerphone, or with speakerphone, but not at this price.  (...)  Can't beat it on value.
I bought 2 of these for our Motorola 3xx's because we bought a new RV and it is so easy to forget your phone charger at home so I decided to buy these and just leave them in the RV!
Seeing is how the 2, 5 star reviews on this item are from fake users who seem to be trash talking other iphone battery sellers and 5 staring there own is pretty messed up so therefore it appears this seller is some type of scammer.
I haven't had any problems with it.  It just like the oringal charger that comes with the Galaxy S 2.
I bought the Plantronics 320 today. As soon as I walked out the store,the reception went static beyond belief. The salesman said "Give it a chance", I have and it's going back tomorrow. For the past week  I've bought 4 headsets(Motorola 500,850,700,& this one which is one of the worst.I found the Motorola 700 to be the best so far.  Clear reception most of the time,excellent volume(no problem hearing while driving),& it always connected to my treo 650.  On a windy day my friend on the other end didn't even know I got out the car,hardly any background noise.  I just ordered the 700 through Amazon,much cheaper than Cingular & Motorola.
Not too sure how to make it stay put, but it seems to work well.  I purchased this headset for my mother and she has not complained about it yet!
My wife and I both purchased the BT350 on suggestion from a Verizon rep with our new phones. She got a Treo650 and I got the LG8100.Pairing the device was relatively easy, once you followed the written instructions. However, we've both had problems with the headset staying paired with our phones on a couple of occassions, and have to run the pair-up process again.When they work, the sound is pretty good. But most of the time, they don't work very well at all. And for the record, typicall my headset is with 3-4 feet of my phone - and I've had the same problems when it's less than 2 feet away with perfect line of sight.My wife and I almost never can call each other using our headsets and connect on the first try. Oh, it will call and we'll try to answer, and it will sound loud and usually clear - but one of us can't hear the other 99% of the time - at all. It's a series of "hello-hello? HELLO?" Forcing us to hangup and call again. Then we usually are connected.When we do connect, the sound typically has some static, minor digital echoing, and/or frequent dropouts such that you can't hear what the other party is saying. It's very annoying - almost like when you try to fake that your getting bad reception on your cell phone an...it...sou...ds..li..is.The one button feature is ok once you figure out what the various presses on it do. I've never had to adjust the volume buttons, but they are basically up and down.More annoying is the continuously strobing blue LED on the main button. When the headset is powered on, the button flashes. When you are actually using the headset (connected to a call) the button flashes faster. This confuses people when you are wearing it - because it appears to them that you must be using it since it's flashing. But it's always flashing! So if you are a person who uses it a lot and doesn't take it off very often, that can cause a problem.Even MORE of a problem is driving with it at night. For a week, I drove home in the dark with my headset, and found myself constantly turning my head to look for emergency vehicles as I kept seeing this blue strobe out of the corner of my eye. But of course when I turned my head, it was gone. I finally figured out it was the reflection of my headsets indicator light reflecting off the windows! That can't be good.On the plus side - it is very lightweight and easy to wear on either ear. It comes with an AC and a USB charger - which was great since I could charge it at work or with my laptop. It seems to hold a charge very well for long periods. I know I've gone an entire week without recharging. The range seem pretty good - though I usually never get beyond a few feet from my phone.Even though I can't take this headset back, I'm purchasing another one because this one is pretty much useless if the intent of it's design is to have a simple to operate, hands-free and safe method of communicating with your cell phone. The BT350 simply doesn't meet any of those standards.
Really poor quality tweezer bent like nothing screw drivers made of cheap plastic adhesive removing tool again cheap plastic you get what you pay for would not recommend to anyone who is trying to perform phone surgery
I just recieved my Treo 650 four days ago and am happy so far.  I bought it just to be an organizer, phone, mp3 player--in that order--so I can't speak to other features such as web access (currently an expensive $45 from Verizon).Two pieces of advice:1. Budget several hours to set up.  It's nearly like buying a new computer.  I had to transfer my calendar and contacts from my old Cli&eacute; and found that some of my old Palm applications caused the Treo to restart (I promptly deleted them). Generally it was just tedious software stuff, including a tricky firmware update from the Palm website, but don't expect to be ready out the door.2. Before you buy, budget for accessories.  After purchasing the following: case ($20), SD card reader ($10; for the easiest transfer of files to the SD card), 2GB SD card ($150), 2.5MM-compatible headphones ($17), 2.5MM>3.5MM headphone adapter ($10), extra sync cable ($13), mp3 player application ($15; the RealPlayer is clunky and doesn't have a graphic equalizer), I have nearly spent as much as the device itself!  Assuming the Treo gives me years of service, It'll be worth it but I'm going to have to live with the fear that the accessories will not be useful for my next smartphone (I rarely have replaced my cell phones because they got too old, it's normally because they stop working).
This item does nothing to enhance the signal in your phone, I followed the instructions and applied the antenna as stated but no change in the signal strength. I guess that's the reason why they're selling so cheap. Do not waste your time with this product.
The range on the headset was pathetic - maybe 2 or 3 feet from the phone to get a decent signal (which defeats the entire puprpose of a CORDLESS headset IMHO).  Otherwise, it was horrific - static, terrible sound quality, etc.  Please do not waste money on that POS.  I swapped it out for the Moto H850 and am much happier with that unit paired up with my MotoE815.
I bought these after TWO sets of LG Tones broke on me. I like these a lot. Very comparable to the Tones. What was most important to me was battery life. I used these for listening to sports and talk radio. I have wired buds for listening to music. The only two complaints I have with this item is: the neck band is kinda tight in comparison to the Tone. Not as easy to get on and off. However, they don't move around as much as the Tone's. My second complaint: the on/off. I have to take the headset off to access the switch. The Tone's switch is a much better setup and easily accessible. All in all, I would recommend these. I am hoping the quality is better than that of the LG Tone.
it works great and came at the right time you can never have enough chargers for every where lol thanks
U can never have too many.  Bought this as a spare for purse, home and work.  Now I don't have to worry about forgetting it.
This comes with 4 flats and 2 philips. I believe they are also metric in sizes. I used one to take a part a netbook. I like the fact that they spin, come in a plastic kit. They are reasonably priced. These items are high quality. Handles are small and can be hard to loosen a screw if torqued down. I used them for a laptop not as a jeweler so... Nice case, nice color, small area, ... Comes in a card board cover as well. Packaged and more packaged. A little over doing it there. Can't be at times a little difficult to open the plastic case. Was going push up or down. Comes with different sizes. Some of the flats seemed a little thick in the blade. Not a bad item for the price. Always good to have a set of these around for glasses/sunglasses or for other items with small screws.
Because of proliferation of USB based products, the USB hub is now more neccessary than ever. If you have multiple USB based devices (printers, keyboard, mouse, flash storage, USB speakers, iphone/ipod jack etc) and want to consolidate all your devices into a one single hub, then this hub does its job well.This devices works equally well both in Windows (Vista) and Mac OS (Leopard and Snow Leopard).It is about half the size of a medium sized hand.Each USB port has its own dedicated LED light. The LED light indicators, however, are little brighter than I would like. It MAY bother those who are extremely light sensitive while sleeping. But a cheap way to alleviate such a problem would be to cover the LED lights with tape.I used this device as a hub for all my USB devices for my MacBook Pro (2009) and the device works flawlessly, including for my USB speakers.
I had this headset originally, and then lost it.  After I lost my original, I figured I'd give a motorolla one a try, and purchased the most expensive motorolla on the market (H700).Using my treo 650, I COULD NOT HEAR ANYTHING people were saying, and got constant complaints that the people I was talking to couldn't hear me well.  The volume was terrible, and so was the sound quality.This headset is SO LOUD that i have to keep it on the 3rd from highest setting.  The clarity is great!  People think I'm talking on a land line.  For the $35 bucks, I bought a new one and chucked my motorolla in the garbage.IM SO HAPPY TO HAVE MY SCALA BACK!
It is reliable & works well with the power adapter. But with all cables plugged in it tips easy & is far too bright for bedrooms. So for the actual function it is 5stars. But for other considerations it is about 2.5 stars. So, even though it is only USB2 (not the faster 3) I give it 3.5 stars.
I have had this phone almost 6 weeks (40 days).  At 3 weeks the middle row of keys stopped working (a, s, d, f, and g, etc).  I was told to call Palm in India, which I did, and they told me the keys were not covered under warranty.I truly wish I were making this up, because I have really loved Palm.  This is my fourth Palm device, though it will likely be my last.  I run a small real estate company which works with wireless telecom providers throughout the nation.  My hope for this device was that I could stop carrying three devices (my cell phone, my Palm T3 and my laptop).  And then, that all my guys could stop carrying all these devices around.Of course, when I took the phone to Sprint, they said it was Palm's responsibility to repair.  When I raised a stink with them they just looked at me with blank eyes, as they always do.  Sprint seems like they are in the business of trying to run customers off.I called India back and raised enough of a stink, that they said they would give me - this one time - a "free return and repair," meaning I would be without my phone for 5-10 business days. They also gave me the option of paying them an additional $25 to get a refurbished replacement, complete with a 90-day warranty (which I now know means nothing).  These people honestly acted like they were doing me the biggest favor by offering me this repair.I was then effectively called a liar by Palm / India when I had to re-emphasize that the keys just don't work, and that I needed something immediately.  I don't understand how I can be made to feel like a criminal when I deal with these people, or how I can be made to feel like they're doing me a favor by standing behind their product.  I am the customer!  Doesn't that mean anything anymore?I am also not sure I understand how customer service in general has become so bad (though Amazon's remains very, very good).  When a person spends $400 on a phone, or any device, it should work longer than a few weeks.  But when it does stop working, the company that sold it should stand behind their product, instead of looking for ways to squirrel out of their responsibility.  Subsequent to this occurrence, other friends / colleagues have told me how they had problems with their Treo 650s, as well.There are other issues with this phone.  Out of the box, the power/sync cord did not work.  I returned that to Sprint and got a tremendous hassle in trying to get it replaced.  (I ended up buying a Seidio charger/cradle, which works fine.) The sound is pretty bad - I am constantly having to adjust the volume.  Every so often, the phone just resets itself - can't figure this one out at all.  Also, when someone calls in on Call-Waiting, you cannot disconnect your active call without disconnecting the incoming call; in other words, when you accept the Call-Waiting call, it automatically means two calls will run simultaneously, even when the first party hangs up.  This plays heck on your monthly minutes.Also, there are limited, non-intuitive ways you have to power on the phone.  And don't get this phone for its camera: cell phone cameras are only good for placing pictures on that cell phone.Otherwise, all the Palm applications work as they should, and as they have for the past number of years.  Expect nothing new and different from the Palm OS part of the Treo.All in all, I am firm in my opinion that I will never own another Palm device.  My company will stop using Palm, and we are going to slowly migrate away from Sprint (when contracts start to expire).My apologies for the rant, but it simply seems that these companies have become much bigger than their customers.  Excuse me if I just let them move on without me.Are there any companies out there that provide good customer service anymore?  I know mine tries to; otherwise, we're out of business.
Very pleased with this tool kit.  I have already gotten a couple phones repaired with this kit with no loss anywhere in the kit.  Would purchase again if necessary.
This thing just doesn't work well with the Treo 6501. it doesn't automatically connect, when a call comes, or when a call is initiated2. the volume is way too lowthe comfort is good, but for the price, there are many BETTER headsets out there ----consider the Cardo Scala, the Jabra JX10, and the Palm Treo headset - those are your best betshappy shopping!
do you need to charge your phone? so you need to transfer data? then boy oh boy this cable does that.
JUNK!!!......This product must be miss labeled.  I can not get my Samsung S2 phone to charge with this OEM charger.  The lights are on, the phone says its charging but nothing happens.  I am not sure if I got a defective product but it is very upsetting to sit in your car for hours and not see your phone recharge.  If you need a reliable charger, DO NOT purchase this product.If you need a car charger for your Samsung S2, I would recommend the Motorola Vehicle Power Adapter.  It charges fast and is dependable.
This is the best bluetooth headset I've ever owned!  I've owned a Sony and Plantronics previously.Sound quality as well as volume is clear for both myself and the person on the other line.  And it looks great...not as bulky as the "over the ear" headsets.One "negative" that I've noticed is the short range.  If my phone (Sony Ericsson T637) is more than an arm's length away, I hear a crackling noise.
I've always had one of these on my phone. Had to get a new phone while on vacation and the service at my rental was terrible!!! Slapped one of these on and, I don't know if it's the power of suggestion, but my new phone works soooo much better!!!! Love these things! Recommend!!!
good oem car charger, i originally bought it for my galaxy S2 and later on that week I upgrated to the Galaxy S3 and it works prefectly fine, I would recommend this product
I bought this earpiece a month ago to go with my brand new Nextel i870.  It worked sorta ok but was a bit finiky when used with my phone in my belt holder.  I didnt wear it all the time, just when I was commuting to and from work.  I kept it in my pocket so it would be on standby, in contact with my phone.  Most times, it would connect quickly and function well.  Ocassionally, it would seem to connect, but when I attempted an outgoing call, it would disconnect.I also had trouble hearing the unit while driving.  As I am approaching my mid 50's, my hearing is not as acute as in past years, and the internal noise from the pickup truck (windows up, and AC running) makes hearing the other party on the earpiece difficult.My main problem with this unit is the recharge plug.  I have 3 Nextel/Motorola phones that use this type of plug and have not had any trouble with it.  The plug end has a release button to depress when unplugging.  The catch on my HS850 charger plug was more difficult to release and required much more pressure to release than my other 2 Motorola charger plugs of the same type.  This contributed to undue stress on the socket and eventually the socket pulled loose.  I probably charged it 6-7 times over the month I had it.I intend to replace my HS850 with some other type that has an earpiece that fits in my ear, providing some sound isolation from environmental noises, rather than the lay on this ear type.Be careful unplugging this unit from its charging plug.
After trying the Motorola HS 810 which would feel like it was always falling off or falling off, I tried several Bluetooth headsets at the Sprint and Cingular stores. Other than the Jabra, they were all the same, they had a loop that you hook onto your ear, so they did not fit.This is the only one headset that would properly wrap around my ear and because the ear piece goes into the ear canal, stay anchored. Sound quality is great. The HS 810 would not hold a charge very long. So far so good with this Jabra --- it holds a charge while the Motorola needed to be charged all of the time.I like the vibrating feature when the phone ringer is turned off --- no need to share all that noise. As I am on call or expecting calls often when I am out at dinner, this really makes it discreet rather than missing the call and playing telephone tag for awhile.Sound quality is better than the Motorola HS 810. Jabra seems to work well for those who have small ears and their ear cells make it adjustable.If you don't need the vibrating feature, try the new Jabra BT 500 which is an upgrade of the Jabra BT 250, charging can be USB cable which is great as you will not have to take another charger on the trip!I also have the Jabra SP500 which is a wireless speakerphone and it works great vs. the Motorola speakerphone which I returned. The Speakerphone power and power AC cords for the BT 250v are not compatible, so if you need to use both, you will need two charges, although they are small.
I've had 3 headsets already, and each one had something about it that I didn't like. I hesitated to buy this one, despite the great reviews, because I wanted one that didn't give me the 'telemarketer' look. Top things I was looking for were: sound quality, comfort, and battery life. This unit delivers on all 3 counts. It sounds fantastic, it's really comfortable (especially with the Jabra EarGels on the ear piece), and the battery lasts a long time. Looking back, this is the one that I should have bought in the first place. Recommended.
I've had my SKII fo a little over a month now and find it a good fit for my needs.  I am a business user, not a Snoop Dog groupie, and this is a VERY cool device.Coverage in my area (Austin, TX is good)and while I have not yet traveled away from the IH-35 corridor, I had good voice and data coverage all the way to the TX/OK stateline (as far north as I went). For $20/month all you can eat data, this is a screaming deal.  I don't find the web surfing that useful (speed is about like a 28kbps dial-up connection) but for email it is superior to the Blackberry 957 I used a number of years ago.  The interface for the phone and for email and the address book is great.  Far better than any Nokia phone I have ever used.  The intellisync software allows me to create use a separate address book in Outlook that I can then sync with the SKII with a one button push.  Very simple and means you can have an abreviated address book if you are concerned about having this infor resident on TMO/Danger's servers.  I agree with another reviewier that it would be better that this info is NOT resident, but if that's a concern, limit what you leave on the server.Drawbacks are no bluetooth, no resident memory for email, pictures etc, no removable memory stick and no easy way to create and use your own ringtones.Great things, great keyboard (nicer/bigger than Crackberry), intuitive interface/software screen size/clarity. Camera a nice feature, easy to email pics anywhere. A very cool and functional device if you need phone and and email. The web and other stuff are "OK" but TMO data network will have to get faster and more WAP coded websites for content that is relevent for that to be a big reason to buy/use this device.I purchased through Danger's website total cost $0 after $200 instant discount and $100 in rebates. Worth a year's contract with TMO in my book.  Paying $49/mo for 3000 regional anytime minuets and $20/mo for all you can eat data (email, text messaging, etc, etc EVERYTHING DATA included).I would recommend this to anyone that really needs email and occaisional web service in addition to phone service.  Not the smallest/best coolest phone, but the best convergent communication device on the market right now IMHO.
I needed a BT headset for the longest time.....since I never used one and was getting worried that I may get busted one day.  I saw this on Gold Box and ordered it immediately for $15....how could you go wrong?It is intended for use primarily with a Blackberry Javelin (8900).  It paired quickly has held a charge for 2.5 days thus far (light-moderate usage).  My opinion is that it does what it should at its price point and I was not expecting a miracle.If you are looking for a BT set that has loads of noise canceling and voice detection..then this is not for you.  Look for a Jawbone by Aliph...The H500 is a model that has been around a long time and is perfect for my needs.  I just wish it were a bit louder and thus I am giving it a 4/5.Great value, great item.
took longer than expected to be delivered but over all satisfied with the charger. the retractable cord is just long enough to reach the cup holder in my truck where i usually put my phone. down side, ive already got 2 welps on my arm from retracting the cord! be careful! haha.
Cheap in price and quality. Mine broke after a couple months of use. The sound started going in and out. It was cheap enough I wasn't really upset. Next time I might just buy a couple so I don't have to wait for the replacement to come.
OMG , if u have a tape deck and need AUX use this product , it's not exspensive and sounds great and works with MP3 , CD players , phones . its got awsome sound !!! way better than a FM Transmitter !!!!!
This case not only looks fantastic, but it very functional and convenient to carry all the necessities (credit card, id, cash, etc.)  it only smelled like plastic for the first 2-3 minutes after I opened it, which didn't bother me at all. Overall this case is awesome. It's cute, and seems sturdy and well made. Buy it!
If yah ave the correct driver on your PC you can USB charge your phone
Battery powered so no charging. Item delivered on time, was as described. It works perfectly with very true sound and easy to pair to my phone.
I use these for electronics repairs.  There are several sizes and configurations to meet various needs.  The most helpful thing about them is the independently turning barrel which allows you to apply pressure on the end of the tool and easily turn the barrel/screw right or left.  They may not be the best tools on the market, but they have served me well.
Works fine. You plug it in and the phone gets power. What else would it do?
This headset was purchased to replace TWO crappy jabra freespeaks.  This is very small, but unlike the goldlatern bluetreks or the Jabra, does not hide its mass well; it all sits right outside your ear, and in completely inconspicuous.  With my old bluetrek and even the jabra, my hair hid most of it, which for me is a plus, as I do not use Bluetooth headsets to impress people or get atttention; I don't want peoples attention and questions.Which is this headsets only drawback - it has this HUGE, BLUE ORB-LIKE LIGHT on it that takes up the whole front of the piece.  YOU WILL ATTRACT ATTENTION with this headset on.  It blinks in standby, it blinks when in operation, it blinks all the dang time.  But, if you can get passed that, it does work pretty well.  The sound is a little tinny, but pretty clear.  And unlike all my other bluetooth headsets, the headset volume only operates the headset, and doesn't link to the phone volume - this means that you have more adjustability for volume level and loudness, which is good.  The mic seems really good - no complaints from those on the other end, basically.  And the battery life isn't TOO ugly at 5 hours.  And the ear anchor could be a little more rigid and smaller for smaller ears, but it will do as long as you are not jogging around constantly.
Purchased this USB cable to connect my Samsung smartphone to my laptop computer.  Works well and fits my needs and expectations.
The case is not white, its more of a silver. It's still a very pretty case- it fit my phone perfectly. It took too long to arrive.
This is my first BT headset. The main reasons I chose this one were low price, small size/weight, and having seen a couple of people use this at work.Pros:The size/weight is so small as to be unnoticeable. I find the headset very comfortable for extended periods of time. Price-wise, it was the cheapest headset from a reputable brand when I bought it. Battery life is decent, probably 3+ days, although I tend to charge it about every two days. Great for driving or any time you want your hands free but can't use speakerphone.Cons:People whom I call have complained occasionally about the sound quality. Range is not great, sometimes 10 ft causes annoying "I am about to disconnect" noise. Because there is only one main button that is used for everything, it is very easy to accidentally activate voice dialing, last-number redial, etc. Initial pairing with the phone was not intuitive at all: who knew you had to keep the button pressed while trying to pair up? Finally, the blinking blue light on you temple makes you look like a robot!Recommendation:This is an OK first/small/cheap BT headset. If you talk a lot on the phone, look for something else. There must be headsets out there that provide better sound quality, longer range, and have more intuitive buttons and controls.
I love the way it can charge 2 devices at once!  Seems to charge quicker without GPS on, with it on, it only holds the battery, but better than it dying!!!
The Jabra Eargels are wonderful.. I cannot believe how comfortable, and user friendly they are.  Thank you, if not for these, I could not use my bluetooth.Great Merchandise..
Other power cases muffled the speaker sound. This one had a great sound port on the back for clear listening.
This is only my 2nd headset, and I much prefer it to the Motorola HS850.  It stays in your ear and has plenty of volume to overcome road noise in a car.  However, when my headset is on for extended periods, it sometimes experiences problems (will answer calls but not transfer them to the earpiece).  Turning headset off then on again fixes this problem.  Battery life and charge time seems excellent, but I don't have much to compare it to.  For those wanting to use it with your office phone also, the Plantronics bluetooth office phone adapter is EXPENSIVE ($200+ in Office Depot).
Yeah, I know, they warned me; but I thought I was smarter than the average bear- not so.If you have auto reverse on your tape player and you cannot shut the feature off, this will not work.  It may work for a few minutes at a time, but will always end up frustrating you by switching every few minutes.If you can turn off the auto reverse (or don't have it), it's a very solid product that sounded great.For those like me who need a FM transmitter instead of the tape version, I'd suggest the Soundkase FM Transmitter for iPod & MP3s.  We've been using it for a week or 2 with good results (and from my research, probably the best results you can get if you can't use a tape connection).
In a nutshell, this is NOT an OEM charger.  Although it has the Samsung markings, it doesn't seat well with a Samsung phone.  This means that it's either meant for another market or it's counterfeit.  With that said, I wouldn't buy this again.~~~~~~~~~~August 17, 2013 - UpdateThe seller tried to make amends by sending me three replacement chargers.  After using this for a while, it is still garbage.  It does not charge my phone and in fact, it drains the phone.  This must be a counterfeit product.  It has Samsung markings but it does not charge the phone.  DO NOT BUY THIS PRODUCT!!!!
I've been using this phone for about three weeks on the T-Mobile system within CT and while travelling. It has been an easy to operate phone. There are a few minor flaws that I've found which you may want to consider prior to making a purchase decision.PROS-Solid reception - seems to hold calls pretty well - have not experienced unexpected call drops.-As near as I can tell people are hearing my calls clearly-Easy to text message with predictive entry - very clear interface and helpful completion of words-While on T-Mobile you can be browsing the web and also receive an incoming voice call (though you cannot continue to browse - the key is that it doesn't send people to your Voicemail). I believe this is a function of the GSM technology that T-Mobile and Cingular operate under.CONS-Earpiece volume is low - you'll have difficulty using this in noisy environments.-Not EDGE (high speed Internet) capable-If there is a way to have multiple contact info (home, business, cell, email) for one address book entry - I haven't found it. Instead I have awkwardly had to setup multiple address entries (how 1980's).-The phone offers a Bluetooth connection - and there should be a standard keypress to turn the BT on and off. Instead you have to create a shortcut or re-map one of the "smart" keys to do the task.-It should be easier to change ring styles - most phones allow you to change the style to vibrate right from the volume buttons or a key press - the V330 supports this (kinda) but you have to use the up/down volume and then a smart key to select. The extra steps are tedious when you are trying to go into a store or movie theater and want to mute the phone.SUMMARYI'd purchase this phone again for T-Mobile. I considered other phones before making this purchase and the overall features (including the ability to use Bluetooth)are what attracted me to the V330.The requirement to list multiple names in the phone book is really odd and it might be that I just haven't found the "secret". The phone doesn't come with any type of detailed user manual so you have to go online and look at a PDF to get the information. So far I have not uncovered any secret. If I had a large phone book that I wanted to use, then I'd probably have passed on this phone (and any other Motorola using a similar scheme).If you are frequently in noisy environments, this probably is not the phone for you either. The earpiece is just too low. I'm constantly trying to raise the volume when talking to someone out in a crowded place that has noise.For a good middle-of-the road phone with solid reception, I don't think you can go too wrong with the V330.
I purchased the Scala 500 as my first BT headset and I regret it. The company is v-e-r-y slow to respond to email messages to their support box, so call them, don't write.While the sound quality of the unit is very, very good, there are other issues with the unit. First, the fit on my particular ear is horrible... always feeling like it was going to fall off. I never trusted it walking through airports as it just didn't feel secure.Second, the unit literally fell apart in my hands after three or four months. The portion that protrudes gently into my ear came loose, then broke off. I note that others have metioned the same thing. It just wasn't well constructed. Bummer! I've replaced it now with another low-cost unit made by Plantronics, but while I miss the sound quality of the Cardo, I am disappointed by their slow support and poor quality.
it was the wrong one.The male end does not fit the Iphone 4s .  Once it was pulled out it would not retract
The Plantronics Voyager 510 is a good bluetooth headset for its current price.  However, depending on how you plan to use it, it could either become a great headset or a nightmare.The first thing you notice out of the box is that it's quite large, both in the size of the battery pack that hangs over your ear and especially the depth of the microphone.  Put another way, it sticks out quite a bit from your cheek rather than laying flat against your face.  This not only can cause some sound quality issues, but also makes it very conspicuous.  So, if you prefer to keep a low profile while working hands-free, this may not be the best one for you.  The size of the piece that hangs over your ear also makes wearing glasses or even a hat an issue.  All that said, the unit is very comfortable provided you don't have anything else hooked over your ear.  It's also easily configured for either ear.Sound quality can be very good, but only in quiet environments.  Even small amounts of wind noise will render the microphone useless.  I've been surprised to have people complain to me that voicemails that I've left have been all broken up, even when I was in what I thought was a quiet place.I've also found that reception will be spotty unless the phone is placed closer than normal to the headset.  For instance, in order to maintain good signal, I typically have to have my phone in my shirt pocket.  But on the plus side, the unit is very easy to set up, with a variety of phones and PDAs immediately connecting to it with no effort.This headset would be ideal for someone who is looking to use it exclusively in an indoor office while working hands-free.  You'd get optimal sound and would be able to connect to all of your devices quickly and easily.  You wouldn't even feel self-conscious about the unit's size.  But for those on the go, its reception and microphone quality are too poor to recommend.PROS*  Excellent battery life means very little downtime for charging*  Simple to set up - instantly compatible with numerous devicesCONS*  Sound quality from the microphone, especially in places with even minimal background noise*  Big, bulky design makes fit difficult, especially with glasses or a hat
his and the white version of wireless headphone for ipod is being clearanced elsewhere for a good reason. I got one and it really cracks just by being flexed often enough, which is really unavoidable no matter how careful you are. It is only a matter of time. Mine cracked within a week, and yes I knew about the problem beforehand and was very careful. Unless you have a really small head (maybe the size of a softball), don't mind a cracked band or enjoy going through customer service, don't get it. it looks and sounds good otherwise, and works with computer bluetooth adaptors provided that you have software driver support for high quality bluetooth audio (a2dp). it's a pity.
We have a 93 Mercedes which has a tape player that is oriented to take the tape width ways. This unit can have the input cable changed to accomodate this type of side loading tape. Sound quality is great. I did not have to modify the unit like some of the other purchasers have mentioned. Sometimes the adjustable input cable connector gets loose and just needs to be plugged in tightly.
Will take nothing away from the product.  For my personal taste it was a bit bulkier than I prefer. Quality is good no complaints otherwise.
i have used this kit to fix a bunch of cell phones  and price is right and tools work great
I have been waiting to finish my 1 year contract to get this phone. i did find some bad reviews about 6600. but let me tell you folks its a awesome phone. I have a Palmone T3 and i am really having a good time with both now. neeed to try sync option soon. over all i am much satisfied. giving 4 stars cause the keys are placed little odd. thanks nokia
I'm not a Bluetooth techie, so I can't compare this to other headsets, but after a month of ownership, I can say it works great.My car has built-in Bluetooth, but everbody tells me that when I'm in the car it sounds like I'm under water.  Not so with the Motorola - I'm told it's crystal-clear.The only negatives I have are:* The multifunction button has no tactile feel - it leads you to press too hard, and too often.  This is especially a problem when you're walking or driving.* The flip out mic is nifty, but the headset tends to wobble if you shake your head at all.
This case works great! My wife and I are taking up kayaking and we needed some way to protect our phones. I have a samsung galaxy s2, she has a blackberry bold 9000. We each put our phones in our cases and immediately plunged them into the water to test to make sure they didn't leak. They worked perfectly! My wife even flipped her kayak and that was the true test, we righted it and checked the phone, dry as can be.I recommend these, i do wish there was some padding these came with as the phones do bang around inside a bit. I'll put my own inside, but for the price I think they could have included something.
I was so lucky to find this headsetI use a Treo 650 ----- I have tried a variety of headsets, including all of the Moto's --- the Scala is clearly the BEST for the Treo 650, and likely, many others1. The volume was very good --- louder than any other headset I used with the Treo 6502. The connection times are usually very fast too ----- most headsets take awhile to establish a connection, but this one usually takes just a second or less, and of course, automatically picks up both outbound and inbound calls3. 90% of the people I talk to say that they can hear me very loudly and clearly --- rarely do I get a 'barrel' effect going with this headset, as many others produce4. The wind-noise-cancelling technology is for real --- I have talked a couple times outside, in blizzards with this thing on --- quality was loud and clear on both ends, despite the high winds!However, it seems that I have to re-connect the pairing for this device, every now and then (maybe once every 3 weeks or so) ---- otherwise, I'm very happyPretty good talk time and battery, and of course, the volume is great!Check it out in new colors ---- clear, blue, and red!Lastly - the price cannot be beat!highly recommended! - HAPPY TALKING!!!!!
It lasted me 2 days then it didnt charge I thought it was my battery but no it was the charger
This is a basic cable.  It works and it is cheap.  There is not much else you can say about it.
Have this in my office at work for a little extra boost when needed. Nothing fancy just a charger that does what its ment to do.
I like the small profile for this charger, but as with all the USB cable chargers I've tried it seems to charge somewhat slowly.  Trying to run the GPS navigation while charging it will still slowly drain the phone.  It seems the dedicated car chargers (with no USB port) seem to charger much faster.
This is a really nice USB 2.0 hub. It works way better than the 7-port DLink it replaced. The LED lights are a bit bright, but for me it's not much of an issue since the hub lives down on the floor in my setup. I agree that it would be nice to be able to to turn them off though if it's too bright, just cover over them with a strip of tape-problem solved.I am impressed with this hub and would recommend it.Note-it is actually smaller than it looks in the pictures.
I tried putting my Galaxy S4 in the case and it kept popping out. It seems like the plastic casing is too small for the phone. Very disappointed.
Works great with my Moto Q.  Typing sound is annoying but easily turned off.I also caution that you should probably store the batteries uninstalled.  I put a brand new set of Duracells in it and they were dead a month later with almost no use (Just sitting in my briefcase)  I discovered this at the start of a 5 hour flight and fortunately was able to cannibalize a set from my MP3 player.  This only happened once so I can't say for sure that the keyboard sucked them dry.What really annoyed me was the "Fold and unfold" sticker which had some sort of industrial adhesive.  What a stupid thing to use.  It took me 25 minutes with cleaning solvent to get that darn thing off.  Also the black vinyl zippered pouch stinks like some toxic chemical.  If not for those two things I'd rate it 5 stars
Wow!  What a cute battery case! I saw a Christian sister with one of these on her phone!  That gave ne an idea-I decided to order me and my sister a battery case-mine is white, (since my phone is white), and my sister's is black,(since her phone is blue).Anyway, these little guys give you power for your phone! If we run out juice, especially when on the go, we can just connect this case to our phone, and it is POWER ON THE GO!! (I'm just concerned about the functionality).
Purchased the Jawbone bluetooth headset. It was just not comfortable, but with these all is great now. Could not ask for a better set of earpieces. Great use of my money to get these.
excellent product, works great , have easy handling, and good quality as it is announced. reached as is shown time and in very good condition thank you very much for everything
fits well on the phone and it is easy to use. the price is unbeatable and the product works like advertised
works great
i was raving to a friend about how amazon has great phone cases and how cheap they are and bought him this. it didn't even fit his phone right. poorly made.
I have several chargers. Have more than one vehicle so I keep more than one of these in each. Nothing more frustrating than finding all of a sudden one quits working, and you have no way to recharge your phone. That is always when you need it most.  This one works well for any of my products.
I was a bit wary about buying this headset in used condition, but was lured by the half-price price tag when compared to a new headset. I envisioned all sorts of shortcomings, but when it arrived I was astounded at the excellent condition of the headset. It is clean. No scratches. No faded labeling. It looked to be brand new. Oh yeah...it works great, too.&#128077;
I bought this set of adapters specifically for a trip to Europe. There are two different Europe plugs, I took them both, and they both worked everywhere I went.I used the adapters primarily in Denmark and Norway, they worked great and gave me no problems charging iPod, iPhone, iPad, camera batteries, etc.Note that there are numbers on the plugs, the numbers correspond to the cardboard insert to let you know where to use the plugs. It would be better if the plugs themselves had that information on them, but at least they have the numbers (which I didn't see at first so I put my own numbers on them).I will undoubtedly keep using the adapters on future trips, and I'll keep this updated.Update:Have also now used in Thailand, worked great.
We have two, and we love them. They work very well, like much better than the Motorola's we had, and these are quite stylish and unobtrusive. Now, I will say that I switch back and forth between the smallest ear piece and none at all - with it, it fits better and you can hear better, but it starts hurting a little after a while, have to take a break; without it, I can wear it all day, but, it dangles a little awkwardly and sound is sacrificed, a little, but certainly bearable.
I've been using this headset for a few months and couldn't be more pleased with the battery life. It recently had no problems keeping up with a four hour Skype session!It is also capable of pairing with multiple devices, so you can for instance use it with your computer at home and your cell phone on the road without having to redo the pairing every time, something cheap brand-X headsets don't do.Logitech was kind enough to supply a very tiny charger, perfect if you take your headset on the road. For those international trips, no problem: it can handle 100 to 240 volts and 50 to 60 Hz (translation for the technologically challenged: you can use it anywhere in the world, just get a cheap prong adapter)On the negative side, it's possible to jam the connector into the headset the wrong way if you're not careful. Of course the battery won't charge up and the light won't go on, a dead giveaway. It caused no damage to my headset, but the connector design could be better.I found this headset very comfortable to wear for extended periods of time. The volume is loud and the sound quality is very clear. People on the other side liked the sound quality as well.There are a few negative points that cost this otherwise excellent headset a star:* after 10 minutes of inactivity, it goes to low-power mode "sleep". When the phone it is paired with rings, it may take up to 5 rings for it to wake up and start ringing. If you press the answer button before the headset starts ringing, you will lose the call. If you want to answer right away, you can always answer on the phone but if you do so pressing the answer button on the headset will not transfer the call to the headset like it did on my Sony Ericsson HBH headset, but hang up. To transfer the call to the headset, use the appropriate menu on the phone instead.* The ring on the headset is an irritating, non-modifiable melody. It would be nice to have a few options!* The headset is fairly large and dorky-looking.Despite these few drawbacks, don't forget that this is a very capable, well made and reliable headset at a bargain basement price, one of the best out there. If you can live with the looks, it's a super deal.
my car had to get used to it as it is old but after a few try's haven't had any issues with it since and it just plays the music on and on now but i will note it doesn't sound beautiful might be my cars speakers though not sure.
I purchased this unit a few weeks ago from one of Amazon's 3rd party vendors. I got a very good deal, but the trade-off was that it came in a bag with no instructions. I went to the Logitech website and got things going.The pros:1) No wires, and the batteries last about 7 hours (I tried using them all day at work)2) The sound is good enough. (I had been using a Shure e3, which finally broke for good out of warranty). This unit is not near as loud or as bassy as the Shure, but they don't fall off while I'm on the treadmill either.3) Worked well for watching TV in private.The cons:1) Seems to need it's own bluetooth transmitter. My Powerbook bluetooth connected but the sound was so scratchy and bad that it was unusuable. Plug in the supplied transmitter and everything was fine.2) The headband is not adjustable and my ear feels bruised after wearing them for an hour. The time I wore them all day at work won't be repeated.The headband is almost a dealbreaker. If it wasn't for that, I'd be using these headphones all the time.3) The unit is kind of like those watches that use one button for multiple purposes. The button on each part does something different depending on how long you hold down the button. After a couple of days I got the hang of of, but the button on the transmitter is so small, that I have to stop doing anything but holding the button down to turn it off.Overall, I'd say wireless on a treadmill is worth the ear bruising. I can't count how many times I've accidentally hit the cord with my arm and sent my iPod flying across the room. I like to watch videos on it while on the treadmill and the bluetooth headphones make that a pleasant experience instead of constantly trying to watch the cord. People with larger heads need to know in advance that these will be tight on your ears.
It's a great deal, so i jumped on it. But was truly disappointed. I've so far summed up Motorola products as well really really poor. I own a Razar, wish i could return that! But this headset, thinking it's from motorola would work well with my phone, but no. It's on my belt clip, and the phone tell me that the bluetooth headset is 30 ft away, signal is weak, and then disconnets. To me that's strange. It's also surprising that this happens randomly, so it's kinda annoying, b/c you can't anticipate it. Kinda annoying when driving, b/c you rely on the headset to work properly. Also get the static noise which is weird, b/c it shouldn't do that. especially when driving.
This case helps me run my day smoothly without having to worry about my phone dying. Plus the color is very beautiful.
Like most people I have owned multiple styles of headsets and had varying degrees of success with them.  This Plantronics CS50 is simply the best unit I have ever used.  The unit worked my desktop phone answering system in my office.  I was on the phone every day and for 6 hours or more on a rough day.I got tired of holding a phone to my ear in the office for hours and being 50 feet away from my desk and missing the important call I was waiting for. This device solved both problems.  The headset unit gives you call answer and end control with your fingertips as well as volume and mute control.  It gave me remote ring detection and allowed me to be up to 300 feet away from my desk and catch that important call.  It would operate for up to 8 hours but it has a desktop control stand that charged the headset while I am in a meeting or at lunch.I used the Plantronics HL 10 Handset Lifter and by touching the button on the headset I could answer the phone remotely with ease.  The sound going both ways was excellent and I never had an issue with the unit.  Other designs I had tried were not always clear and people would complain that they could not hear me.  Not with this unit.  The noise cancelling mike and the cushioned ear piece made for excellent communication and comfortable wearing for long hours during the day.The unit has a fast recharge time in about 3 hours for 100 % full charge from empty.  The headset is extremely light and comfortable and the phone transmission is digitally encrypted for security and privacy.  This is the first tool I would buy if I were setting up a new office today.  It is great!
I was hoping for a blue tooth that will connect to more than one phone. I already had the LG and was hoping the Motorola would do better but I was let down. It is a great buy if you are only using one cell phone.
